Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Number of Reviews
72

Author
Jeff Pidgeon
a review by Jeff ("spoilers") Pidgeon
        If you've never seen "Close Encounters of the Third Kind", "Jaws",
"Jurassic Park", "Aliens" or "The Professional", you might be find the latest
remake of "Godzilla" tolerable.  For me, Roland ("ID4") Emmerich and Dean Dev-
lin's latest super-production was yet another patchwork quilt of lifted shots
and scenes from several other films.  One might expect a certain amount of
old familiar feelings -- this is after all, a remake; but it's mostly that 
and only that; a huge bundle of predictable moments delivered with plenty of
carnage but not much excitement.
        It starts out promisingly -- creepy titles of video nuclear testing
footage all shot in a nasty toxic yellow color over David Arnold's ominous
score (the credits grow as we watch them) -- but almost from the moment the 
film gets underway (with an attack on a Japanese fishing trawler), everything
feels trumped-up and cloned, as if the sole motivation for the film was to
out-do every other film in existence: "Oh, so the shark in 'Jaws' attacks a
little boat?" "Well, we'll have Godzilla attack a BIG boat!" "The shark drags
one boat around?" "We'll have our beastie drag THREE!!" "Terrific!!"  A couple
of these Spielberg-esque attacks, and we're on our way.  Using this "Close 
Encounters" technique of hiding The Big Surprise from view for the first
half hour or so works well when you're not really sure what you're going to
get at the end (i.e. little ships and -- whoa! -- the mothership!), but here,
since we do know, it mostly builds impatience to see The Monster in The City.
        Like "ID4", "Godzilla" has a number of plots running at once: Nick
Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) tries to save New York from getting completely
squashed while seeing if he really is still estranged from his one-time
-fiancee/aspiring reporter Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo, who plays one of 
those characters that you frequently pray will get stepped on or eaten). 
Audrey is trying to decide between Love and Her Career, having stolen a video-
tape of Godzilla's exposition and leaked it to the press.  Animal (Hank Azar-
ia) and Lucy (Arabella Field) seem to exist to round out a "Twister"-esque
band of characters with cartoonish Noo Yawk accents thrown in for flavor.
Philippe Roche (Jean Reno) plays a sinister member of the French secret ser-
vice who at first works against, then alongside our main characters to defeat
the creature.  Apparently, French atomic tests were responsible for the darn 
thing, and they want to cover it up.  Good luck convincing everybody that 
those crushed buildings were just swamp gas, guys!  New York mayor Roger Ebert
(Michael Lerner) -- yes, he has a balding assistant named Gene and they fight
all the time -- butts heads with the the Main Army Guy (Kevin Dunn) and with
Nick over whether or not Godzilla is actually Goddess-zilla, or Godzillette;
are eggs being laid somewhere on Manhattan?  Of course!
        We're even nudged to empathize -- her rampage is actually just Mommy
trying to raise her vicious, blood-thirsty little chicks in peace.  Aww!
Sorry folks, I thought they should have soaked that whole "Lost World" island
in nerve gas.  I mean, these aren't spotted owls we're talking about here --
these are HUGE, CARNIVOROUS MONSTERS THAT BREATHE RADIOACTIVE FIRE!  Kong and
Frankenstein clearly weren't violent unless provoked, and they were certainly
happy left in their own territory.  They didn't go building nests in Madison
Square Garden!  Sorry!  No sympathy!
        This is spectacle on such a grand scale that the quality is stretched
pretty thin.  Most of the technical work in the film remains firmly in the 
middle ground -- not pie-plate awful, nor ground-breaking innovation.  Most
of "Godzilla"'s effect's work feels at best uninspired and at worst rushed to
completion.  Much like "Lost In Space", the overall effect that the filmmakers
seem to be reaching for is a benumbed awe rather than any sort of suspenseful
rhythm or build.
        To be fair, a couple of the effects sequences are built on entertain-
ing ideas -- Godzillette isn't invulnerable in this film, she's just really
fast -- fast enough to evade surface-to-air missiles and underwater torpedoes
(Whether you want to buy this is another thing, but it makes for a nice vari-
ation, as opposed to the our-weapons-don't-seem-to-hurt-it stuff).  I liked 
the way the fire-breathing was suggested rather than blatant, and the cab 
chase in Manhattan (culminating on the Brooklyn Bridge) caught my eye as de-
cent spectacle.  Vicki Lewis plays a cute scientist that I was hoping to see
more of, but was squashed beneath the wheels of the central romance. 
        Most of these moments, though, are glints on a two-hour-plus stretch
of asphalt.  The film's sense of humor falls flat the vast majority of the 
time, and its attempts to connect you with its characters induce wincing.  
Most of my friends who are Godzilla fans say that it isn't a Godzilla movie.
Others say it's more of a remake of "The Beast From 20,000 Fathoms" than "God-
zilla".  Not being all that familiar with those films, I can't say.  But 
there's a lot of books I would recommend you start reading with those two 
hours that you'll save by not seeing "Godzilla".  Not Recommended.

Author
Jason Sands
The Big G gets a 90s make over in this thrilling roller coaster of FX.
In this version, Godzilla is the result of French nulcear testing in the
50s.  He is supposedly a mutated Iguana, and is well over two hundred
feet tall.
The main plot revolves around Nick (Matthew Broderick), a
Biologist/Nuclear Physicist who is researching the results of Radiation
on animals.  He is called in to investigate when Godzilla attakcs a
Japanese Fishing boat.  
Meanwhile, Nick's ex girlfriend is struggling in a dismal job as toadie
to a smarmy anchorman.  It seems she dumped him when he asked her to
marry her in the films lame attempt at a love story.  But hey, who cares
about the little people?  THis move ain't called Broderick;  We are here
to see the Big Guy turn up the heat!
There are many struggles by the script writers to keep Godzilla
"realistic."   He is not the invincible juggernaut of Japanese Kaiju
films;  He can be hurt, and used speed, agility, and cunning to defeat
the army instead of brute strength.
Godzilla's special FX are nothing short of amazing;  His sheer size is
well displayed by some artful direction, and his much more reptillian
appearance makes  him all the more menacing.   Instead of an atomic fire
blast, he can create hurricane force winds with his roar.
BTW, he is a HE.  Yes, the egg laying thing is a big part of the plot,
but he produces the eggs asexually.
Godzilla dwells little on the human side of the drama, which is good
since it basically sucks.  The producers probably knew this, so there
are many, many jabs a Film Critics Siskel and Ebert.  Doesn't excuse the
thin plot, though.
Kudos do go to the Professional, (forgot his name.) who plays a French
Secret Agent.   He is the only well developed character in the movie,
and his screen time is among the shortest.   
All in all, I have to say that Godzilla is a great, entertaining movie,
but not for the human actors;  For all of the city stomping anctics of
the Big G.  The movie screams for sequal;  How about a rematch with King
Kong?  Hey, it could happen...
The  Steel City Wrestling Federation: Where the big boys play with
attitude!
http://www.angelfire.com/mi/scwrestling

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: May 20, 1998
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria,
Michael Lerner, Arabella Field, Kevin Dunn, Harry Shearer
Directed by: Roland Emmerich
Distributed by: TriStar Pictures / Sony Pictures Entertainment
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (sci-fi monster action/violence) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/godzilla.htm
Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin, creators, writers, and producers of
1998's long-awaited monster thriller GODZILLA, once caught lightning in
the bottle with 1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY. So overhyped that it became the
must-see movie of the year, and eventually impossibly successful with
the summer movie crowds, and so corny and melodramatic that it was
actually fun to watch, ID4 was the pinnacle of senseless cinema. In
keeping with the lightning analogy, though, it rarely strikes the same
place twice, and Emmerich and Devlin have turned out a product here that
pales in comparison to their earlier alien-invasion film. 
The Memorial Day weekend has long been home to loud and high-powered
movies (e.g. MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE, THE LOST WORLD). After all, it
practically opens the summer movie season. In fact, the much-overhyped
movie that opens on Memorial Day is typically the only movie to have a
chance to outdo the much-overhyped movie that opens on the July 4
weekend. However, if there was any doubt prior to GODZILLA's opening,
this Memorial Day movie will likely fade quickly once the asteroid
thriller ARMAGEDDON takes to the screens. After the limpness of DEEP
IMPACT and the downright staleness of GODZILLA, audiences will be
looking for something sharp and intense when they attend the theaters. 
The reason GODZILLA is so stale is because the picture is incredibly
formulaic. It follows the typical maxim that "my enemy is only my enemy
until I know his secret." Although that was present in INDEPENDENCE DAY,
it wasn't completely obvious until the final thirty minutes. Here,
Emmerich brings Godzilla (a gecko-ish creature created from a French
nuclear explosion) to New York City with little premise but much
fanfare; turns the disaster and distruction knob to 11; and sits back as
a paltry crew of humans works frantically to hit the beast with
everything they have. The special effects, very JURASSIC PARK-ish in
nature, depict an agile Godzilla that's novel but hardly worth much. For
almost the whole of its 135-minute running time, this movie is nothing
but a messy mix of special effects and bad acting. 
The only way to enjoy GODZILLA is to dumb yourself down prior to
watching the flick. Matthew Broderick and Maria Pitillo, our two leads,
almost seem to be laughing silently at their parts. Most of the cast,
save the watchable Jean Reno, follows in accordance, and this results in
the movie being split into two entirely different sections. The movie
gravitates towards parody ground when the beast isn't on screen, and
then makes a radical shift towards guns-blazing action territory
whenever the call comes in that Godzilla looms nearby. It's much harder
to get as attached or involved here as most were in INDEPENDENCE, but
with the imminent box office returns and the wide-open ending (again,
formulaic), it won't be long before we see GODZILLA 2.
FINAL AWARD FOR "GODZILLA": 2.0 stars - a fair movie.

Author
James Kendrick
Director: Roland Emmerich || Screenplay: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich (based
on the character Godzilla, owned and created by the Toho Company Ltd.) || Stars:
Matthew Broderick (Dr. Niko Tatopoulos), Jean Reno (Philippe Roache), Maria
Pitillo (Audrey Timmonds), Hank Azaria (Victor "Animal" Palotti), Kevin Dunn
(Colonel Hicks), Michael Lerner (Mayor Ebert), Harry Shearer (Charles Caiman),
Arabella Field (Lucy Palotti), Vicki Lewis (Dr. Elsie Chapman) || MPAA Rating:
PG-13
More than forty years and some two-dozen movies after he first raised his huge
reptilian head in the 1954 Japanese monster flick "Gojira," Godzilla is back,
courtesy of the director / producer team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin, the
sci-fi twosome that last blew theater speakers out with massive alien
destruction in "Independence Day" (1996). Leaner, meaner, faster, and sleeker,
this late 90's reinterpretation of the normally dumpy, rubbery monster is
certainly a sight to behold, although his sheer size is almost too overwhelming.
Even though his earlier incarnations were laughably fake, the Godzilla of the
original Japanese movie had personality. In fact, audiences took such a liking
to him, that most of his later films switched him to the role of the good guy,
where instead of destroying Tokyo for mean-spirited purposes, he did it in the
services of saving the city folk from other monsters far more fearsome.
Devlin and Emmerich's Godzilla is no such creature. The result of French nuclear
testing in the South Pacific, he's a bad-to-the-bone animalistic aberration of
nature who rampages through New York City not once, not twice, but three times,
laying to waste such landmarks as the Chrysler Building, the Brooklyn Bridge,
and Madison Square Garden. And, whatever Godzilla doesn't destroy, the U.S. Army
does in its often ill-fated attempts to kill him.
Much has been made about what Godzilla looks like. The advertisements, which
have been running for a year now, purposely kept his physical look a secret (I
already knew what he looked like before I saw the movie, not because I have
inside connections, but because I saw a toy replica on the rack in a grocery
store several days ago - so much for the big unveiling). The new Godzilla, which
is brought completely to life by impeccable digital imagery, looks like a
combination of a really big T-Rex and the Rancor from "Return of the Jedi."
Square-headed and very nimble, he's so large the camera can rarely contain his
entirety in one shot.
The script, more or less written by Devlin and Emmerich, is nothing but a thin
rack on which to hang the non-stop orgy of destruction. In the leads, the
screenplay offers us two thoroughly blasé characters portrayed by Matthew
Broderick and Maria Pitillo, both of whom act so chipper and wide-eyed in their
amazement that they become the film's chief liability.
Broderick plays Dr. Niko Tatopoulos, and before you ask, "where the hell did
they come up with that clumsy name," it was borrowed from Patrick Tatopoulos,
the designer of the new Godzilla. Broderick is a scientist working for the U.S.
Nuclear Regulatory Commission by studying the growth effects of the Chernobyl
accident on earth worms. Pitillo plays Audrey Timmonds, Broderick's ex-college
sweetheart, now an aspiring TV newscaster (aren't they all in the movies these
days?)
The screenplay also throws in a lot of incompetent military personnel, Jean Reno
("The Professional," "Mission: Impossible") as a charismatic French secret
service agent, and Michael Lerner as the obnoxious Mayor Ebert, who is most
likely an unsubtle stab at movie critic Roger Ebert (Lerner is even seen briefly
in an election advertisement poster with the patented "thumbs up"). One of the
more likable characters is Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria), a gung-ho TV
cameraman who has more personality that Broderick and Pitillo combined.
However, any and all of these characters function as little more than human ants
constantly running from Godzilla's carnage. And what carnage it is. Starting
with an early attack on a large Japanese ship, Godzilla proceeds to pull a fleet
of three American fishing boats under the sea, before exploding out of the
Hudson River and demolishing most of New York. For those who don't particularly
care for the Big Apple, watching it get tossed and bashed by the giant lizard is
a vicarious treat for the first fifteen minutes. But destruction without real
emotional implication gets tiresome after a while, which is all that fills most
of "Godzilla's" overlong running time.
About two-thirds of the way through the movie, Emmerich suddenly switches gears
and develops a long sequence inside the ruins of Madison Square Garden that is
almost worthy of the hype surrounding "Godzilla." Ironically, the scene doesn't
include the titular big guy, but rather 200 snapping offspring. It turns out the
Godzilla has some amazing reproductive capabilities, and he decided to make the
Knicks' home court into his personal nest.
Broderick and Co. arrive on the scene just in time for all the eggs to hatch,
releasing some 200 nine-foot Godzilla clones that look, move, and sound almost
exactly like the velociraptors in Steven Spielberg's "Jurassic Park" (1993). The
chase inside the Garden plays like a combination of the scenes in the visitor's
center in "Jurassic Park" and queen's nest sequence in James Cameron's "Aliens"
(1986). It's tribute to the superiority of those films over this one that
"Godzilla's" best scenes are almost directly stolen from them.
But, even if they aren't particularly original, they're still extraordinarily
effective. The baby Godzillas exude real menace, and the entire sequence inside
Madison Square Garden is suspenseful, creatively staged, and creates a palpable
sense of danger - basically everything that had been missing from the first half
of the film.


Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Godzilla (1998)
Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria, Kevin Dunn, 
Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field, Vicki Lewis, Doug Savant, 
Malcolm Danare. Screenplay by Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich. Directed 
by Roland Emmerich.
PG-13, 4 stars (out of five) for the creature scenes. 1.5 stars (out of 
five) for the rest of the film.
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
I hate assigning star ratings to movies. The underlying implication, that 
filmgoers are too lazy to actually read a review, is insulting and 
besides that, assigning stars is a pain. When a film is clearly and 
consistently good ("The Truman Show") or an obvious dud ("Meet The 
Deedles") the process is easy. It's those in-between films, the ones with 
both great and dreadful moments, that really make the process difficult. 
Which brings us to "Godzilla."
After being subjected to a staggering amount of hype for over a year, 
it's easy to forget that "Godzilla" is, after all,  just a monster movie. 
Although the genre has produced a few undeniable classics, such as "King 
Kong" and "Jaws," for the most part, monster movies remain guilty 
pleasures. You enter the theater prepared to suffer through long 
stretches of dull plotting and silly dialogue in exchange for a few 
really cool fight scenes with a big, bad-ass monster. Although I haven't 
seen the original "Godzilla," an Americanized version of the 1954 
Japanese film "Gojira," since my childhood, I clearly remember how 
thrilling the monster was, and that the rest of the film was as ponderous 
as Raymond Burr during his "Ironside" days. 
The new "Godzilla" is a lot like that. In the hands of Dean Devlin and 
Roland Emmerich, the team responsible for "Independence Day," "Godzilla" 
is an absolute hoot when the creature is onscreen, and pretty bad when it 
isn't. The film's slogan is "Size Does Matter." Wrong. Devlin and 
Emmerich's sloppy, sprawling film reinforces another old axiom, that size 
doesn't matter, it's what you do with it that counts. The boys have 
whipped up a great looking monster and the battle scenes are terrific, 
but they don't have a clue when it comes to plotting, pacing and logic. 
Of course, despite the film's many flaws, I still plan to see it again as 
soon as possible. That's how nifty the creature effects are.
The story is very simple. Godzilla appears. A lot of movie archetypes 
with conflicting motives chase him. New York gets trashed as the military 
battles the monster. Just when you think it's over, something else 
happens. Just when you think it's over again, something else happens. The 
end. Well, until the sequel.
Over the course of Godzilla's long career, the monster changed from 
villain to hero and the movies became incredibly campy. Thankfully, 
Devlin and Emmerich avoid the cheese factor, playing things straight in 
terms of the creature. The film's humor, both intentional and 
unintentional, comes from the humans, not Godzilla. Neither hero nor 
villain, Godzilla simply behaves like an animal. A very, very large 
animal.
As for the look, forget about stunt men in rubber suits. This Godzilla 
actually looks like a giant lizard, thanks to some killer special effects.
 Lithe and agile, Godzilla moves convincingly, with a real sense of 
weight, bulk and power. It travels so quickly that firing military troops 
keep missing, inadvertently destroying almost as much of New York as the 
monster. Scenes of the creature racing through the city are great fun, a 
reward for all the phony looking monsters we've endured in past films.
Unfortunately, endurance is still a factor. In order to see Godzilla in 
all of it's glory, we have to suffer through long stretches of inane 
filler material, with a talented cast forced to spout a lot of hokey 
dialogue. Matthew Broderick is the idealistic young scientist in the 
center of things. Maria Pitillo annoys as a conniving reporter (in movies,
 is there any other kind?) and Broderick's ex-girlfriend, weighing the 
film down with a time-consuming, totally unnecessary love story. Hank 
Azaria has his moments as a gonzo photographer, although his character is 
laden with relationship baggage as well. Actually, only two cast members 
really get a chance to shine. Jean Reno has a powerful presence as a 
French agent pursuing Godzilla, and "NewsRadio's" Vicki Lewis adds 
welcome bite to a minor role as a scientist. 
The rest of the film is peopled with cartoons, a fat, reactionary mayor 
(named Ebert, the filmmakers' little thumbs down at the famed critic,) a 
self-absorbed TV anchorman, a soldier in way over his head, etc., etc. If 
Devlin and Emmerich want to truly become masters of "event" movies, they 
need to learn how to focus on the event instead of tired subplots and 
clichéd, superfluous characters. A little more attention to internal 
logic wouldn't hurt either. For example, the impact of an exciting chase 
scene is lessened by the ludicrous notion that a cab could outrun 
Godzilla.  
Ultimately, your tolerance of all the crap in "Godzilla" will depend on 
how much of a monster fan you are.  As for me, despite it's lumbering 
storyline, terrible pacing and disposable characters, I still had fun. 
Now how do you assign stars to that?

Author
Homer Yen
If you think that a nuclear test ban treaty would be in the best
interest of everyone, then you would be correct in supporting it.
Indeed Godzilla is a creation, or mutation if you will, that is a direct
result from too much testing.  The radiation fallout somehow mutates the
DNA of certain creatures which produce odd side effects.  Abnormal
growth is one of those effects, as explained by Dr. Nick Tatopoulos
(Matthew Broderick), a specialist studying the effects of nuclear
fallout on animals.  Tatopoulos is brought to the Caribbean where large
lizard-like footprints were discovered.  "Was I just standing in a
footprint," he asks incredulously.  There is more unbelievable evidence.
An ocean vessel has run aground.  It appears to have been torn apart,
gigantic claw marks can be seen along the exterior of the ship, and a
traumatized survivor blurts out something to the doctors that sound like
"gaw-chill-ah".
Our anticipation grows.  We want to see what we're paying for.  Finally,
the overgrown reptile makes itself known by entering Manhattan.  He is
an impressive beast.  Cars get squashed, buildings crumble, and the
surprised citizens run for their lives.  The military and Tatopoulos
hurry and set up a command post, and they begin to develop a plan to
attack it.  Tatopoulos is also reunited with old college crush Audrey
(Maria Pitillo).  She left him long ago, but still feels something for
the quiet scientist.  As a reporter wannabee, her career is presently
going nowhere, and she sees this as an opportunity for her big story. 
Tatopoulos does make a scary discovery, learning that Godzilla has come
to NYC to nest.  A new species is being born, and if they don't act
fast, New Yorkers will become food for the scores of reptilian offspring
that are close to hatching.  Time is running out.  The military can not
find Godzilla.  Tatopoulos can not find the nest.  And the audience can
not find a story.
The problem with Godzilla is that it is a 30-minute effects extravaganza
stretched out into a 2-hour movie.  There's a feeling of ineptness that
wafts through the movie.  Military might can't bring down the creature.
Useless politicians look on in dismay.  The citizens want to return back
to the city despite that fact that baby Godzillas are looking for food
and that practically every building is in need of some major repairs.
Meanwhile,  Broderick's and Patillo's characters are so vapid that we
become more interested in the secondary characters, such as Animal (Hank
Azaria) who throws common sense to the wind in order to get exclusive
video footage and Phillipe Roche (Jean Reno), a mysterious character
whose purpose is kept a secret until the last 30 minutes.  But that's
not to say that Godzilla isn't visually spectacular.  Army helicopters
chase Godzilla through the city streets.  They fire their weapons, which
manages to destroy everything except the 50-foot nuisance.  Submarines
can't even catch him.  And the best sequence comes at the end of the
movie when Godzilla chases the scientist and his friends who are fleeing
through the city in a taxi.  Nuclear or atomic testing may have resulted
in Godzilla, but I would suspect that significant movie audience testing
would have never yielded the same mistake.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Writer-director Roland Emmerich has produced some of the biggest box-office
champs in history, particularly the grossly silly though often fun "Independence
Day." Back in 1998, he produced and directed the most overhyped movie event of
all time, "Godzilla." "Godzilla" was so overhyped in its marketing campaign
(which started a year earlier) that there was no point in seeing the movie at
all - you already had. In the previews, there were glimpses of Godzilla's
enormous foot destroying half of New York City's streets and close-ups of its
reptilian eye, and that's about all you see in the movie, folks. After Godzilla
invades New York, he inexplicably and implausibly hides in the sewer and plays
hide-and-seek with army helicopters. The footage is shot at night, and it is so
poorly photographed that you can barely see the huge lizard at all, only a big,
blurry shadow. And then there are Godzilla's numerous babies on the loose in
typical velociraptor/"Jurassic Park" fashion. 
For such a lavishly expensive production with state-of-the-art special effects,
you would think we would at least see this creature. Godzilla stampeding through
the city of New York is a great, wondrous and scary idea but the movie never
follows suit. His foot is seen crushing cars, potholes, etc. How about Godzilla
knocking over the Statue of Liberty or climbing the Twin Towers on Wall Street
or lashing his tail against Times Square billboards? Nope, the filmmakers never
use their imagination in conveying the destructive nature of the beast. He
mostly runs through the city and often yells, and that is about it. How does
this creature hide though? How does it change size and shape throughout? And how
dare they allow us to develop sympathy for the monster only to then ask us to
hate it at the end when all you hear is its heart beating (a lift from 1976's
"King Kong")? 
Another fact lost by the filmmakers is the genesis of this creature. Godzilla
was a Japanese creation, a symbol of America coming on their fort and starting a
war, namely World War II and the counterattack on Pearl Harbor. This new
Godzilla is simply a special-effects blur with no personality and no purporse.
This is Godzilla for the 90's with anemic co-stars such as Matthew Broderick,
Hank Azaria and the shrill-voiced Maria Pitillo to boot? I'll stick with the
original 1955 black-and-white version with Raymond Burr, thank you. At least the
fire-breathing monster of that film was destructive. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust668@aol.com

Author
Steve Rhodes
     It can now be revealed.  The Fulton Fish Market, one of New York
City's most popular tourist attractions, is an extremely dangerous
place to visit.  At any minute, the world's most over-hyped giant
lizard may stop by for a snack.  He's actually hoarding the herring,
not eating it, but if I explained that subplot, the studio, which has
controlled access to the film as tightly as if were the Manhattan
Project, might send over one of their spare monsters to have me for
dinner.
     It can also be disclosed that, if you've seen the wonderfully
imaginative trailers for GODZILLA, you have already experienced the
second best part of the movie.  (The best is the advertising campaign,
which guarantees that the movie will make a monster-sized killing at
the box office, regardless of the quality of the product they are
selling.)
     From INDEPENDENCE DAY's creative team of director and co-writer
Roland Emmerich and co-writer Dean Devlin, GODZILLA disappoints at
almost every turn.  As one of the few film critics who absolutely loved
INDENDENCE DAY, I expected GODZILLA to be at least an absorbing film
and probably an adrenaline-pumping action fest.  Instead, what I got
was a movie that is best described as tedious.
     The script is unable to fashion any characters that are not
complete caricatures, and the actors all deliver sophomoric
performances.  The city's mayor, played by Michael Lerner, is a
bumbling idiot, who worries more about reelection than about the
distinct possibility that all of his supporters may become lizard
lunch.
     There is a ditzy blonde and would-be newscaster (Maria Pitillo),
who can't get promoted because she won't sleep with her boss.  That she
doesn't seem to have enough brains for her current clerical position is
conveniently ignored.  Her boss, played by Harry Shearer, is no gift to
mankind either.  In his initial broadcast about the reign of terror, he
opens with: "There's a dinosaur loose in Manhattan!"  You almost expect
him to follow it with, "News at 11."
     Jean Reno is a mysterious French insurance investigator who is
actually a French secret agent.  He is there because he doesn't trust
the American military.  This is wise since they use rifles to shoot at
a twenty-story high beast.  As one of the soldiers astutely points out,
"We need bigger guns!"  Our military also has the dumbest smart bombs
in the world, which seem capable of hitting everything but the monster.
Oops, there goes the Chrysler building.  (One way to pass the time
during the picture is to take along a notepad and try to keep count of
the story's illogical elements.)
     And then there is Matthew Broderick, as Nick Tatopoulos, a.k.a.,
"the worm man," an earthworm expert and an ex-antinuclear activist who
is currently working on the inside for the betterment of the planet.
Broderick, who has been good in a host of movies such as ADDICTED TO
LOVE, plays his part with a single, dumb, wide-eyed expression that
looks like he's living on a diet of No-Doze.  Emotionless and detached,
he can go nose to nose with the big guy without a hint of fright.  It
is as if he were staring off into space, which is exactly what he was
doing until the computer added the lizard later.  Nick has one Kodak
moment after another.  He's fond of pointing his little disposable
Kodak in the dinosaur's eye and snapping flash pictures of him.
Godzilla is a very understanding ham, who likes to pose.
     Filmed by Ueli Steiger during a series of torrential downpours,
the ugly picture's color palate runs from a blackish blue to a grim
gray.  The monster is impressive, but, if you've seen any of the ALIENS
series, you've seen better.  Overall, the look of the picture is
closest to the deservedly unsuccessful ALIENS 3.  Little in the
storyline or the action will make you care about what happens on the
screen.
     The movie, thankfully, does pick up the pace and the interest in
the ending sequence.  But, I regret to report, the ending leaves no
doubt that there will be a GODZILLA 2, and probably a 3, 4, 
     GODZILLA runs needlessly long at 2:19.  It is rated PG-13 for
monster violence and would be fine for kids around 9 and up, depending
on their sensitivity to violence.

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, Kevin
Dunn, Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field
Director: Roland Emmerich
Producers: Dean Devlin
Screenplay: Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich
The thing that struck me most about this big monster movie was that it
was thoroughly enjoyable  much more so than JURASSIC PARK or THE LOST
WORLD, which I believe took itself much too seriously. With Godzilla,
the experience was different, not merely special effects  okay a lot of
it was special effects somehow this monster is more intelligent and
interesting than a silly T-Rex running through the streets, not to
mention bigger in size.
There isn't a moment of boredom or tedium, with ongoing action and
dialogue to keep the viewer hyper-stimulated throughout the entire movie
experience. I can still hear the thumping of GODZILLA's big webbed feet
ringing in my ears, the whale-like-moan he makes before appearing, the
rattle of machine guns bouncing off concrete, the swish of flying
missiles flying through the air, the burr of helicopter propellers with
overheated engines, the screech of tyres skidding across the wet
landscape, the screams of numerous pedestrians trodden to death, the
shrillness of glass shattering as GODZILLA strolls past central park.
There is a plot, a reasonable one, although very much over the top
fantastic. Godzilla the giant aberrant mutation, is the result of
nuclear experimentation and so indirectly man made. He's the guy you've
come to see, and so overshadows the otherwise extremely well chosen
cast. Matthew Broderick as the weedy, geeky scientist, Jean Reno is
wonderfully humorous as the French secret agent, Hank Azaria is
colourful as a very American-Italian cameraman. But let's face it you
came to see the big guy have it out with the US airforce, navy and army
and what a wonderful spectacle it is. So just sit back and enjoy the
commotion.

Author
Sridhar Prasad
Starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Harry Shearer, Maria =
Pitillo, and Doug Savant
Written by Dean Deviln and Roland Emmerich.  Produced by Dean Devlin
    GODZILLA shouldn't be this much fun.  After showing what to do right 
with a cheesy disaster movie in the incredibly entertaining INDEPENDENCE 
DAY of 1996, Emmerich and Devlin do everything wrong in this motion 
picture.  Without a doubt the most cliched, hackneyed picture made by 
Hollywood in recent memory, Godzilla has one of the worst scripts I have 
ever seen.  The dialogue is garbage, the characters are under-written, 
the acting performances are pathetic, and the music is unbelievably bad. 
 Yet, I guarantee you that Godzilla will be one of the most enjoyable 
movies you have ever seen. 
    Remember that 45 minute lead-in to the aliens in ID4?  Forget it.  
Devlin and Emmerich are out to get the monster shown in a hurry, and 
they do.  By the time the credits are over, you see the destructive 
power of Godzilla.  Within 30 minutes, Devlin and Emmerich show you the 
beast.  A mix between an iguana, a crocodile, and a T-Rex, he does look 
good.  The animation is smooth, if horrible at certain times, and the 
night sequences are particularly fantastic.  Emmerich's talents with 
quick cuts and sharp turns make these portions a delight, especially 
helicopter chases that go around searching for the monster. 
    Unfortunately, it's the portions bookending the monster sequences 
that are absolutely dreadful.  Matthew Broderick does his best as Nick 
Tatopoulus, an expert on radiation effects, but he isn't helped much by 
this awful script nor by the other actors.  Maria Pitillo is atrocious 
as Broderick's long-lost love, a perfect ditz who can't get anything 
right.  Hank Azaria is as wonderful as ever, but he is so underused we 
never get a chance to really know him.  Only Jean Reno has the most 
impact: as a mysterious Frenchman, he is a wild and crazy delight, a 
cross between Jeff Goldblum and Brent Spiner's characters in ID4. 
    After a particularly good 40 mins, the movie settles into a 60 
minute holding pattern that is mildly enjoyable at its best, and 
downright tedious at its worst.  The CGI graphics are outstanding, and 
the movements of the monster are fabulous, but sooner or later, you get 
tired of seeing the same old scenes over and over again.  Savant is OK 
as O'Neil, a big and important soldier, but he's not used much either, 
and wasted like the rest of the cast.  Cliches abound, and the jokes are 
painfully stale. 
    However, it is the last 40 minutes that saves Godzilla.  This movie 
resembles last year's Memorial Day blockbuster, The Lost World, in that 
both are mediocre.  However, Devlin and Emmerich saved their best for 
last, which is what Spielberg should have done.  When Broderick and Reno 
go hunting for Godzilla's nest (that's right, he's pregnant--just watch 
the commercials!), they find 200 eggs, all of which hatch into little 
baby 'Zillas, each of whom are about 5-6 feet tall.  Imagine lizard 
velociraptors.  What happens is some frighteningly fun sequences with 
200 monsters and 4 people in a closed up Madison Square Garden.  Have we 
seen this before?  Sure.  Jurassic Park did it better before Godzilla, 
the remake, was even thought of.  But damned if its not fun.  The 
sequences are gems because they provide some action.  Quick cuts and 
stale jokes here help, because they are so lighteningly paced that we 
actually laugh. 
    The real fun comes at the end, with an elaborate chase scene.  
Again, everything from this movie is derivative.  From the music to the 
monsters, we've seen all of this before in far better movies.  But 
that's the point.  Devlin and Emmerich set out to make a modern-day, 
B-movie monster movie with an enormous budget.  That they succeeded 
proves that you don't need a script to make a movie fun; you just need a 
lot of money.  Godzilla shouidn't be this much fun.  We should hate it 
because it is everything we abhor about the movie industry.  But inside 
that movie theater, it certainly can be captivating.  This is not a good 
movie; its just a damn fun bad one.

Author
Steve Kong
Knowing that Godzilla came from the "creative" team of Emmerich and Devlin
- the two dudes that brought us Independence Day and Stargate - I stepped
into my screening of Godzilla with: 1) my brain turned "off", 2) ready for
an adrenaline rush, and 3) ready for a roller coaster ride.
Let's just say that I walked out of the movie thinking that their horrible
Independence Day was a masterpiece compared to Godzilla and I did not have
a hint of adrenaline rushing through my blood stream. If Godzilla were a
roller coaster ride, it would be a ride with a few loops, some
not-so-steep-drops, and miles of level track before the next excitement.
Some nuclear testing done in the middle of nowhere creates Godzilla --
who's not looking quite like himself in this US version. For some reason
Godzilla wants to move off his little island, and where does he want to go?
New York, New York of course - the city so nice, they named it twice. All
animals have migratory periods and it is time for Godzilla to migrate, but
why?
"Why" does not matter to the US Army because all it wants is to annihilate
Godzilla. Biologist Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) has other ideas,
though. He thinks that Godzilla - thanks, marketing department at
Sony/Tristar for revealing this during the trailers - is pregnant and wants
to nest in New York. The Army thinks Tatopoulos is crazy, not because
Tatopoulos is a nut, but because this is how it always works in the movies:
The guy who has the right idea is the guy who is always treated like an idiot.
Unbeknownst to the US Army, the French Secret Service is also interested in
why Godzilla is in New York. A group of French Secret Service agents, led
by Philippe Roche (Jean Reno), is out to destroy Godzilla too.
Because this script comes from Emmerich and Devlin, there has to be a
non-emotional, one sided, "love" story that tries to pull our chains long
enough to make us cry. It seems that a reporter want-to-be, Audrey Timmonds
(Maria Pitillo), was Tatopoulos' love interest eight years ago in college.
She sees him on TV and tries to re-light the romance between them.
I really wanted to like Godzilla. I grew up watching the corny and cheezy
TV shows as a kid. I loved it when Godzilla - obvious to even a kid that it
was a guy in a rubber suit, but hey, Godzilla was cool - ran through cities
roasting people, buildings, and military with his breath of fire. In
Emmerich and Devlin's Godzilla, the big guy only gets to use his fiery
breath twice! This is a complete disappointment.
Godzilla is held back by two things: a weak script and horrible acting.
Script? What script? Like Independence Day, Emmerich and Devlin have penned
a script that sounds, and feels, like a fourth grader wrote it. The
characters excel at speaking cliched lines and the action is far and few. I
disliked Independence Day because of its weak script, but the Independence
Day script is Shakespeare compared to Godzilla.
As I watched Matthew Broderick on screen, I kept wondering if his
performance was purposely bad or if he's lost his acting ability. At best,
Broderick looks like a freshman drama student reading from cue cards. At
worst, it looks as if Broderick did not want to be in the production was
trying everything he could to be fired. Either way, Broderick, who we have
to follow throughout the film, gives a bad performance.
Jean Reno escapes unscathed; he did a decent job with his part as the
French Secret Serviceman. There were two roles that disgusted me and were
supposedly comic relief for the film. These were New York Mayor Ebert, and
his assistant, Gene. One was chubby with white hair and the other was
skinny and bald and they both like to use their thumbs; you get it? The
first time these characters took the screen I chuckled. The second time
they graced the screen I smiled. The third time I thought the joke was
getting old. After the third time, I stopped counting. These two roles did
nothing for the "story line," wasted screen time, and served only as an
in-joke for Emmerich and Devlin. Like everything else in Godzilla, this
didn't work because it was used in excess.
As for Godzilla, the effects are good, but nothing new. Emmerich and Devlin
chose to stay with the tried and true computer graphics for Godzilla. Sure,
Godzilla looks ferocious in the first attack on the Big Apple, but, after a
few more shots of him, he gets boring. The film was shot in constant rain
to hide the flaws of putting such a huge beast in a cityscape, and this
rain detracts from the total effect of the film. Godzilla just looks
generic on screen. Skip ahead to the next paragraph if you don't want to
know why Godzilla comes to New York. Godzilla's "babies," which look
suspiciously like the raptors from Jurassic Park and Lost World, are OK. At
times these little babies are so computer generated and move in such
synchronocity that they look like the squad of cheerleaders from the local
high school. This takes away heavily from the scare factor.
So what? Experience with Independence Day tells us that there are going to
be lulls in a Emmerich and Devlin film. But there's always spectacular
adrenaline pumping action scenes, right? Wrong. Emmerich must have had a
fluke with Independence Day because the action and the "scary" scenes in
Godzilla brought on more yawning than it did jumping from seats. Spielberg,
who did the two Jurassic Park films, shows that he knows how to bring on
the scares with his dinosaurs. Emmerich shows that he is just a hack at it.
Godzilla stands taller than a high rise, he runs faster than Apache
helicopters, and he breathes fire, yet Emmerich is never able to make the
tension level in the theatre rise higher than that in a convalescent home.
As for the movie score, there are three things that can make a score
distracting: it can be too loud, it can come at the wrong moments, and it
can sound so borrowed from another film leaving the audience wondering
which film the score came from. David Arnold, whose Tomorrow Never Dies
score I really enjoyed, comes to work with Emmerich and Devlin again.
Arnold makes one mistake with his Godzilla score; it sounds too much like
Mark Mancina's Speed music. There are points in the film where it sounds
like Arnold has taken directly from Mancina's work. And for me it was quite
distracting for half the movie because I couldn't figure out where I had
heard the tune.
But, in the end, nothing I or any of my fellow film critics can say that
will dissuade anyone from seeing this awful piece of filmmaking. The studio
hype is all that counts nowadays and the hype for Godzilla was huge. I
doubt even bad word-of-mouth from the average filmgoer will dissuade any of
their friends from seeing Godzilla - curiosity will prevail in this case.
Godzilla runs a whopping two hours and 12 minutes, which is too long for
this type of movie. Had Emmerich cut some of the non-essential stuff this
might have been a fun ride. Had Emmerich and Devlin written a smarter
script that doesn't try to create stories for one-dimensional characters,
this might have been a fun ride. But, I digress, this is a Emmerich and
Devlin film we're talking about and they love excess. Skip Godzilla.
Size Does NOT Matter - Godzilla proves this. It's quality that matters and
Godzilla has none of that. Skip, skip, skip.

Author
James Sanford
        To get an idea of how director Roland Emmerich's ``Godzilla''
stacks up alongside the beloved Japanese series many of us grew up
with, imagine taking a child's drawing of Godzilla and blowing it up
into a mural that could fill the side of a skyscraper. The result
would certainly be bigger, but it would not improve the artistry of
the original.
  So it goes with this extraordinarily lavish and utterly
pointless modernization of ``Godzilla,'' which has numerous high-tech
tricks up its sleeve but no real wit or originality.
  The screenplay by Emmerich and producer Dean Devlin can't
decide whether to play the scenario for campy humor or all-out horror
and finally settles on an unsatisfying middle ground. Although the duo
eventually generate a bit of suspense - albeit with sequences that
essentially are elaborate variations on bits lifted from ``Jurassic
Park'' and ``The Lost World'' - the movie wears out both its welcome
and its audience's patience long before its nearly two-and-a-half-hour
running time is up.
  Like the recent ``Lost In Space,'' ``Godzilla'' makes its
first mistake by glossing over its origins. The charm of the Godzilla
films produced by Toho Studios stems from their bizarre plotting and
chintzy production values, and though this ``Godzilla'' utilizes
state-of-the-art computer animation and seat-shaking digital sound,
it's not nearly as entertaining as one of the truly twisted Toho
films, such as ``Godzilla vs.  Biolante,'' in which the giant lizard
battles an enormous rose that's taken root in Tokyo Harbor.
  By contrast, fun in ``Godzilla'' arises only intermittently.
It's exciting, for example, to see all the vehicles along a Manhattan
street bounce simultaneously as the heavy-footed monster makes his
first approach into the city, and to watch Godzilla's whip-like tail
carve deep gashes in the facades of familiar New York landmarks. There
are also tense moments late in the film as some imperilled humans
attempt to escape a demolished Madison Square Garden.
  But Emmerich and Devlin never know when to quit. Five
minutes of Godzilla rampaging through the Big Apple pumps up the
adrenalin; 15 minutes of destruction doesn't heighten the rush.
  When the title character is out of sight for too long,
however, the movie wheezes to a crawl, as its non-reptile characters
are a dull lot indeed.  Dr. Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) is a
bright-eyed nice-guy who works for the Nuclear Regulatory Commission
and who tracks Godzilla from the South Pacific to the East
Coast. Meanwhile, Nick's ex-girlfriend Audrey (Maria Pitillo, in a
sincerely annoying performance) - an aspiring reporter who shows no
evidence of even being able to spell `TV,' but won't let a lack of
smarts keep her from becoming a network anchor - tries to use her
former flame to get an exclusive on Godzilla's background. Along for
the ride are videographer Victor ``Animal'' Palotti (Hank Azaria) and
secretive Frenchman Phillippe Roache (Jean Reno), who essentially
hijacks Nick into joining his team of monster-hunters.
  None of the actors seems particularly inspired, although
Azaria tries every once in a while to squeeze some laughs out of his
lines. The scenes involving Nick and Audrey re-evaluating their
relationship are custom-made for trips to the bathroom or the popcorn
counter, as Broderick and Pitillo display absolutely no spark
whatsoever.
 As in ``Independence Day,'' the previous Emmerich-Devlin
teaming, the humor is forced and generally flat. A running gag
involving a candy-noshing mayor named Ebert (Michael Lerner) and his
useless assistant Gene (Lorry Goldman) becomes tedious in no time at
all, and though ``Godzilla'' doesn't have as many dopey one-liners as
``Independence'' did, the ones it does include are groan-worthy.
 On a purely technical basis, ``Godzilla'' is impressive
enough to merit a mild recommendation. Though the animation doesn't
always jibe perfectly with the live-action, the movie has a certain
dark visual style, somewhat along the lines of the Tim Burton
``Batman'' epics. Godzilla himself has been overhauled by designer
Patrick Tatopoulos (who apparently lent his name to Broderick's
character), who has given the creature a more natural look and has
allowed him to be considerably sprightlier than ever before.
 But those expecting a shocker will be let down. Emmerich and Devlin's
``Godzilla'' turns out to be almost as overblown as the 1977 revision of
``King Kong.'' The only thing that might send you screaming from the
theater is the horrifying Puff Daddy song heard over the end credits.

Author
Joshua Birk
I love movies big, movies small, movies bad and movies excellent. 
It's the ones in between I can't stand.
Godzilla is a little bit of all of this.
Let's put it like this. When this movie came out, critics panned it for
being plotless. Pointless. Lack of decent dialog. Yada. Yada. Did these
guys watch any of the original movies? I adored them. In case you missed
the basis, here's the plot of every Godzilla movie ever made: 
  1.Monster or Monsters awake or arrive from ridiculous concept.
Concepts can include frozen slumber, lab mutation or time travel. 
  2.Monsters spend considerable time and plot to reach a metropolis.
This is because monsters love an audience. This metropolis is almost
invariably Tokyo, but exceptions do occur. 
  3.Extras, a few unknown actors and the occasional Raymond Burr throws
considerable military power and scientific knowledge at the monsters to
generally no avail. 
  4.Switch between blue screened special effects, miniatures, screaming
extras and large amounts of latex. 
  5.Monsters generally get tired of the action. They are, after all,
quite large. They generally sludge back into the ocean and roll some
credits.
Point is that if there was ever a movie whose premise allowed it to be
an idiotic slugfest of special effect wizardry and large buildings being
cut down to size, Godzilla was it. In fact, if there was a problem I had
with the movie, is that they didn't have enough of it. They introduce
baby godzillas (ick...didn't even work in the old ones) which makes it a
little too slick and suspenseful. Anyone can take a bunch of film from a
poorly lit corporate building and paste some 3D alien/lizard/squid
thingy after some aptly screaming actors. The beauty of Godzilla is
scale. Watching buildings fall. Tanks get squashed. And mankind learn it
suddenly became the runt of the block.
Overall:
A fun romp in central park with huge, fantastic special effects.
Wonderful lack of plot and great silly dialog. Unfortunate injection of
standard fair Alien-esque subplot and not nearly enough squashing,
screaming and general mayhem. 
-- 
Joshua Birk 
______________________________
home email:inkless@inkless.com
The Cutting Room Floor - Reader Based Reviews
http://www.inkless.com/crfloor/

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Matthew Broderick; Jean Reno; Maria Pitillo; Hank Azaria & Kevin
Dunn
The advertisements said that size does matter. I guess that's a bit of an
irony considering the size of this film's budget. Even with all of the money
that was obviously spent on this movie, Godzilla will probably go down as
one of the biggest disappointments of all time. Don't get me wrong, the
special effects are impressive -- what there are of them. But this movie
spends way too much time on the characters discussing strategies for
stopping the overgrown iguana and not enough time actually fighting the big
lizard. This movie could have been called Matthew Broderick as opposed to
Godzilla. Because Broderick gets way too much screen time in relation to the
big guy. When Godzilla is on screen, it is always dark and raining, so the
special effects never really come across as being that spectacular. For
those that don't really care about special effects shots, Godzilla has a
decent story line. It's just that Godzilla was marketed as a big budget
special effects picture, so when you notice the decided lack of spectacular
effects, it can be a bit of a disappointment. Add to that the fact that
Matthew Broderick, who is a great actor, just isn't the first person you
think of as the lead in an action film.
Nuclear testing in the South Pacific has genetically altered the native
lizards in the area and created what may be a new species. And a very large
species at that. Godzilla has lived under the sea in the area for years but
is now running out of food, so he is venturing out of hiding to find a new
food supply. His search eventually leads him to New York City
(coincidentally, the place where he can do the most damage). Broderick is a
scientist working for the US government who is brought in when Godzilla is
first discovered. He is supposed to try to figure out exactly what they are
dealing with. He then assists the powers that be in their battle to save New
York City from the big lizard. The search for Godzilla in New York is then
the focus of most of the movie. They never seem to know quite where he is at
any given time -- a point that undoubtedly saved the producers millions
since they didn't need to spend any money on special effects shots.
As I said, Broderick is a good actor, just not somebody who would be my
choice to headline a summer blockbuster movie. That having been said, he
does a pretty good job. As does Jean Reno, playing a mysterious man who
seems to keep showing up at the scene of Godzilla's destructive actions. The
good acting on the part of the leads really doesn't make up for the so-so
writing and the disappointingly scarce special effects.
Godzilla's creative team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin were also
responsible for Independence Day, another film that was short on story but
big on effects. I guess they figured this time that they would go short on
both story and effects. The end result is that they don't have nearly the
film in Godzilla that they had in Independence Day. Godzilla is not a truly
bad movie, but it never even comes close to living up to its enormous hype.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Roland Emmerich
Writers: Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin (story by Emmerich, Devlin, Ted
Elliott, and Terry Rossio)
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria, Kevin
Dunn, Harry Shearer, Michael Lerner, Lorry Goldman, Vicki Lewis, Doug
Savant, Arabella Field
All "Godzilla" needs to really be is 2 hours of big, loud, entertainment
that somehow taps in to the part of our psyche that loves to be frigthened
by cataclysmic scares, and soothed by massive destruction (preferably of
Manhattan).  I won't say this for many films, but when I heard they were
making this flick, all I wanted was a couple semi-interesting characters
there for some human and comic relief, and a whole lot of destruction. 
Godzilla, you have all of Manhattan island to play with: go wreck some shit
up.
We get a little bit of this towards the end, when, in the last, oh, 30
minutes, the film takes off into a visceral, intense, and downright
thrilling experience, thanks to a twist in the story where the four main
protagonists find what has to be about a hundred Godzilla eggs in Madison
Square Garden, all within seconds of hatching.  From this point on, the
film takes off into, yes, a rip-off of "Jurassic Park," but still an
edge-of-your-seat rollar coaster ride of gradual tension, not meaning that
the tension increases, but that the quality of the tension increases.  By
the time the four protaonists have hopped into a cab and are driving as
fast as they can from a pursuing Godzilla, I was actually pretty into the
film.
What "Godzilla" needs is more of this, and less of other things, like most
of what occurs in the first hour and forty minutes or so of the film, which
is redundant, moronic crap on a stick.  Do we need a half-assed romantic
subplot?  Do we need all the cheap attacks on Godzilla if they're not
riveting?  Here's a film with about 160 million or so dollars, with a great
locale, and they do almost nothing with it.  "Godzilla" is a creature
feature: it needs to act like one.
Director Roland Emmerich and Producer Dean Devlin, the guys behind the
shitty "Stargate" and the
fun-ONLY-if-you're-in-a-packed-theater-of-participating-members
"Independence Day," have written and crafted the film, but the real
brilliance behind the film is in the advertising.  For a year, anyone who's
seen a movie in a theater has been munundated with countless teaser
trailers for this flick, which featured only scattered, brief shots of the
beast, and ensured that when the film actually arrived, it would be big, no
matter what the story is.  You ask someone if they're going to see
"Godzilla," and they say, "yeah," but if you ask them why, they can't
answer that.  Hell, I paid to see this and I don't know why I bothered.
This would be all cool if the film delivered.  James Cameron teased
audiences similarly in 1990 to 1991 for his sequel to "The Terminator," but
at least he delivered a film which is one of the most amazing cinematic
experiences of the decade...and he was able to squeeze in tons of
breathtaking, intense action while still creating characters we care about,
and even lots of depth on humanity.  "Godzilla," for all its hype and
grandness, is suprisingly bland and dull.
That goes for Godzilla himself, as well.  Emmerich and Devlin sure have a
knack for stealing ideas for their big delivieries, making them come off as
nothing short of anticlimactic.  In "Stargate," the military guys travel
through a warp through billions of light years to arrive in...an Egyptian
desert...populated by humans.  In "Independence Day," the aliens travel
light years to conquer Earth, and when we see them, they're...octopus men. 
When we see finally see Godzilla after all the quick tease shots of him,
building up the first real look at him, he's...Tyranosaurus Rex.  Sure, the
old Godzilla was a man in a plastic costume, and this is a multi-million
dollar special effect that looks real, but it has lost all its wit in the
process.  Gone is the face that shoots up, and the perfectly erect back,
and the firebreathing done without so much as leaning over, and here is the
T-Rex, straight from "Jurassic Park," complete with the same biting
technique.  Of course he's terrifying, but he's not Godzilla.
Even his offspring suffer the same fate: they're a bunch of raptors, and
all their movements are stolen completely from "Jurassic Park."  The big
differences: there's more of them, and they have scales on their backs,
just like their parent.  Even the scene where we see all the eggs is stolen
from the ending of "Aliens."  Luckily enough, they're still frightening to
look at, and their scenes are done well enough that we forget that their
carbon copies, if only for a brief couple seconds here and there when the
action and tension has subsisted for a bit.
Oh, yes, and there's a plot, or at least an attempt at one that is in place
of the first 100 minutes or so.  Godzilla is the result of nuclear testing
around French Polynesia, where we see a couple lizards looking one at the
blasts (so where are the others?  guess there's gonna be a couple sequels),
and when he begins to destroy some ships and whatnot off the coast, they
bring in nuclear scientist, Dr. Nick Tantopopolous (Matthew Broderick, who
needed the attention, I guess), who was busy studying worm mutations up in
Chernobyl (they call him "the worm guy").  He concludes that he's a victim
of nuclear testing just as Godzilla swims on over to the Big Apple (why the
Big Apple?  because it...uh...it has lots of stuff he can destroy, I
guess...or because Emmerich and Devlin don't know where else to stage
destruction anymore).
Also in the story is Nick's ex-college sweetie, Audrey Timmonds (Maria
Pitillo, who brings out the worst of sitcom style acting), who works for a
pompous news anchor (are there any other kind?), Charles Caiman (Harry
Shearer, the voice of Mr. Burns and others on "The Simpsons"), and is
trying to break into anchordom, regardless of the fact that she is terrible
at it.  And there's her friend's husband, Victor "Animal" Polotti (Hank
Azaria, voice of Apu, Chief Wiggum, and several others on "The Simpsons"),
a wild cameraman who is just trying to get the best footage of the
beast...at any cost.  Soon, they're working along with Nick, trying to help
him stop the beast and his eggs.
Since the military and local government are exercising their stupidity in
handling the situation, in comes some French Secret Servicemen, led by a
man named Philippe (Jean Reno, known to American audiences as the
helicopter pilot in "Mission: Impossible"), who are trying to destroy the
eggs as well as the beast so that their government doesn't suffer because
of their nuclear testing.  They are actually kinda nicely presented, shown
in brief shots doing things we don't understand until later on in the film,
although the film really shows how culturally ignorant it is in terms of
their presentation and running gags: all the french guy, with the exception
of Reno, are named Jean-something, and all they talk about is the lack of
croissants and how bad the "French Roast" coffee is.  Yes, all french
people are like that, I forgot.
After awhile, the film slips into a cycle: the military tries to stop
Godzilla in the dumbest ways possible (my favorite was the submarines in
the East River), Godzilla runs and ends up destroying them, and the
military freaks out while Nick tries to tell them what's going on and is
subsequently ignored.  Only when it changes its pace a bit in the last half
hour does it really take off, and one almost forgets how deadly dull the
first hour and forty minutes were.
It also doesn't help that this film has an IQ of about 4 1/2.  The script
is one of the worst of all big budget flicks, filled with terrible
dialogue, and some really awful plotting.  The mystery of what those French
guys is intriguing for a bit, but soon becomes annoying, and when revealed
what their mission really is, it becomes anti-climactic.  The film takes
itself so deadly seriously (a big mistake - it's a Godzilla flick!) that
when any jokes pop up, they're distracting (the worst, most unfunny running
gag is the fact that the Mayor looks like Roger Ebert, and is named Mayor
Ebert, and his chief aide is named Gene, and looks like Gene Siskel -
obviously a totally unsubtle attempt at revenge by the creators of the
film, who's past films were panned by them).  Also not working at all is
its attempt at being "King Kong" and humanizing Godzilla from time to time,
then copping itself out and making his killers into heroes.  And then
there's the romantic subplot of "Will Nick and Audrey
*ohmygodohmygodohmygod* get back together?!?!"  I say if you're not going
to make a romantic subplot, the thing that every film seems to need by the
Law of Big Budget Movies, I dunno, interesting, then you might as well
trash it.  Then we wouldn't be burdened by the acting by Maria Pitillo
(ugh).
Also sadly, no actors really take off.  Matthew Broderick tries to say
Emmerich and Devlin's awful dialogue with a straight face, but can't help
it that his character is less than paper thin.  Even comic geniuses like
Hank Azaria and Harry Shearer aren't given good roles...in fact, Hank's
character's chief personality trait is his Brooklyn accent.  The only who
actually does do a great job is Jean Reno, who, sure, plays his role
compeltely straight, but actually makes everything he does believable, and
also a blast.  Jean actually gives a better performance than the lizard
himself.  Still, all the characters are pretty dull, and the result is an
empty experience, filled with little of anything.  The only reason we care
about the people inside the cab in the end is because 3/4 of them are
Matthew Broderick, Hank Azaria, and Jean Reno.  At least in "Independence
Day" they bothered to bring us interesting characters; here, they just want
to show off Godzilla, in all his anticlimactic glory.
The last half hour makes up partially for a lot of the crap that goes on
for most of the film, even if that partiality is minute.  The final action
sequence IS a great action sequence: riveting, intense, wild, proposterous,
exhilerating.  If the film had more of these, it would be great.  I won't
say this for many films, but "Godzilla" needs more carnage and intenisty,
and less of anything else it has.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Aaron Sanders
I got paid today, so I shelled out six bucks to see a sneak preview of
Roland Emmerich's GODZILLA. Of course the special effects were great, but
this is 1998--aren't we all very used to spectacular special effects? By
themselves, special effects just don't cut it anymore, and they sure
aren't enough to save this movie.
The main problem is that the movie was given the wrong name. It should
have been called THE LOST WORLD GOES TO NEW YORK. It really shows no
stylistic or dramatic influence from the original GODZILLA series, but
plenty--embarassingly much--from the two JURASSIC PARK films.
Sure, there were a lot of dumb things about the old Japanese Godzilla
films which are better left unemulated; but there are also some reasons
why the Godzilla phenomenon has survived for almost 40 years...and
absolutely none of them are apparent in this new version.
First of all, the original Godzilla was a MONSTER. While he was overweight
and oafy, he at least had a frightening alien/mutant look about him. But,
alas, not only is this new creature unrecognizable as Godzilla, he's also
pitifully unoriginal: he looks uncannily like the Tyrannosaurus Rex in THE
LOST WORLD. Rather than looking alien or mutated or frightening, the new
Godzilla is just another computer-animated dinosaur, right down to the
familiar scale patterns on his skin. Boooorringg!
The original Godzilla also had a real thing for destruction, which made
him scary. The new Godzilla does comparatively little damage as he bounds
through the streets of New York, stomping on cars, his tail gouging out
the sides of buildings. Any Godzilla fan knows the Big Guy should be
THROWING the buildings, or starting a domino-effect with the skyscrapers,
or at least causing an inferno at an oil refinery. In the new movie, more
damage is caused by the military seeking to destroy Godzilla than by
Godzilla himself. As Matthew Broderick's character points out, this new
creature is not really a mutant enemy of mankind, but just a big animal on
the loose.
Oh, and wasn't the original Godzilla able to spit radioactive plasma or
something? There are a few scenes in this version which could be
interpreted as Godzilla spitting fire, but if you're not expecting this,
they could easily be mistaken for coincidental explosions. Nobody ever
says anything about this ability in the script. 
Besides, it seems like you only see Godzilla himself for a total of about
15 minutes in the movie's first 2 hours. What takes up the other 1:45?
Insipid soap-opera sub-plots among the cardboard human characters, that's
what. They were so bad, I was actually BORED. I can only imagine how the
indispensible pre-teen moviegoer will react.
This movie also sabotages its own plot in a way similar to ALIEN
RESURRECTION: Within a few minutes after Godzilla is first sighted in New
York City, Manhattan is completely evacuated. Now, where is the pathos or
suspense in watching Godzilla ravage an EMPTY city? Of course, they would
evacuate Manhattan in the event of a giant lizard, but it would take a
LOOOOONG time--easily long enough for Godzilla to wreak untold havoc on
the population. As it is, he spends most of his time burrowing through the
subways and concealing himself in hollowed-out buildings, playing
hide-and-seek with the inept military. 
Maybe there were some good things about GODZILLA. If it entertained you,
fair enough. But for me, in comparison to what it should have been,
GODZILLA was an immense disappointment.

Author
David Wilcock
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 20 MINUTES
STARRING MATTHEW BRODERICK, JEAN RENO AND MARIA PITILLO
DIRECTED BY ROLAND EMMERICH
Fantastically over hyped, Godzila finally lumbers onto the big screen. The
film opens with footage of nuclear testing on the french polynesian islands,
then an attack on a boat from some beast, and finally we join Dr. Nick
Tatopoulos (Broderick looking about 17 years old) doing some research  in
Chernobyl. Some shady U.S government guys appear, and ask him to come to an
island where they have massive footprints, from what looks like a giant
lizard. And what's more, this beast is heading for New York. Gulp!
Although Godzilla should be a non stop roller coaster ride, and at some
points it is, there is something curiously uninvolving and unexciting about
this movie. The main faults lie with the acting and writing, common problems
with 'summer blockbuster' movies. Broderick is pretty useless as the hero,
with no humour or a 'tough guy' image. While Emmerich's previous summer
flick, Independence Day (1996) had wisecracks and action from Jeff Goldblum
and Will Smith, this has neither. Also, Maria Pitillo, as Broderick's former
girlfriend, is just as useless, with a chronic disability in acting. She's
incapable of showing emotion, speaks every line in the same way, and
basically she's total crap. It's up to french actor Jean Reno to save the
day, and indeed he does, turning in a campy performance as a french secret
agent. Shame he has such little screen time in such a overlong film. Hank
Azaria also turns up as a crazy cameraman named 'Animal', and he adds a
little life to the picture. Also making an appearance is Harry Shearer
(probably best know for doing voices in The Simpsons) as a slimy news
reporter.
O.K, so the acting is not up to par, but it never is in these movies. But
what about the script? Well, that's not up to par either. Emmerich and
screenwriting pal Dean Devlin seem so caught in the destruction of New York
City that they forgot to write a script. The dialogue is banal (Broderick
looks at a lot of fish and utters 'That's a lot of fish.'), and the
character development is non existent (Reno plays the typical frenchman ('No
croissant?'), Broderick forever remains a geeky scientist.) Also, the film
is seriously lacking a sense of humour. The jokes that are uttered are
pathetic, and there's an 'hilarious' running gag about Siskel and Ebert.
(The mayor is Mayor Ebert, and is assistant is called Gene! HA HA HA HA!.)
The plot is dire, and in the end just rips off Jurassic Park (1993) by
having lots of baby Godzilla's (i.e. Velicorapters) running around New York.
Right, so the script and acting suck. But what about the special effects?
Thankfully, they're are quite good. Godzilla is an impressive piece of CGI,
although we don't see much of him because the movie is so dark. The
destruction of New York is pretty well done aswell. But although they are
impressive, they can't save Godzilla from being an hugely disappointing and
boring movie. The movie goes on for far too long aswell, and it can't seem
to decide on a ending. And of course, the ending itself leaves possibility
for a sequel. Let's just hope one never arrives.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Bob Bloom
 He's leaner, more agile and meaner, no longer the plodding, campy
guy-in-the-rubber suit stomping cities constructed of paper maiche and
balsa.
 After all the hype about "size does matter," the Independence Day
moviemaking team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin have created a wild,
but uneven, amusement park of a monster movie.
 Godzilla takes the "star" of 22 Japanese films, most of which were
targeted for children, and turns him loose in the city that never sleeps -
and probably never will again.
 Godzilla, like Emmerich and Devlin's Independence Day, is the perfect
summer movie; heavy on special effects and action, light on the dramatics
and sprinkled with dashes of humor.
 In appearance and actions, this giant lizard is unlike the one moviegoers
have come to recognize. The only similarity between the original Godzilla
and his American counterpart is that both were spawned by nuclear testing.
 But while the original - called Gojira and released barely nine years
after the atomic blasts that destroyed Hiroshima and Nagasaki - carried a
somber warning about the dangers of nuclear testing, this latest
incarnation barely glosses over that aspect.
 At nearly two hours and 20 minutes, Godzilla speeds along, except for a
long stretch about three-fourths of the way through when the big guy is off
the screen.
 Director Emmerich keeps building the suspense for the first full-length
appearance of Godzilla.
 As the film opens, a Japanese freighter is destroyed in the South Pacific,
but all the audience sees are flashes of claws and a tail, but it hears the
monster's roar.
 The scene next shifts to Panama where enormous footprints are found. Later
in the waters off New England, three fishing trawlers are dragged under the
North Atlantic.
 Emmerich is teasing, building for the inevitable monster-in-New York mayhem.
 And it is not long in coming. Once Godzilla comes ashore at the Fulton
Fish Market, the movie's pace accelerates. Buildings are destroyed,
vehicles are flattened as Godzilla runs amok through the Big Apple.
 Battling this big beast is Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), a Nuclear
Regulatory Commission biologist pulled from his three-year project in the
Ukraine of studying the growth of earthworms caused by leaking radiation
from the Chernobyl nuclear plant.
 Broderick is no heavyweight hero. He brings a nerdish, brainy, boyish, but
competent air to his character. He is more in awe of Godzilla, wishing to
study and understand rather than destroy him.
 The design of the monster, created by Patrick Totopoulos (he did such a
wonderful job that the filmmakers named the lead character in his honor),
is superb.
 Unlike the Japanese, who merely placed a man in a rubber suit and had him
plod through miniature sets, Totopoulos' Godzilla is a multifaceted
creation. He runs, leaps, walks upright and on all fours. He snaps, lunges,
dives and swims.
In looks, he's a bit of H.R. Giger's Alien, and the raptors and T-Rex from
Jurassic Park.
 With the help of computer generated effects, it actually looks like this
mountainous monster is leveling the greatest city on earth.
 Pointing out the film's flaws are superfluous as it will not keep anyone
from seeing the movie.
 First the female characters, especially Maria Pitillo as Audrey, Nick's
ex-girlfriend, are superficial and lame. She's a wanna-be reporter who uses
the crisis the further her career, but the monster displays more
personality than her character.
 Secondly, the movie's script is a bit too cute for it's own good. The
mayor of New York, played loudly by Michael Lerner, is a short, round,
gray-haired individual named Ebert, whose campaign slogan is the thumbs-up
sign. His top aide, with whom he always seems to be arguing, is a tall,
thin balding man named Gene.
 Near the finale, Godzilla begins to sputter and shifts tone, becoming an
extended ripoff of the raptor chase sequence from Steven Spielberg's
Jurassic Park. Only this deadly hide-and-seek match is set in Madison
Square Garden.
 Besides Broderick, fine performances are turned in by Jean Reno as a
mysterious French agent who also wants to see Godzilla stopped, and Hank
Azaria as Animal, the fearless news videographer who if need be will get in
the lizard's face for a shot.
 Godzilla is a full-throttle, special effects extravaganza. It has disposed
of the serious baggage of the original, while keeping just a touch of
campiness of the many sequels.
Nor has it not gone to the extreme, as did the later Japanese movies, of
transforming Godzilla into a good guy battling other monsters to save the
planet.
 This Godzilla is a competent mix of thrills, chills, explosions and humor.
The finale, of course, is open-ended. A sequel or two or three is
inevitable.
 So grab your bucket of popcorn and check your thinking cap at the door.
Godzilla is pure summer candy.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Alex Siegel
Wrap a hundred million dollars worth of special effects around nickel
script, and what you get is movie like Godzilla. It's hard to know
what to say about a movie like this one since ordinary criticisms
about plot and acting would be redundant. So instead I'll start with
special effects, which are the primary reason anybody would want to
see this picture.
The special effects were... pretty good, perhaps even great at
times. If you saw ID4 and Jurassic Park, you won't see anything new in
Godzilla. However, there is still a lot to look at. Big Green gets
plenty of screen time, and he has never looked so spiffy. The
systematic destruction of Manhattan was also well done. The visuals
become a bit spotty towards the end, but none are in-your-face bad. If
the director had cut out all the dialog and chosen a better score, we
might have a pretty decent movie.
Unhappily, he did not make that choice. Where is it written that
"summer popcorn" movies have to be so dumb that the audience laughs at
all the wrong times? Aliens was not dumb. Terminator II was not
dumb. The list goes on: Dirty Harry, Jaws, Commando... These are not
shining examples of the literary arts, but they don't insult the
audience either. Godzilla, on the other hand, is a perfect example of
how Hollywood cuts all the wrong corners. I can imagine the scene now:
a handful of Sony execs sitting around a table, sipping coffee. One
suggests doing a big Godzilla movie. Everybody nods. "Great idea," one
exec mutters, "but who will write the script?" Somebody else responds,
"Don't worry about that. How hard can it be to churn out a Godzilla
script?" Such statements should appear on tombstones as a warning to
future generations.
I suppose I should talk about the acting, such as it is. Matthew
Broderick struggles as the "smart guy that nobody will listen to." He
spends most of the movie looking like a lost puppy rather than the
brilliant (at times impossibly so) scientist that he's supposed to
be. Maria Pitillo plays the romantic interest, but does so in such a
dimwitted fashion that it's hard to see why anybody would want to
spend much time with her. Jean Reno does a fair turn as a mysterious
French guy, although he's limited by his material.
The production team did get one big thing right in Godzilla: the
advertising campaign. It's easy to see where they spent $150 million on
this budget item. We've been inundated with pretty good Godzilla ads
for months now. More than anything else, these ads will probably save
the movie from being a bomb at the box office. I particularly liked
the preview where Godzilla steps on a Tyrannosaurus skeleton in a
museum. I might add that a better movie would not have needed so much
clever advertising. Witness The Full Monty, which had almost no
promotion yet made truckloads of money.
In summary, go see Godzilla if you're in the mood for extremely
brainless eye candy. Otherwise, don't bother.

Author
Ben Hoffman
As the ad's double entendre proclaims, "Size Does Matter"    Godzilla
Is BIG.
In a little in-joke, scientist Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick)
is named after Patrick Tatopoulos, the designer of the creature
Godzilla.  The original creature  is based on the Godzilla character
owned by and created by Toho Co. Ltd. in 1954.   Another, not quite
as "in",  is having New York's Mayor named Ebert (because Roger
Ebert looks a bit like like Michael Lerner who has that role).   When
the Godzilla is finally taken care of, the mayor looks for ways his
administration can take credit.
In some spectacular special effects, made possible in part by new
computer graphics software and technology, the film is as real as one
could imagine.   For those displaced New Yorkers like me, it really
looked as if the Chrysler Building and Brooklyn Bridge were being
toppled by the huge creature with every giant step it took, as well as
demolishing Madison Avenue.  Very realistic.
The film starts with a ship at sea.  As a blinding flash of lightning
and accompanying thunder crash across the screen, the ship heaves and
tosses about on huge waves.   News soon reaches the world that several
ships have overturned for no apparent reason and are lost in the
ocean.     In other parts of the world, investigators are baffled by
giant footprints marching across the lands of Panamanian forests,
Tahitian villages and Jamaican beaches.    Dr. Tatopoulos is called in
to help solve the mystery when it is discovered that a giant animal is
wreaking destruction in Manhattan.
As in the original GODZILLA, the story is that it is nuclear radiation
that has caused the monster to grow to its present height. While
Director Emmerich enjoyed the original he was not about to make an
American remake.    The story then concentrates on scariness.  What
do you do about a huge creature that is like the proverbial bull in
a China shop, knocking over buildings and causing untold havoc?
Fortunately, the story, by Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio and Dean Devlin
and Roland Emmerich,  and the screenplay by Dean Devlin and Roland
Emmerich, made sure the characters in the story were real people.  The
parts of scientist Tatopoulos, called back from Chernobyl where he was
investigating unusually fat worms caused by the irradiation at that
disaster site,  and of the French insurance investigator, Philippe
Roache (Jean Reno) were written with them in mind.   The Roache
character is unhappy that the French Government has tested so many
nuclear bombs in the Pacific.     Other unthinking countries have done
their nuclear testing in the Pacific and elsewhere with no regard to
the inhabitants of those areas nor to the consequences.  Mutations are
happening all over the globe and the fictional Godzilla is but one example.
All in all an entertaining film with some great special effects and a
more or less warmed over  but adequate story.    Others in the film
are Hank Azaria as an intrepid  photographer, Maria Pitillo as the
love (small) interest, Harry Shearer as a newscaster who thinks he
would like her as a Washington-type "intern."

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 TriStar Pictures
 Director:  Roland Emmerich
 Writer:  Roland Emmerich, Dean Devlin
 Cast: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank
Azaria, Kevin Dunn, Michael Lerner, Arabella Field, Vicki
Lewis, Doug Savant, Harry Shearer
   The next time someone tells you that irradiated food is
harmless, send him to this movie.  And if he doesn't get
around to seeing it, no problem: you can be sure there will be
a "Godzilla 2," or more accurately a "Godzilla 24," within two
years.  Though the well-known leapin' lizard never gained the
popularity here of E.T., he has been the subject of over a
score of films, mostly Japanese.  They're the pictures which
those of us lucky to be of a certain age thrilled to as early as
the 1954 Japanese production "Gojira" directed by Terry
Morse and starring Ishiro Honda and Takashi Shimura, with
Raymond Burr later added as an insert for the American
crowds.  To no-one's surprise, critics agreed that the special
effects were the star in that one.  Nothing's changed, nor
does TriStar attempt to market the current version as a
character-driven story, unless, you of course, you consider a
big green guy to be a character.  Come to think of it, Godzilla
himself is about the only believable character in the picture.
He's certainly larger than life and acts better than Matthew
Broderick, also to no one's surprise.
   There's much to admire here, however.  For one thing
there's the fact that you can blame the overgrown lizard on
French and not American nuclear testing.  For another,
there's an attempt at humor (there aren't many) by featuring
Roger Ebert lookalike Michael Lerner as Mayor Ebert, a
grandiose political animal whose comeuppance arrives near
the end when his campaign chief gives him the big thumbs
down sign.  The fact that a good deal of Manhattan Island is
destroyed is either good or bad depending on your
geopolitical nature, though to appease real New Yorkers,
Madison Square Garden comes in for total destruction as
well.  Yet another plus is the presence of Jean Reno,
allegedly a French insurance investigator who, along with
Godzilla, is the only credible performer--one whose antipathy
toward American coffee and American doughnuts holds water
and proves that two things in France are better than what
we've got over here.
   Filmed in Hawaii to stand in for French Polynesia and also
on location in New Jersey, New York and California,
"Godzilla" opens on a French nuclear test, whose mushroom
cloud is looked upon with fascination by three cute lizzies.
(Why only one mutates into the big beast is anyone's guess.) 
Shortly thereafter, research scientist Dr. Niko Tatopoulos
(Matthew Broderick), aka "the worm guy," is whisked away by
State Department personnel from his Ukraine project
investigating fat earthworms in Chernobyl to advise a group of
military planners, politicians and scholars on a sushi-loving
creature that has wreaked havoc with a Japanese fishing boat
in Polynesia.  He soon meets up with Audrey (Maria Pitillo), a
former sweetheart who walked out on him eight years before,
and with her two friends Luci (Arabella Field) and Victor (Hank
Azaria), who work for a TV news station bossed by Charles
Caiman (Harry Shearer).  Advising the military that it's better
to have the creature come to them than to try to dig him out
of his New York hiding place, he gathers up thousands of fish
as bait from the Fulton fish market and awaits the return.  His
reappearance provides just what the audience has been
waiting for: the destructive force of a dragon-like heathen
who, when he a tail unfolds, sweeps out one hundred
windows on an upper floor of an office building and whose
mighty claw crushes many of those who do not have a
starring role in the movie.  Meanwhile, Mayor Ebert has
probably given up on the idea that anyone in his town will
adopt the creature.  After all, where would you get a pooper-
scooper that's the right size?
   Though the company claims to have re-invented the
Godzilla legend by use of cutting-edge technology, the picture
does not look a whole lot different from the one the Japanese
made forty-four years ago.  For good or evil, the kitsch is
gone.  Godzilla does look almost real, thanks to modern CGI
(computer graphics imagery) that's de rigueur with high-tech
companies that want you to buy a new model each year, but
when he growls and moans, we feel kind of sorry for him.  It's
an E.T. thing.  The guy didn't ask to be born like this and you
can't blame him for leaving French territory where he would
have been condemned--as Woody "Love and Death" Allen
would say--to spend his life eating croissants and food with
rich sauces.  He did not travel by foot all the way to
Manhattan to see the movie "Godzilla," nor was he much
interested in Knicks games despite his visit to Madison
Square Garden. And after all, he was probably aiming to get
lawyers, not innocent people, when he swished out those
windows around the Flatiron building and coaxed the military
to bomb the Chrysler building.   
  Like Beethoven's Fifth, "Godzilla" has more than one ending. 
In the most dramatic, the lizard stages a one-day strike
against a taxi, showing how easy it is to catch a cab in
Manhattan if you're assertive enough.
   To show sympathy or animosity toward the creature, huge
audiences will surely throng to the 7,000+ screens in the U.S.
for its opening on May 20, folks who might well overlook the
competing "Bulworth" making its nationwide debut two days
later.  Never mind that Mayor Ebert cannot match wits in the
slightest with Senator Jay Billington Bulworth--the best
Hizzoner can do is to scream that evacuated New Yorkers
should be let back into the city even while the monster is
taking his paces in midtown.  
   Matthew Broderick, who shows empathy for Godzilla
despite his frequent, frightened, wide-eyed gaze each time the
monster approaches, is still Ferris Bueller--the boy next door
you'd love to set up with your adorable, curly-haired blond
daughter.  The only human show-stopper here is Jean Reno
as French agent Philippe Roache, still donning that four-day
beard, whom you will recognize from his dazzling role in Luc
Besson's "The Professional." He's the man who puts an
artistic touch on the movie by forcing director Roland
Emmerich to insert French subtitles.  He does a mean job
with a southern American accent as well.
   Maybe New York, the country's most liberal big city, should
rethink its mission to allow visitors in without regard to size,
color, or manner of birth.  Rated PG-13.  Running Time: 139
minutes.  (C) 1998 Harvey Karten

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, Kevin
Dunn, Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field
Director: Roland Emmerich
Australian release date: June 11, 1998
For those of you who thought that the Titanic had appeared a little too
many times on film, get this: there have been over twenty motion
pictures featuring Godzilla in some way or another. These include the
big lizard appearing with "the giant moth," King Kong, "Space Godzilla,"
the "Bionic Monster," and (would you believe) Bambi.
The 90's equivalent from this massive Japanese market, which put the
country on the map for international films, is a remake of the 1954 hit
Gojira (or as we know it, Godzilla: King of the Monsters).  Not
unpredictably, it's what we've come to expect from mainstream remakes:
state of the art special effects, and cinematography that leaves the
original for dead.  But whereas the original film was a revelation for
its time - pushing the realms of classic cinema to produce something
that no one had seen before - the new version looks strangely recycled,
bringing more than just elements of Jurassic Park and The Lost World
back to the big screen.
For reasons none too clear to me, a giant lizard somehow emerges from
French Polynesia to destroy a large Japanese fishing vessel.  It goes on
to create havoc on other fishermen until it finds its way to land - the
city that never sleeps.  Whilst this is occurring we are hastily
introduced to Dr. Niko "the worm guy" Tatopoulos (Mathew Broderick), and
a team of
lets-not-kill-it-too-soon-because-that-wouldn't-make-a-good-movie
experts.
They have a little trouble - well, maybe more than a little - destroying
the beast that is turning New York into rubble.  From setting traps to
searching the subways, Godzilla is not an easy fella (or sheila, in all
fairness) to bring down.  One soldier wisely points out that they "need
bigger guns."
Having an estimated budget of US one hundred and sixty million dollars,
the film is a spectacle to watch. Cinematographer Ueli Steiger captures
the urban streets of New York quite well, and it rains for most its
duration because, darn it, it just looks more exciting that way.  But
that's it for Godzilla - just looks - there is no depth, no point and no
emotion attached to this cold serving of banged up lizard.
Saving Godzilla from total failure are the moments with Jean Reno (whom
you may remember as "Krieger" from Mission: Impossible) playing a French
secret service agent; with motives that are not clearly defined yet
intriguing none the less.  He orchestrates some well-timed send-ups of
the "American way of life" with hilarious results; he's a strong actor
who gives an equally strong performance.  In fact, it's interesting to
note that most of the laughs come from Reno, surprisingly leaving Harry
Shearer (famous for his many voices in "The Simpsons") looking bland and
predictable as a conniving journalist.
I found this disappointing, because Shearer is such a naturally funny
man who, when given the chance, might just be able to work as well as
some of his more famous characters, like Monty Burns and Ned Flanders
(both hilarious and legendary in their own deranged way).
Roland Emmerich's (the film's director) other recent blockbuster
(remember a little film named Independence Day?) and now this indicates
a belief that the public want large budgeted, special effects bonanza
motion pictures.  Whilst he may be right to some extent (as these two
films have scored massively in the box office), can't Emmerich ever
consider that perhaps people also want intelligently written, appealing
scripts?  Probably not, since many Godzilla posters have the words "Size
Does Matter" printed in big bold letters.  But forget that - its plot
that really Does Matter.
If you simply must see Godzilla to get a whiff of possibly one of this
year's biggest films, watch out for the thrilling helicopter chase
scenes and the final confrontation on top of the Brooklyn Bridge.  But
if you take my advice - and I highly suggest you do - wait till Godzilla
is released on video, so you can fast forward through all of the failed
sub plots and the unnecessarily large chunk of the film devoted to a
ridiculous scenario in Madison Square Garden.  Even this holidays' other
Sci Fi disappointment, Deep Impact, will prove to be vaguely more
satisfying.
Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback

"How ironic - my crusade against television has come to an end so
formulaic it could have spewed from the power book of the laziest
Hollywood hack."  --Sideshow Bob
Subscribe to my movie reviews mailing list!  Simply reply to this email
with the subject as "Subscribe:newsletter"

Author
Jamie Peck
GODZILLA
Reviewed by Jamie Peck
"Godzilla"'s creative team is that of director/co-writer Roland Emmerich 
and producer/co-writer Dean Devlin, the duo who gave us "Independence 
Day" only two years ago. I was in the small clique of those who did not 
appreciate that film (I hated it, actually), having felt that its every 
aspect was blatantly forced -- a cardboard cast of stereotyped 
personalities use a jingoistic tone to cover up a story that refuses to 
admit how infuriatingly silly it is. "Godzilla," while oh so very far 
from being a good movie, is much more grounded than "ID4"; it only 
momentarily masquerades as something it isn't. Sure, both films offer 
ineffective, one-dimensional characterization (though, judging from 
"Godzilla"'s press notes, the filmmakers would argue otherwise), but 
mostly gone here is the clunky, laughable human drama and conflict that, 
for me, sank "ID4" to a surprising low.
A plot summary is largely superfluous, but I shall proceed for those few 
of you who want to know what kind of narrative thrust this baby has. 
Matthew Broderick plays Nick Tatopoulos, a biological scientist studying 
the nuclear radiation-induced mutations of creatures great and small, 
the latter being earthworms and the former a mysterious creature that's 
swimming from Polynesia to the United States, and leaving all kinds of 
havoc in its wake. This entity, of course, turns out to be the titular 
behemoth, and Nick is hot on its trail when it decides to crash -- 
literally and figuratively -- in the Big Apple. The military, having 
never before faced such a deadly adversary, isn't very helpful. 
Complicating matters further is the presence of Nick's ex-flame, plucky 
local TV journalist Audrey (Maria Pitillo), but the last thing a movie 
like this needs is a rekindled-romance subplot. 
To be fair, however, the Nick-Audrey relationship is no less silly than 
the Jeff Goldblum-Margaret Colin one in "Independence Day"; "Godzilla"'s 
"love story" is less a glaring flaw than a minor distraction. So, 
instead of copying its predecessor's flaws to a T, it invents some new 
ones. Devlin and Emmerich play down the malevolence and up the sympathy 
in "Godzilla," so much to the point where one really wonders if the king 
of all monsters can truly be called an antagonist. Gone is the sense of 
deliberate, careless destruction that characterize this movie's Japanese 
ancestors; by "humanizing" the beast, we're torn when it comes time to 
root for somebody -- or against something. Also sorely missed is the 
sense of fascination, wonder and pseudo-credibility that Steven 
Spielberg used to distinguish his "Jurassic Park," a film that 
"Godzilla" will be inevitably compared to, from just another ride. 
Yet some strong key assets keep "Godzilla" far from being a total 
downer. The special effects (the unarguable reason that this film was 
made) are fantastic, and the movie's look -- especially in the 
helicopter chase scenes -- often works on a Tim Burton-level of dazzle. 
Some of Emmerich's action sequences, like the climactic cab ride, offer 
sudden, genuine bursts of excitement. "Godzilla" even has a notable 
sense of humor (mostly courtesy of comic co-star Hank Azaria), save for 
one running joke that's funny at first but gets old fast. The gag in 
question pokes fun at film critic deities Gene Siskel and Roger Ebert, 
allegedly because Devlin and Emmerich are not too happy about the 
negative write-ups they gave "StarGate" and "ID4." The best way to get 
revenge against reviewers for disliking your previous movies isn't to 
gibe them in your current work, guys -- it's to make sure that current 
work is a great film.

Author
Brent Goldberg
I know Godzilla. I love Godzilla. And I can tell you, THAT AIN'T GODZILLA!
An abomination to one of the icons of sci-fi history, "Godzilla" (aka Jurassic
Park 3) is another installment in a long line of merchandise-seeking films
botched by Hollywood in the greedy scramble for big $$$. Not since last
summer's "Batman & Robin" has the public been exposed to such a sham and
disgrace of a cultured figure.
Godzilla is portrayed by a T-Rex and -- in a "Gremlins" subplot -- manages to
have a horde of raptors as offspring. Of course, there is a bare thread of a
romance plot underlying the film that has the chemistry and excitement of a
Billy/Samantha storyline.
One pleasing aspect of Godzilla is the starring of Matthew "Wargames"
Broderick. I swear, this man hasn't changed a bit in 15 years! Sheesh. "Would
you like to play a nice game of chess?"
Bottom line? If you want to see more T-Rex's and Raptors running amuck in New
York, by all means see this movie.  But if you want to see a movie that has
ANYTHING at all to do with Godzilla,  go to your local video store! Hollywood
-- you have shamed yourselves yet again...
Copyright 1998 by Brent Goldberg, All Rights Reserved
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/   Now offering spam-free web-based newsreading

Author
Richard Rust
Well, the leaner meaner, lizard is out of the sewer and running across
multiplexes all over America this night.  Once again the City that Never
Sleeps, is under attack and many landmark buildings will fall, people will
become monster toe jam, military people will be flumaxed, reporters will
steal a story and love will triumph.
But the monster movie fan (MMF), the geek in the back row that doesn't
bathe often, has low social skills and can never get a date, what will the
MMF do now?
Pity the poor MMF who has waited with baited breath (fish you know,
Godzilla eats LOTS of fish) the MMF who watched Tokyo fall a dozen times
in a dozen sequels, the MMF moaned to itself as it heard in the trailers,
the clarion call Godzilla and thought, "YES!" Godzilla eats New York in
digital .cgi, YES! Dolby sound, YES lots of F/X, no more tiny TV with
black and white ads interrupting the mayhem.
But alas the poor dweeb of an MMF, walked limp from the octoplex from
hell, not limp with post adrenalin rush malaise, but instead the MMF limps
back to the halogen lit parking lot near the new WAL-MART and shoves its
commemorative opening night ticket in its pocket and sighs, a regretful
sigh.
Sadder than seeing the skyline of the Big Apple go up in fireballs, sadder
than the endless shots of Matthew Broderick's waaay too winsome face,
flicker in flashing lights, sadder still  than this waaaaay too long movie
(even at 120 minutes) even sadder than the light that fades from
Godzilla's eye in the final reel, saddest of all is that this piece of
over wrought bloated hokum is what Hollywood panders to the pasty faced
crowd sucking down their $10 popcorn and medium soda (no ice).
It wasn't a badly made movie, it probably will even do business.  It was
just such a pro forma copy.  It was just such a Jurasic Park rip off.  It
just such a all hollow, empty, joyless exercise of a movie.  
It's a movie that makes you feel sad when you leave, sad not only that you
parted with $14 bucks for two tickets, but sad that this is as good as it
gets.
The corporate Bozos(tm) who have calculators for hearts have run this dog
and pony show through its oh so predictable paces and we like the slugs
that we are stand in line, to sit in the dark and say, "oh, my!"

Author
Brian Takeshita
Over 40 years ago, a Japanese production company called Toho
introduced the Land of the Rising Sun to Gojira, a reptilian creature
of immense proportions created by mankind's nuclear testing.  Partly
flight of fancy, partly commentary on the exploitation of atomic power
and weaponry, Gojira emerged from the ocean to terrorize Tokyo.  A
year later, GOJIRA was marketed to the United States by adding three
things:  A new name, a dubbed English track, and Raymond Burr.  As
GODZILLA, the film took on the rest of the world.  Thirty years later,
Toho remade the classic film and once again took it to the American
market by adding the same three things (yes, including Raymond Burr)
and called it GODZILLA 1985.  Now it's 14 years after Toho's remake,
and director Roland Emmerich has allowed the giant lizard to make an
American first run.
In Emmerich's GODZILLA, Matthew Broderick plays Dr. Niko Tatopoulos, a
biologist who is called in to join other scientists in the South
Pacific already studying the existence of a radiation-induced super
mutant which leaves footprints the size of livingrooms.  When the
mutant reptile suddenly appears out of the Hudson River, Tatopoulos
and the rest of the team relocate themselves back to the States.
Meanwhile, Tatopoulos's college girlfriend, Audrey Timmonds (Maria
Pitillo), works in New York City as an assistant to a big-time news
reporter.  She'd like to be a reporter herself, and when Godzilla
comes ashore, she figures this is her big break.  Of course, with the
big guy running amok in the city, Niko and Audrey are bound to cross
paths, and are joined by Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria),
Audrey's trusty cameraman friend, and Phillipe Roche (Jean Reno), an
operative for the French government, whose nuclear testing started the
whole problem in the first place.  Together they attempt to find and
destroy the surprisingly elusive Godzilla.
With the resources of the most cutting edge special effects houses and
the clout of one of the nation's premiere movie production companies,
one would think Emmerich could make a film truly deserving of the name
GODZILLA.  He didn't.  Right up there with THE LOST WORLD, GODZILLA is
one of the biggest disappointments in recent cinematic history.
The plot is pretty much what we expect:  The big dinosaur-like
creature comes out of the water and starts smashing New York City, and
it's up to our heroes to figure out why this thing is on its rampage
and how it can be stopped, while the military makes futile attempts to
bring the creature down.  The script, however, is painfully bad.  It's
fraught with lines so corny, they don't even belong in B-movies, and
includes many character actions which make you think, "You idiot," or
"You stupid girl."
I suppose when you've got a movie with a giant lizard loose in New
York, any other semblance of reality goes out the window as well.  Why
is it that Godzilla topples some buildings by merely brushing against
them, but is conveniently able to leap atop others?  Why do
helicopters have to follow Godzilla by flying dangerously between
buildings where they can lose sight of him, when they could more
easily keep track of him by flying a little higher and in a straight
line?  Why do sidewinder missiles, which have small explosive
warheads, blow up entire buildings when they miss Godzilla?  Why is a
mission to bomb Madison Square Garden carried out by three F-18
fighter-bombers, when flights of such aircraft are always comprised of
multiples of two?  Okay, maybe the last one was a bit nit-picky, but
hey, I was on a roll.
Broderick is usually a good actor, but in this film he's weighed down
by an unexciting character and an atrocious screenplay which seem to
fight against him every step of the way.  Hank Azaria does what he
can, but don't expect to see development of any of the promise he
showed in THE BIRDCAGE.  Like Broderick's, Azaria's character is quite
simply lacking in color.  What really annoyed me was Maria Pitillo,
who actually takes the bad script and makes it worse with her acting.
Casting must have been asleep on this one.
The one bright spot here is Jean Reno, who oddly enough seems to fit
well into a role which is often comedic, quite unlike what we've seem
him do in the past.  Although his character is contradictory to the
unfolding disaster, Reno brings a style to the role of Phillipe which
makes him enjoyable.  Unfortunately, the same cannot be said of the
other incongruities.
The entire feel of the movie is tongue-in-cheek, and seems to pay
comical homage to a dozen or so films that have come before it.  This
results in a significant amount of parody, which contrasts sharply
with the threat of the monster, and ends up just producing a mess.
Most of the characters seem to be there for comic relief, and almost
none are smart enough for the audience to take seriously.  Although
Emmerich obviously wanted to make a fun action picture, what good is
it to sink millions into a CGI creature whose ferocity is undermined
by the humans he threatens?  If we can't take the characters
seriously, the threat they face is an empty one because we simply
don't care what happens to them.
GODZILLA simply pulls too many punches in its attempt to be a film
more light-hearted than it should be.  Far be it from me to want to
see more carnage in the theaters, but here's a behemoth running
through the city!  There's bound to be a lot of casualties, but
instead  GODZILLA is afflicted with the after-school G.I. Joe cartoon
syndrome, where almost everyone seems to get out of harm's way just in
time.  In a couple of scenes, Godzilla briefly breathes fire.  None of
the characters even remark upon this ability, nor is it used to any
particular advantage by the filmmakers.  It's as if the special
effects people just wanted to show that yes, Godzilla can do this,
just like in the old movie.  Consider another punch pulled.  Through
creative script writing, you can make a sequel out of just about any
movie, but the final scene in this one doesn't just leave the door
open, it opens into a hallway leading directly into a room where
GODZILLA II is waiting patiently.  It made me want to gag.
Emmerich should have done away with 90% of the humor and in-jokes and
played this one as a straight action film.  With an intelligently
written screenplay, GODZILLA could have been so much more.  However,
by confusing the viewer with a ton of add-ins and parodies, the movie
ends up being something that just doesn't work.  Now if they only had
Raymond Burr....

Author
Chris T. Dias
STARRING: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo,
Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer
WRITTEN BY: Dean Devlin & Roland Emmerich
DIRECTED BY: Roland Emmerich
 There are two things I realized that are different with this
Godzilla...let's get it out right now.  No Firebreath is one thing.
This could prove very useful to those pesky helicopters.  The other is
his legs, not erect like a man's but more like a chicken's.  Because
of that, he walks sloped over, unlike the man-in-the-rubber-suit of
the original films.
 So...let us begin with Godzilla.  After a very clever introduction, a
Japanese fisher gets sliced in half.  Then reports from the
Philippines point that a creature took a troll across an island and
dove back into the water.  The military soon calls upon the
government's top nuclear research agent to investigate the strange
residue left behind the creature's imprints.  This is where Nick
Tatopoulos (which no one-can pronounce), no doubt named after the man
who designed the new creature, Patrick Tatopoulos, enters.  He
believes this creature has mutated from a previous reptilian species
by fallout from a French nuclear testing site nearby.  This mutation
soon destroys a trio of fishing boats.  The path points towards a
destination: The city that never sleeps...
 Okay, Manhattan for those not paying attention to the trailers.
 The creature jumps the pier and rides into the island, causing mayhem
and grief for all, including its Mayor, Ebert.  Okay...first of all,
he looks like the guy (played by Lerner).  He has that goofy "thumbs
up" slogan, PLUS his aid is named Gene...the whole joke is as subtle
as a 2x4 in the face...let's move on.
 In an amazingly short time, all of Manhattan is evacuated.  Even the
death count here seems very minor and virtually no one is seen on
screen getting killed but we are assuming some get stomped.  Course,
the media jumps on it...A cameraman, nicknamed "Animal" (Azaria in a
scene stealing performance) gets a shot and fear spreads quickly.  By
nightfall, all of Manhattan is more or less clear.  Now, I don't care
but if they could do that, call up those Deep Impact people, you would
probably save a lot more in that movie.
 Night--and the place is deserted--a fantastic battleground for a ten
story tall monster...without firebreath.  Another figure trying to
cash in the popularity is Audrey Timmonds (Pitillo).  She happens to
be an ex girlfriend of Nick.  She meets up with him in the military
quarantine and steals his information for a story break, which is then
promptly stolen by Audrey's mean boss, Charles Caimen
(Shearer...that's two from the Simpsons...Azaria being the other one).
She is bummed, and very depressed since Nick lost his job with the
military because of the leaked story.  Out on his luck, he moves to
leave town, but is kidnapped by the enigmatic Phillippe Roche (Reno as
great as ever).  Roche is a man who claims to be from the insurance
company when he first appears but is eventually revealed to be from
the French Secret Service, trying to clean up the mess his country
began.
 He believes Nick's latest finding, a finding that the US military
doesn't endorse: That this creature (named Godzilla for the totally
inept) was born, and currently is, pregnant.  Perfect, above all
things, this creature is a tribble as well.  They decide to venture
forth into the deserted Manhattan to locate the Lizard's nest.
Course, as Nick and Phillipe sneak back into town, A pesky reporter
and her freaky reporter follow them in...
 Did I mention there was a big lizard In this movie...Oh yes, and the
army sends everything they got against this thing...That includes
seemingly a hundred attack choppers, jets, submarines, tanks and lots
of expendable soldiers with machine guns.  All they have to believe in
is what Arnold said once in a movie, "If it bleeds, we can kill it."
 Its just too bad they couldn't get access to the Z-1000 Attack
Hovercraft from Godzilla 1985.  Could have taken care of this creature
early.
   I loved the opening of this film.  It was craftily made with
cleaver old fashion photography of French nuclear testing under the
observing eye of some Iguanas.  It then moves into introducing its
characters, some of the best the Devlin / Emmerich have made.  The
film doesn't focus on four or five groups, just one.  Unfortunately,
they can't seem to put that much skill into writing that one plot.
When the film discusses the creature, the town, or the major plot
points to resolve problems, the film works well.  However when the
film lowers itself to discussing the personal problems of its
characters, the films stalls.  I mean who cares.  The writing is so
immature when dealing with the romance of two characters as a ten
story tall creature destroys New York.
 I felt that Timmonds and Tatopolous to be very boring.  Just get back
to the action.  I wasn't interested in Sam Neil's relationship with
Laura Dern in Jurassic Park.  Who cares?  The other characters are
great.  I love Reno's character and Azaria steals his scenes.  They
make sense and if the film concentrated on them reacting rather than
dealing with their personal lives, the film would work a lot
better....  But when the action starts, it totally powers the simple
script.
 The first appearance of the creature is simple.  I must admit, I miss
the erect rubber suit creature.  This new one looks too much like an
oversized raptor...and thus spawns the only real problem with e
action.  The film has some great scenes as choppers race down the fast
moving Godzilla through the streets at night.  And there are some
submarine sequences that really caught my eye.  And the climax is to
die for, but near the end of the film, as the group searches for the
rest, there are some sequences that seem taken right out of Jurassic
Park.  I have seen these before and didn't really care to see them
again.  We only care about the big destruction, and I am happy to say
the film delivers, kudos to the advertising campaign that kept so many
scenes out of the commercials.  It left so much more to see.  I really
enjoyed this thrill ride of a film.
 Is it better than ID4?  I have to say yes.  It is not as funny
(because of the lack of Will Smith) but the action is much more
exciting with more screams and yelps from the audience.  I found
myself following along the fun and clapping at the destruction of the
town.  Godzilla was an exciting film and worth seeing twice, just as
long as you don't mind the petty love story...and no
firebreath...jeez...
DEMOGRAPHIC: Godzilla has very little onscreen violence but there is
wall to wall destruction.  People get crushed but you don't seem them
after.  There is not hefty violence beyond that.  Honestly, Godzilla
has probably the lowest body count of all the creature flicks of the
same name.  In those films, the town is not luckily deserted when the
mayhem begins...I still think that is very peculiar...
-- --- Chris T. Dias --- "The man who runs with scissors."

Author
Jeff Pidgeon
a review by Jeff ("spoilers") Pidgeon
        If you've never seen "Close Encounters of the Third Kind", "Jaws",
"Jurassic Park", "Aliens" or "The Professional", you might be find the latest
remake of "Godzilla" tolerable.  For me, Roland ("ID4") Emmerich and Dean Dev-
lin's latest super-production was yet another patchwork quilt of lifted shots
and scenes from several other films.  One might expect a certain amount of
old familiar feelings -- this is after all, a remake; but it's mostly that 
and only that; a huge bundle of predictable moments delivered with plenty of
carnage but not much excitement.
        It starts out promisingly -- creepy titles of video nuclear testing
footage all shot in a nasty toxic yellow color over David Arnold's ominous
score (the credits grow as we watch them) -- but almost from the moment the 
film gets underway (with an attack on a Japanese fishing trawler), everything
feels trumped-up and cloned, as if the sole motivation for the film was to
out-do every other film in existence: "Oh, so the shark in 'Jaws' attacks a
little boat?" "Well, we'll have Godzilla attack a BIG boat!" "The shark drags
one boat around?" "We'll have our beastie drag THREE!!" "Terrific!!"  A couple
of these Spielberg-esque attacks, and we're on our way.  Using this "Close 
Encounters" technique of hiding The Big Surprise from view for the first
half hour or so works well when you're not really sure what you're going to
get at the end (i.e. little ships and -- whoa! -- the mothership!), but here,
since we do know, it mostly builds impatience to see The Monster in The City.
        Like "ID4", "Godzilla" has a number of plots running at once: Nick
Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) tries to save New York from getting completely
squashed while seeing if he really is still estranged from his one-time
-fiancee/aspiring reporter Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo, who plays one of 
those characters that you frequently pray will get stepped on or eaten). 
Audrey is trying to decide between Love and Her Career, having stolen a video-
tape of Godzilla's exposition and leaked it to the press.  Animal (Hank Azar-
ia) and Lucy (Arabella Field) seem to exist to round out a "Twister"-esque
band of characters with cartoonish Noo Yawk accents thrown in for flavor.
Philippe Roche (Jean Reno) plays a sinister member of the French secret ser-
vice who at first works against, then alongside our main characters to defeat
the creature.  Apparently, French atomic tests were responsible for the darn 
thing, and they want to cover it up.  Good luck convincing everybody that 
those crushed buildings were just swamp gas, guys!  New York mayor Roger Ebert
(Michael Lerner) -- yes, he has a balding assistant named Gene and they fight
all the time -- butts heads with the the Main Army Guy (Kevin Dunn) and with
Nick over whether or not Godzilla is actually Goddess-zilla, or Godzillette;
are eggs being laid somewhere on Manhattan?  Of course!
        We're even nudged to empathize -- her rampage is actually just Mommy
trying to raise her vicious, blood-thirsty little chicks in peace.  Aww!
Sorry folks, I thought they should have soaked that whole "Lost World" island
in nerve gas.  I mean, these aren't spotted owls we're talking about here --
these are HUGE, CARNIVOROUS MONSTERS THAT BREATHE RADIOACTIVE FIRE!  Kong and
Frankenstein clearly weren't violent unless provoked, and they were certainly
happy left in their own territory.  They didn't go building nests in Madison
Square Garden!  Sorry!  No sympathy!
        This is spectacle on such a grand scale that the quality is stretched
pretty thin.  Most of the technical work in the film remains firmly in the 
middle ground -- not pie-plate awful, nor ground-breaking innovation.  Most
of "Godzilla"'s effect's work feels at best uninspired and at worst rushed to
completion.  Much like "Lost In Space", the overall effect that the filmmakers
seem to be reaching for is a benumbed awe rather than any sort of suspenseful
rhythm or build.
        To be fair, a couple of the effects sequences are built on entertain-
ing ideas -- Godzillette isn't invulnerable in this film, she's just really
fast -- fast enough to evade surface-to-air missiles and underwater torpedoes
(Whether you want to buy this is another thing, but it makes for a nice vari-
ation, as opposed to the our-weapons-don't-seem-to-hurt-it stuff).  I liked 
the way the fire-breathing was suggested rather than blatant, and the cab 
chase in Manhattan (culminating on the Brooklyn Bridge) caught my eye as de-
cent spectacle.  Vicki Lewis plays a cute scientist that I was hoping to see
more of, but was squashed beneath the wheels of the central romance. 
        Most of these moments, though, are glints on a two-hour-plus stretch
of asphalt.  The film's sense of humor falls flat the vast majority of the 
time, and its attempts to connect you with its characters induce wincing.  
Most of my friends who are Godzilla fans say that it isn't a Godzilla movie.
Others say it's more of a remake of "The Beast From 20,000 Fathoms" than "God-
zilla".  Not being all that familiar with those films, I can't say.  But 
there's a lot of books I would recommend you start reading with those two 
hours that you'll save by not seeing "Godzilla".  Not Recommended.

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: A decent screenplay does matter.
The most depressing thing about GODZILLA, the over-touted Dean Devlin/Roland
Emmerich remake of the rubber-monster classic, is how little it exploits its
own resources. It's itching with possibilities that never get used. The
problem is, I have to review what's on the screen -- a noisy, witless, tame,
lame, underwritten story that bulks overlong and features disturbingly
inconsistent visuals. It's moderately entertaining, but God help you if you
start realizing how thin it is while it's still on screen.
The movie's opening credits are inventive, giving us lizard eggs that are
witnesses to various nuclear tests. But it doesn't develop that kind of
cleverness elsewhere: we get not one but two teams of trawlers dragged down
into the ocean, in sequences that are at first uninvolving and then
ultimately repetitive. Then there is the creature itself, which veers
between very convincing, sort of convincing, and ridiculously unconvincing
-- not just in terms of what it can or can't do, but in how it's presented.
The effects people also play dirty pool with parallax and perspective a lot:
when the thing needs to be closer, it's closer; when it needs to be a long
way off, poof! it's on the other side of town. Idiotic. (When it dives into
the Hudson, for instance, it makes a splash about the size of someone
throwing a van into the water.)
We don't have a lot to play with in the character department, either. Nick
Tatapulous (played by Matthew Broderick, who looks about as Greek as I do
Chinese) is a researcher into animal mutations caused by radioactive wastes,
and when we first see him he's jamming electrodes into contaminated
Chernobyl soil to get worms to come to the surface. Cute. He gets tapped on
the shoulder to help determine what's been causing all of these ships to
vanish, and puts the pieces together so quickly I can only assume he snuck a
peek at the script. Couldn't he have let the rest of the cast in on it, too?
Broderick is joined by a bevy of other actors -- most of them not given
anything substantial to do. Jean Reno is the best of the bunch, playing an
insurance investigator who has his own agenda. He is smart and canny and
resourceful, and we like him instinctively. His funniest, best moment has
him giving sticks of gum to a gaggle of fake Army troops to make them look
more "American", and we buy it. He deserves his own movie.
There's also Hank Azaria's cameraman character, Animal, who starts off
promisingly but winds up getting used merely for mugging and reaction shots;
more wasted potential. But the biggest waste is Michael Learner as Mayor
Ebert, in a role that serves no purpose except to slow the story down and
give a vehicle for the filmmakers to take cheap shots at two film critics
they don't like. The first time was funny; by the seventh or eighth, I was
too exhausted to wince.
I mentioned the worms and the chewing gum. Funny how the movie can cough up
neat little asides like that to flesh out what is basically a lame story --
in other words, at no time did anyone try to apply the same kind of manic
spirit to the movie AS A WHOLE. 
Why didn't we have the mayor, for instance, turn out to be a former head of
the transportation department who knows the subways intimately, which would
give him a reason to exist (and would give them something else to film other
than all those soldiers crawling around down there and acting like idiots)?
Why didn't they take Animal and the stupidly conceived female journalist
character and fuse them into a more interesting composite (since there's
nothing they do that couldn't be handled more economically and interestingly
by one full-fledged person)? Why didn't they make Godzilla's death(s) more
creative -- by having him, say, knock a building over onto himself and break
his own neck? I could go on, but you get the idea. And this was nothing but
stuff people were tossing out on the way home in the car.
For a two-hour-twenty-minute running time, they stretch and huff and puff
and find an incredible number of ways to justify the length. And in the end,
I asked myself if I'd had fun, and all I could think about was how the
massively expensive soundtrack had given me a toothache out of sheer volume.
FOOTNOTE: Over the closing credits, we get an industrial-rap remix of Led
Zeppelin's "Kashmir". Fitting irony, since Page and Plant's publishing
company was called, after all, Superhype.

Author
David Thiel
One of the things that bothered me about early fanboy criticism of the 
American GODZILLA film was how everyone was worried that the new beast 
wouldn't be strictly canonical. I couldn't understand this, considering what 
*is* canonical within the official Toho monster series. In various movies 
Godzilla has flown, talked, magnetized his body and slid on his tail like a 
baseball runner. And the Big G's appearance had changed quite a bit from film 
to film. So, I thought, he's redesigned--so what? 
For me, part of the problem with this Godzilla film was that the producers 
weren't really interested in making a Godzilla film. They were worried about 
the potential for camp and cheese, and had to be cajoled into the project. 
And it shows. 
Aside from the familiar roar, there's very little about this new creature 
that suggests Godzilla any more than it does any number of other cinematic 
dinosaurs--Gorgo, Gappa, Yongary or the Beast from 20,000 Fathoms. He's 
basically an oversized JURASSIC PARK T-Rex with spines. Not only has his 
appearance radically changed, but so has his personality and behavior. It's 
like making a Superman film in which the Man of Steel has a new costume, 
teleports instead of flying, comes from the Earth's core rather than the 
planet Krypton and has a girlfriend named Trixie. My wife (who is not 
 a Godzilla fan) felt that this new version lacked the charm of 
the Japanese character, and said "he's just a big lizard."
In a way, this Godzilla is a bit pathetic. He's only come to town to lay his 
eggs, and couldn't care less about those pesky humans. In return, he's hunted 
hither and yon, his children are slaughtered, and he's gutted by a handful of 
missiles. Unlike his Japanese cousin, he doesn't even get to escape to the sea 
and return another day. Poor guy.
Obviously, one doesn't come to this sort of movie expecting much in the way 
of plot or characterization, but these seem thin even by summer "popcorn" 
movie standards. INDEPENDENCE DAY (the other sci-fi blockbuster by this 
production team of Devlin and Emmerich) had a similar running time, but didn't 
seem to drag the way this one does between attacks. That film's characters 
weren't quite three-dimensional, but they were generally fun to watch. 
Instead, GODZILLA offers the perpetually young Matthew Broderick as a 
scientist who isn't quirky enough to be engaging, or charming enough to be a 
romantic figure. Furthermore, he's saddled with a reporter wanna-be girlfriend 
(Maria Pitillo) who seems to be busing in from a completely different 
film--perhaps a romantic comedy in which she'd be the one who loses her 
fiancee to Julia Roberts. And then there's the wacky French Secret Service 
agent...huh? This is a Godzilla film?
Aside from the scenes of mass destruction, the story centers around 
Broderick's relationship with his ex-girlfriend, who is concerned that she 
doesn't have what it takes to be a big-shot TV reporter. Who cares? 
INDEPENDENCE DAY had its share of romantic sub-plots, but didn't get bogged 
down in whether Will Smith would become a space shuttle pilot. Bring on the 
lizard!
There's a twist thrown in about Godzilla being pregnant, and the Powers That 
Be (including a mayor who is an unflattering caricature of film critic Roger 
Ebert) being too pigheaded to heed Broderick's warning to look for the nest. A 
lot of JURASSIC PARK-style "raptor hunt" action ensues, which is exciting 
enough, but again seems to belong to a different film.
Of course, it's not all bad. If you ignore the fact that this is supposed to 
be Godzilla, and treat it as a generic monster-on-the-loose movie, it's 
pretty spectacular. Whereas Japanese special effects technology hasn't 
improved much since the 60's (check out the new VHS releases of the 90's 
versions of GODZILLA VS. KING GHIDORAH and GODZILLA VS. MOTHRA to see what I 
mean), this GODZILLA takes full advantage of advances in CGI to create a 
convincing portrayal of mass destruction, including some dizzying chase 
scenes through the streets of Manhattan.
It's generally entertaining enough, and I felt that I got six bucks' worth of 
movie. But I never got chills up my spine, and I was never really concerned 
for the safety of the main characters. As for Godzilla himself, I wanted to 
say, "I've met Godzilla, and believe me, you're no Godzilla."
David Thiel / Champaign, Illinois
E-mail: d-thiel@uiuc.edu
WWW: http://www.geocities.com/Area51/Cavern/3227

Author
Chuck Dowling
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Hank Azaria, Jean Reno, Kevin Dunn, Harry
Shearer, Michael Lerner, Maria Petillo,Vicki Lewis, Doug Savant
Written by: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Directed by: Roland Emmerich
Running Time: 139 minutes
In contrast to almost every other film critic, I'm a big fan of the
summer movie season. I like the kinds of movies it produces: big,
dumb, action movies with lots of special effects. Also in contrast to
other critics, I am a big fan of Independence Day, the previous effort
from Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich. So, how could Godzilla be bad? A
big dumb summer effects fest from Devlin and Emmerich? How could that
go wrong? Sadly it does, in many, many ways.
I wish you could have seen my face during the course of the film. If
you could time-lapse such a thing, you'd see my expression change from
gleeful anticipation to virtual shock and outrage. Could my jaw have
dropped any lower based on the idiocy being presented on screen? No.
You can make almost any premise seem plausible by film's end, no
matter how ridiculous it sounds. Back to the Future for example, is
100% absurd but is executed flawlessly. I feel the same way about
ID4. Silly, but the execution pulls it off. Godzilla however, is
presented with about as little credibility as possible.
As far as Godzilla's new look goes: is it as good as the original
Godzilla? No, not even close. But it's probably more accurate, looking
and moving more like a giant lizard than a guy walking upright in a
rubber suit. Was it worth waiting a year to see? No, not really. But
overall the special effects are nothing short of outstanding, and they
(along with the film's soundtrack) are the film's only redeeming
qualities.
Godzilla's main problem (aside from the fact that it directly rips off
Steven Spielberg's Jurassic Park and The Lost World countless times)
is it's tone. The old Godzilla films were pure camp, so the new film
needed to do either one of two things: also be pure camp, or treat
this matter seriously. Amazingly, it does neither. It sits right on
the border between the two, unable to make up it's mind. It's too
silly to be taken seriously, but too serious to be taken
lightheartedly. I mean, a giant monster makes it's way to New York
City and begins destroying everything. Who's in charge of the military
operation to stop it? A colonel (Kevin Dunn). No five star generals
anywhere in sight, just a colonel in charge of the most inept group of
fighting men our country has ever assembled. In charge of the
operation out in the field?  A stammering, sweaty, nervous idiot
soldier (Doug Savant) who has no business being in charge of a
military washroom, let alone a mission to destroy Godzilla.
Then there's Matthew Broderick. Now I like Broderick, and was really
looking forward to that tried and true "Broderick schtick". You know
what that is, it's when Broderick's is placed in an odd situation and
he constantly doesn't understand what's going on. There is some of
that here, but Broderick plays his character way too broadly, with
wild eyes and cartoonishly bad facial expressions and dialogue. And
going along with the idiot logic, the U.S. military specifically seeks
out Broderick for his expertice, yet fails to follow any of the advice
he gives them.
The most annoying part of the film though is two needless characters
who serve no purpose except to take shots at two well known film
critics, Gene Siskel and Roger Ebert. Michael Lerner plays "Mayor
Ebert", the mayor of New York and yes, he looks exactly like Roger
Ebert. He's running for re-election, and his campaign slogan is
"Thumbs Up for Mayor Ebert". To make matters worse, he has an
associate named "Gene" who looks just like Gene Siskel. For some
reason though, "Gene" is made out to be Mayor Ebert's little kiss-ass
of sorts, telling him at times to just calm down and enjoy some
candy. It's embarrassingly bad writing like this that helps destroy
"Godzilla". Lots of screen time wasted.
Godzilla is sure to be a bit hit (probably THE big hit of the summer),
thanks to a great year-long marketing campaign which never revealed
the appearance of the new Godzilla creature. I sure wish I could
pursuade you not to go though. But millions of you will, and then
you'll see for yourself. [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Author
Toby Donaldson
Big, loud, and stupid: that about sum up Godzilla, a summer B-movie
with A+ special effects. The point in seeing this movie is to see
Godzilla destroy New York, eat some helicopters, and evade an army of
heavily armed Keystone Kommandos.
If you expect more than that, then you're probably not going to like
this movie. For starters, the acting and dialog is generally quite
poor. Matthew Broderick is abominable as the scientist who figures out
what makes Godzilla tick.  He looks kind of sleepy throughout, and
except for a little bit of comic relief, has all the personality of a
stick. His romantic interest is a little more charming, but not so
charming as to make the idea of the two of them being squished
mid-kiss under the big green foot of Godzilla any less appealing. Some
of the secondary characters are a little more interesting, but nothing
special.
Whenever Godzilla is on the screen, the movie is quite
entertaining. Unlike the lumbering, irritated, and angry Godzilla of
Japanese monster movies, this Godzilla is more like an inflated
lizard, possessing remarkable stop-and-turn-on-a-dime agility, and the
nimbleness to hop over and through buildings. He is quite speedy, and
it's fun to see him barreling around the streets of New York,
out-pacing the attack helicopters sent to do him in.
While the original Godzilla was the Frankenstein monster of the
nuclear age, there is no attempt to make any moral or symbolic
connections in this story. The modern Godzilla is the product of
French atomic tests, and swims across the world to lay eggs (thanks to
the miracle of asexual reproduction) in New York. The movie suggests
that reptiles often travel great distances to lay their eggs, and so
their is no arguing with the movie-logic that, since he's just an
extra big lizard, Godzilla would swim the extra-far distance to New
York to lay its eggs. Thus, Godzilla's rampage through New York is
really just misunderstood maternalism, and all the destruction is 
what you would expect of any giant lizard frightened and lost in
downtown New York at night. There does not seem to be much reason for
this change in the Godzilla story, other than, perhaps, to steer clear
of more horror-style themes that might lessen its mainstream appeal?
As mentioned, the one twist on the whole Godzilla theme is the
introduction of eggs that hatch into nine-foot tall baby
Godzillas. This is not so much a new idea as a ``borrowing'' of the
velociraptors from Jurassic Park. The movie could probably have cut
the baby Godzillas with little harm to the overall plot (indeed,
probably *any* 20 minute segment of this movie could have been chopped
out with little noticeable effect), and certainly little harm to the
overall entertainment value. There's no doubt that one big Godzilla is
better than 200 small Godzillas, who hardly destroy anything, but
instead just meander around, eat popcorn, and look for fish.
The plotting, as you may have guessed, is none too tight. Not many
parts of this movie hold up under scrutiny, and you are setting
yourself up for a big disappointment if you go see this movie prepared
to think your way through it. Apparently, including advertising, this
movie cost about three-hundred million dollars to make. I wonder how
much they spent on the writing?  In fact, I wonder if they ever
considered getting, say, a writer, to write the script? The screenplay
was penned by the director and the producer (Roland Emmerlich and Dean
Devlin), so hiring a writer might never have crossed their
minds. Whoever talked them out of also doing the special effects
themselves should be congratulated.
Whether or not you like this movies is probably going to depend on
whether or not you think the scenes with Godzilla are enough to make
the movie worthwhile. What nobody wants is for you to go see this
movie, then come back in a huff and write a review complaining about
the bad plot, dialog, and acting --- that would be like going to the
opera and complaining about too much singing. Instead, you should go
to this expecting nothing more than seeing New York pulverized by the
king of the monsters. You might still come out disappointed, but at
least you started out in the right frame of mind.

Author
Bill Chambers
GODZILLA (1998) ZERO STARS (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (wchamber@netcom.ca)
(Ugh. This is becoming so routine... Just visit my damn website, FILM
FREAK CENTRAL.
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Set/7504
Send me some hate mail, recommend a movie, read the journals...just
have as good a time as you can there.)
starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, Godzilla
screenplay by Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
directed by Roland Emmerich
The team of Emmerich and Devlin scored a giant b.o. hit last time out
with their alien picture, Independence Day.  That film was critically
dissed largely because of their use of stereotyping and clichees to
define an ensemble of characters: we knew who the smart guy was
because he wore glasses and a pocket-protector; who the gay guy was
because he ran around squealing like a panzie for his mother; who the
hero was because he promised to "whoop E.T.'s ass". This time out,
Devlin and Emmerich have solved the problem by making no attempts
whatsoever to define their ensemble of characters. Not only is New
York City a shambles when Godzilla is through with it, so is the film,
a disaster-picture in every sense of the word. This may be the most
uncompelling summer movie contender in the history of the sport.
I'm going to give away the plot of this movie with relish, for all the
security surrounding this non-story before the May 20th release was
non-sensical, to say the least. To say the most, it was merely an
attempt to keep the publicity machine well-oiled: on-screen sponsor
Fruit-of-the-Loom is entangled in a breach of contract lawsuit after
revealing early sketches of Godzilla on the Internet. How about suing
Steven Spielberg for revealing the new monster's design in his
Jurassic Park films? For Godzilla, like the movie itself, is a most
derivative creation.
The movie begins with Broderick driving out into an open field at
Chernobyl to examine some mutated earthworms.  Then a helicopter
inexplicably lands before him, and stiffs in suits exit the chopper
and announce to him that his years of earthworm research have ended:
he has been reassigned to investigate giant footprints. Broderick
deduces that the footprints belong to a Polynesian lizard that has
grown to an enormous size because of "years of French Polynesia
nuclear testing". His hypotheses - which also include that the beast
is the first of its kind, and that it is pregnant (he deduces that one
with the aid of an over-the-counter home pregnancy kit) - eventually
prove accurate.  For reasons never explained, asexual Godzilla wishes
to lay his eggs in "The City That Never Sleeps" (that's how New
York City is billed!). So he does, in Madison Square Gardens, but only
after crushing a lot of taxi cabs - NO MENTION OF HUMAN CASUALTIES IS
MADE. So Broderick, his stupid ex-girlfriend (Pitillo), a
French-Polynesian top secret agent guy (Reno--the most enjoyable human
presence here), and a ballsy cameraman (Azaria) team up to get trapped
in Madison Square Gardens.
The filmmakers' idea of genuine comic relief is to name the mayor
Ebert (rotund Michael Lerner) and have his advisor, Gene (haha),
always slap Ebert's hand away from food. Oh, look, a fat guy wants
food. The filmmakers' idea of a plot development is to have said
stupid girlfriend - who is also an aspiring anchor beauty - discover a
top secret videotape with footage of a frightened Japanese man
repeating "Gojira...Gojira..." She knows this is a top secret tape
because it is labeled such, "Top Secret", and she seems to know how
bottom-of-the-barrel her news program is because they take the bait
and air the snippet as a top story. Then Ebert wants more food! Said
broadcast winds up getting Broderick fired, so he and Pitillo have a
fight, and break up again. Who cares? Until the night before, they
hadn't seen each other for EIGHT YEARS. And when they met up again, it
was only to EXCHANGE THE WORST WRITTEN EX-LOVER TO EX-LOVER DIALOGUE
THE SCREEN HAS POSSIBLY EVER KNOWN. To quote Ebert - the critic, not
the mayor (by the way, during the two times I met the man, he was not
eating) - in his review of North, I hate, hate, hate, hate, hate this
movie. GODZILLA is an entirely charmless 139 MINUTES(!), unlike the
Japanese counterparts which inspired it. Boring as hell, seemingly
edited with a machete and some Scotch tape, weighted by a screenplay
that makes Titanic's read like Edward Albee, GODZILLA is the worst
cinematic experience I've had in years. Flamers, take note: I am not
demanding hyperrealism from a movie about a giant lizard, nor am I
requesting good dialogue, even. I'm asking for entertainment, pure and
simple: for the reported $130 million budget, I want to mainline
unadulterated summer movie fun. Not even the effects held my interest
- they turn to digital mush in too many spots.
If this is reading a little too much like one of Harry Knowles'
Ain't-It-Cool caveman test-screening reviews, my apologies. It isn't
too often a movie sparks a fire in me like GODZILLA, a steady, burning
rage. Independence Day was a terrible movie, but terribly
fun. GODZILLA's cinematogrpohy and production design can't even match
the pastel appeal of ID4's images: almost every shot is a rain-soaked
bore. (Ladies and gentlemen, let's officially seal that moratorium on
homages to Blade Runner.) Perhaps I can't fully convey why I despised
this movie so much without slipping into incoherence, but it looks
like I may not be alone in my camp: despite months of hype, the
weekend late show of GODZILLA at a brand new multiplex saw an audience
of half-capacity. If we're lucky, Godzilla's damage won't end at the
credits: it will put an end to bloated, scriptless event pictures for
a good long while.

Author
Chad Polenz
Chad'z rating: **1/2 (out of 4 = okay/average)
1998, PG-13, 138 minutes [2 hours, 18 minutes]
Starring: Matthew Broderick (Nick Tatopoulos), Jean Reno (Philippe Roche) Hank
Azaria (Victor "Animal" Palotti), Maria Pitillo (Audrey Timmonds); written by
Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich, produced by Dean Devlin, directed by Roland
Emmerich, based on a character created by Toho Co. Ltd.
Seen May 20, 1998 at 7:15 p.m. at Rotterdam Square Mall Cinemas (Rotterdam,
NY), theater #5, with my brother John for free using my Loews/Sony critic's
pass. [Theater rating: ***: very good picture and sound, average seats]
        For most filmmakers the task of turning aged and simple concepts into
something original would prove difficult. However, the creative team of
writer/director Roland Emmerich and writer/producer Dean Devlin are not
discouraged by such obstacles as they have made some rather successful films
because of their attitude. Even with "Godzilla," a complete Hollywood movie
machine, they at least show a sense of craftsmanship. But craft in the midst
of limitation doesn't make up for lack of idea and form.
        Considering the film's premise it comes as no surprise that little attention
is paid to detail and plausibility, and this unapologetic notion is clear from
the first frame. The opening scene depicts a Japanese fishing boat being
attacked by a mysterious creature, which serves no purpose other than to add a
bit of superstition when the lone survivor believes it was a mythological
figure come to life. 
        For every superstition there's a "logical" explanation which is provided
through our "main" character (the character with the most screen time, that
is) Nick Tatopoulos (Broderick), a young American scientist who has been
studying the effects of nuclear radiation on nature. He's the closest-there-
is-to-an-expert the military tend to call in to investigate wacky situations
in films such as this. After seeing damage done by the huge, unseen creature
in the French Polynesian islands, he theorizes, with total logic, that it must
be a mutation caused by all the nuclear testing done there many years ago.
        It's clear the film doesn't want to waste time on reality and thus the
attempt to establish plausability (the most minimal amount necessary) comes
across as a half-assed effort. Supporting characters and shady sup-plots are
introduced, but as is the case with films made up of a large cast of
characters, only a handful have any real significance. Here, the characters of
the sort include Nick's ex-girlfriend Audrey Timmonds (Pitillo), a meek
research journalist who hopes to one day be a real reporter like her arrogant
boss (played by Harry Shearer in full cartoon form). Also lending support is
Audrey's friend, cameraman Victor "Animal" Palotti (Azaria), who functions
mostly as comic relief. Then there's the mysterious Philippe Roche (Reno), a
secret service agent for France who will take things into his own hands when
need be. The way the characters are eventually thrown together is typical, and
for the most part it works since the film doesn't concentrate too hard on
detail.
        This is a summer blockbuster movie and it exists for action and special
effects, not wholesome storytelling. The first act works as quickly as
possible to plug in the characters, plot devices, sub-plots, and general
details. It doesn't take long for Godzilla to emerge in full form and reign
terror on New York City. Surprisingly, the initial sense of panic and hysteria
is quite exciting due mostly to the effects and the fast direction. It's eye
candy all right and it's certainly tempting, but the taste doesn't last long
enough. 
        Even though action often overwhelms the story, there is still an effort on
behalf of the screenplay to give the film some intelligence. Many sub-plots
crop up involving the characters and how they relate to defeating Godzilla and
an entirely separate plot involving a possible nest which no one but the
characters believe exists. The individual plot pieces do have a sense of
organization, but it is the scenes themselves that do not. The dialogue exists
mostly for the characters to have something to say when they're not running
for their lives. Other flaws crop up which are totally inexcusable since
alternative means of telling and pacing the story are easily available. Are we
supposed to believe the military would get rid of Nick because one of his top
secret videos was leaked to the press? Then again, the way it is leaked is an
equally poor plot device, and the follow-up resolutions are predictable and
cheesy too.
        There's a fine line separating homage from plagiarism which serves as a
tightrope to some filmmakers and a sidewalk to others. For some reason Roland
and Devlin feel the need to walk this line with every film they make even
though they often trip themselves up (with the exception of "Independence
Day"). For example, there are many scenes reminiscent of the "Star Wars"
films, such as those in which helicopters fly through the narrow spaces
between the skyscrapers while at the same time trying to fight Godzilla. Also,
the constant rain and darkness might be an attempt at Gothic design a la
"Blade Runner" or "The Crow," but it doesn't nearly evoke the moody
atmosphere. And if you've seen either of the "Jurassic Park" films, then
you've seen the entire last act of this one.
        There's only so many ways big-budget disaster movies can be made, and
everyone seems to take this notion for granted. "Godzilla" certainly is made
up of the right pieces in the right places, but that's where the problem lies
- there's not much of a hook to it.


Author
Cheng-Jih Chen
I actually started writing this review well before seeing the movie.  I
felt I had to, after watching the original "Godzilla" on Saturday
afternoon (Channel 11's Godzilla marathon), and, partially again Sunday
evening (Joe Bob Brigg's Monstervision, on TNT).  This is the
Americanized, Raymond Burr playing the necessary white man in the cut
up Japanese film.  The little tricks used to integrate him into this
film -- tricks that fooled me when I was ten but look laughable now (or
perhaps I'm just aware that Raymond is tacked on, and am looking for
the visible seams; I can't claim I'm more clever now than when I was
ten) -- aren't too far removed from, say, the use of Bela Legosi in
"Plan 9 From Outer Space".  The actor died part way through the filming,
and, for the rest of the movie, they had some guy in a hat, with a dark
cape raised high enough to cover his face, stalking around.
The opening of "Godzilla" shows that Raymond Burr is acquainted with
some scientist's wife, who comes to him in the hospital.  We see the
back of her head.  A little while late, we see the front of her face,
but it's obvious this is culled from a different moment in the movie,
and that she isn't really talking to Raymond.  Later, Raymond calls the
hero scientist, who gets up from his workbench and goes to the back of
his lab.  Cut to some guy with an eye patch -- I'm not sure the first
shot of the scientist didn't show such a thing -- face heavily
obstructed by bubbling beakers, flasks and the other props of
stereotypical alchemy, who answers the phone and talks to Raymond.
Back in the 1950s, they simply didn't have the benefit of our
late-1990s ability to incorporate John Wayne in a beer commercial, and
Gene Kelly in a spot for Hoover vacuums.  Or maybe they just didn't
care.  (Joe Bob Briggs, who gives a little background to the movies
he's showing, mentioned that a couple of Americans were looking at
special effects footage for some reason or another.  They came across
"Gojira", liked what they saw, and made it into an American movie for
about $100,000.  Well, 1950s dollars, but cheap as far as movies go.
Arguably, a few minutes of computer graphics in the new movie cost that
much.)
Some recent movie reviews of the 1998 "Godzilla" argue that "Gojira",
the original Japanese film, is one of the better Japanese films made,
in some sense up there with Kurosawa.  I wouldn't go that far, but
little models and rubber suit aside, the film is supposed to conjure up
a powerful, bleak vision of destruction and despair: Godzilla as the
embodiment of nuclear apocalypse.  The clips from the original movie
that started off this American version does contain hospital scenes
that are meant to invoke memories of Hiroshima and Nagasaki.  Seeing
"Gojira" would be interesting -- half the movie was sliced up to
accommodate Raymond.  I should look for it in Kim's Video next time I'm
in the area.
Raymond says such obvious things: "Look at the size of those
footprints."  Show, not tell.
So, I suppose a new, 1998 version has the benefit of relative
seamlessness.  No need for the token American when New York is
wrecked.  On the other hand, Tokyo has a resonance of the fire bombings
of World War II -- air raid sirens sound when Godzilla approaches, and
the scenes of destruction are informed by these and by the bombings of
Hiroshima and Nagasaki -- which New York doesn't.  At worst, we've had
Disney's invasion of Times Square and Central Park.  Granted, it was
massive -- Michael Eisner made the rain go away -- but there were no
casualties except for the grass on the Great Lawn.
Anyway, yes, the various reviews I read are basically right.  The new
movie compares unfavorably to its rubber suited predecessor.
Fundamentally, the movie is an overgrown "Jurassic Park"/"Lost World"
set in New York, and with a much larger monster.  There are no
innovations in this movie: as noted, the influence of "Jurassic Park"
are very clear, though the baby Godzillas aren't nearly as terrifying
as velociraptors.  We perhaps shouldn't expect them to be: the
velociraptors were handled by Spielberg, who once gave us "Jaws"; the
Godzilla team gave us the decidedly unscary "Independence Day".
Actually, "ID4"'s little tricks with the airplanes are simply repeated
in this new movie: the flight scenes are basically the same.  [Hint to
the Godzilla team: helicopters can fly higher than buildings and large
lizards.]  Finally, they wreck Madison Square Garden, but it's no worse
than, say, Michael Jordan passing through; he can be a wrathful god.
That helicopters, airplanes and tanks can hurt this Godzilla makes it
nothing more than a large, overgrown pet gecko.  Fundamentally, it's an
animal.  It bleeds, it can be killed.  A couple well placed shots from
a tank can do it in.  A bigger problem would be flushing it down the
toilet afterwards without telling the kids.  [A side note: does
Godzilla taste like chicken?  Being somewhat radioactive, Godzilla
steak would certainly be free of e. coli, though there might be other
problems.]
Its animal nature, its mortality, makes this Godzilla less mythic than
the original Gojira.  Gojira, this invincible incarnation of nuclear
horrors, shrugs aside the army on its way to Tokyo.  Godzilla 1998 can
hardly take it on the chin, and has to get away from the army through
fancy footwork instead of simply wading through they guys with rifles.
A fence of 300,000 volt high tension wires proves more a curiosity than
an obstacle to Gojira.  Godzilla is hurt by this little electrical
cable that Matthew Broderick can hold in his hands.  Gojira is an
embodiment of existential bleakness, a force of nature for the atomic
age, a legendary dragon with nuclear breath.  Godzilla is a pest.
Regarding Matthew Broderick, I'm convinced that for the first hour of
the film he plays an idiot.  The second hour shows him as an idiot
being chased by monsters.  His dialog is painful to hear.  Real
clunkers, not unlike Raymond Burr's observations.  But even more
painful to hear is what his girlfriend says during the film.  [As a
counterpoint to Idiot Broderick, I'm one of the maybe four people in
the country who saw "Infinity", this neat little film about the
physicist Richard Feynman.  Broderick's roles have therefore proceeded
from Genius to Idiot in the past year.  Career trajectory?]  Oh,
furthering a theme that's been in Hollywood movies for far too long, it
takes a disaster to reconcile relationships.  "Lost in Space" was
really about the father-son thing.  "Deep Impact", which I have yet to
see, is apparently about solving family crises before they killer comet
hits; doomsday as a therapy session.  In "Godzilla", it's the boy-girl
thing.  At long last, they take an interest in each others work, and it
only took being chased by ersatz velociraptors to do it.  Oh, and she
gets a fulfilling job along the way, too.
Godzilla having offspring isn't a new idea.  Back in the late 1950s,
early 1960s, we had Godzookie, who was more like that short chubby kid
the bullies beat up on than a carnivore.  [Actually, reading the
summary for that movie -- it's been ages since I'd seen it -- the story
isn't badly constructed.  In this world, a little school kid is beat up
by bullies.  In his mind, in his fantasy world, he travels to Monster
Island, and finds that Godzookie is similarly beaten up on.  Godzilla
comes by, instills courage and confidence in Godzookie and, by proxy,
the school kid.  The school kid overcomes the bullies.  I like this
story and construction better than the chase through mazy hallways by
velociraptors.]  How Godzilla's procreation mechanics work is explained
in neither film.
Bizarrely, there are Frenchmen in the movie.  Jean Reno, who I think I
first saw as the Cleaner in "La Femme Nikita", plays some secret
service guy who's there to clean up this Godzilla mess.  He's there
with a dozen Frenchman, all of whom smoke.  They're hampered in their
mission because they can't get a smoking table at a restaurant.
Anyway, the whole thing is sort of bizarre.  Perhaps they were there to
drive away Godzilla by acting rude?  A side implication, most
definitely missing from "Gojira", is that these little nuclear messes
can be cleaned up without much fuss.  The teams next mission, I assume
his next job is propping up some African despot.
Lastly, some NYC notes.  You know, those moments when suspension of
disbelief fails because the film implies it's easy to get a cab in the
rain.  Yes, it's nitpicky to note that the Fulton Fish Market isn't
that far south of Wall Street for the big guy to clearly walk up Broad
Street, stomping investment bankers along the way.  The Brooklyn Bridge
is also not the closest bridge to the Park Avenue tunnel at 33rd
Street; the Queensborough is.  [Side note: the Park Ave tunnel the
heroes are stuck in is right next to my former office.  I'm sure that
Godzilla, sweeping its tail around, probably did severe damage to it.
I have to compliment the location people: they got the stores on the
west side of Park dead on.  That "hey, I bought a smoothie in that
store!" feeling was there.]  Oh, Manhattan bedrock isn't so deep for
Godzilla to borough around in.  It's actually relatively shallow --
that's why we have sky scrappers.  Similarly, the Hudson can't
accommodate a submerged sub.  An even more devastating gaffe is the
debate on how to get uptown/downtown when they're in the cab.  Everyone
knows the FDR construction near 23rd St. will cause havoc.  There are
other things, but pointing out these locational, uh, inconsistencies
should be a communal activity.
Just before writing the 1998 portions of this review, I went to see the
New York Philharmonic give a free concert in the Cathedral of St. John
the Divine.  It was a really long line, wrapping around two long
blocks.  There was no such line for Godzilla, but then I realized that,
say, next year, there won't be really long lines for the new "Star
Wars" movie.  The bonding, formative experience of standing in a long
line to buy tickets to a Star Wars movie will have been done away with
by the modern multiplex, which can show Ewan McGregor making light
saber sounds every hour, has killed the line.  Sometimes old things are
better.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo,
Kevin Dunn, 
Ingredients: 
Try to imagine JURASSIC PARK, except replace the gawky Jeff Goldblum
character with nebbish biologist Matthew Broderick, and then make sure
there are no kids as main characters. Let dinosaurs run wild in New York
City; add mutated giant iguana, the Chrysler Building, Madison Square
Garden, a running gag about Roger Ebert and Gene Siskel. Stir in
spectacular effects.
Synopsis: 
GODZILLA (1998) is actually the 23rd Godzilla movie - -  an updated,
1990s version of the 1954 Japanese classic monster movie GOJIRA
(pronounced Goji-lah).
Let's do a quick recap of the title lizard's history before discussing
the 1998 GODZILLA further. GOJIRA is the name of the monster, derived
from the word kujira, the Japanese word for whale. In real life the
Japanese people of 1954 had lived through fire bombings and survived an
atomic attack which leveled Hiroshima and Nagasaki during the war, so
GOJIRA was, understandably, a reflection of their post WW II anxieties.
Gojira (in one interpretation), was a dormant dinosaur, who, due to
irresponsible H-bomb testing, mutated to become the personification of
nature's inevitable revenge for man's brash and offensive tampering - -
a huge radioactive fire-breathing, civilization-smashing monster. 
Two years later, the 1956 dubbed English-language version of GOJIRA was
released as GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS. It added new footage of
Raymond Burr as narrating reporter Steve Martin to make the film more
palatable to American audiences. GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS had
three major plot lines: the military versus the monster; reporter Steve
covering the biggest story of his career, and; a love triangle involving
the brilliant hero scientist Serizawa who is rejected by the beautiful
woman Emiko.  
And now we have GODZILLA (1998), directed and produced by Emmerich and
Devlin, of INDEPENDENCE DAY. The story still involves a hero scientist,
rejection, his lady love, a reporter, and the military fighting the
animal. But while the old story has the male scientist's love dilemma
and the male reporter's career-making news story as two separate
subplots, the 1998 version condenses the two plots into a single,
tenuous romance involving a shy male scientist hero and an ambitious
broadcast news gal. 
Matthew Broderick plays brilliant biologist Nick Tatopoulis who was
rejected 8 years ago by the beautiful Audrey (Maria Pitillo). But now
Nick is investigating the possible existence of a huge monster created
by radioactive mutation, and Audrey is covering the biggest story of her
career: GODZILLA. Will they meet and resolve their differences?
In this 1998 version, the title lizard is not a dinosaur, but an iguana
mutated to gigantic proportions from French nuclear testing (which they
really did in Mururoa in 1995). Next the big iguana begins plundering
fish from fishing boats: he attacks a Japanese cannery vessel right.
Later Godzilla ransacks another net full of fish, dragging a poor tuna
boat down along with its cache. Why is the monster so eager for
mouthfuls of fish? It's up to Nick to figure out the mystery. Jean Reno
plays a mysterious Frenchman who helps Nick out. Meanwhile, the big
lizard takes a liking to New York, and goes stomping around on a path of
destruction that only two F-18 hornets (military planes) dare to
challenge.
Opinion:
It was probably inevitable that pop culture monster Godzilla would
finally be up for a Hollywood retread. In over 40 years the Toho Co.,
Ltd  monster was the star of 22 movies (in which he amassed a 24-5-7
fight record versus other monsters), toys, a cartoon, a comic book, and
several commercials.
The good news is that as a film GODZILLA is a big budget special effects
extravaganza, and can be quite crowd-pleasing, especially if you're into
dinosaurs, and you like to see stuff get smashed. With the right crowd
GODZILLA is an eye candy event, like going back in time to a 1950s
monster matinee, with folks screaming and cheering for the monster.
People who have never before seen a Godzilla movie can enjoy plenty of
fast, leaping lizards and snapping teeth.
As a script, GODZILLA is mediocre - - predictable, with uninspired
characters, a length perhaps 20 minutes over the mark, and a split in
attention whenever the big lizard leaves the screen and we're forced to
follow another plot about a subway search. GODZILLA also makes obvious
changes in the appearance and personality of the familiar monster, and
this could risk alienating nostalgic audiences even as the monster gains
a younger following through its judicious ad campaign and commercial
tie-ins.
After forty-plus years, the main difference between the classic film and
its new update is in Godzilla's personality. In 1954 Gojira is nature's
avenger; he has no fear of planes and eagerly roasts them with blasts of
fire or smashes them with his front claws; in fact he seems to relish
laying waste to Tokyo.  In 1998, Godzilla spends most of his time
running away from helicopters and planes, doesn't use his front claws,
and seems unaware that he can emit fiery blasts (total blast count = 2).
He's just an oversized beast in the way of man's progress. The monster
does show some promising flashes of intelligence during a submarine
battle, and some last minute fighting spirit at the end of the film, but
not much compared the old Godzilla personality. 
Probably the reason for these differences is because Dean Devlin and
Roland Emmerich are saving some room for Godzilla's future character
development. Get ready for sequels.
(I imagine something like this: Down and out, discredited biologist Nick
Tatopoulis gets the blame for last movie's damage to New York until the
CIA discovers evidence of another Godzilla, and comes back begging for
advice. Nick refuses involvement until he finds out his comerade the
Frenchman has disappeared and is in need of rescue. Evading a military
trap in New York, the monster swims up the Great Lakes and pops up in
Chicago where he wreaks havoc with the Bulls, Oprah, Jerry Springer, the
whales in the Shedd Aquarium, the Ferris wheel at Navy Pier, and the big
T-rex skeleton named Sue at the Field Museum. The monster uses burrowing
to make a nifty escape from the military, and then because of a
complication emerges mutated, bigger, and badder than ever, and climbs
the Sears Tower for a nasty climactic battle. One cameo involves a
cardboard box and the Taco Bell chihuahua, while another involves Kevin
Bacon and the cast of TREMORS. Don't mess with mother nature!)

Author
Paul-Michael Agapow
A giant mutant lizard attacks New York.  As if.
Yes, your honour.  I'm representing the producers in the case of "The 
State versus Godzilla".  And might I add what a pleasure it is to 
appear before you again, ma'am.  Yes, it has been a long time - the 
Christopher Lambert deposition if I'm not mistaken.  But may I be so 
bold as to ask you to throw this case out?  My clients, Mssrs Emmerich 
and Devlin, are highly respected auteurs.  It is beneath the creators 
of "Independence Day" to be placed on trial like this ...
Yes ma'am, and "Stargate" and "Universal Soldier".  However ...  
Yes, and "Moon 44".  With Michael Pare.  But that was never bought to 
trial.
In any event, my clients plead not guilty to the charges of reckless 
lack of imagination and perverse negligence of plot.  We won't be 
dealing with the charges of acting crimes against humanity as the 
prosecution has referred these to the International Court in the 
Hague.
If I might turn to the first charge.  Irrespective of whether 
the witness has seen "King Kong" or "The Lost World", or "Alien", 
"Godzilla" is completely different.  Godzilla is not a giant ape 
running amok in New York, a T-Rex running amok in California, or 
indeed an alien running amok on a colony world, spaceship or earth.  
No, Godzilla is a giant lizard running amok in New York.  This is 
totally different.  As regards the second charge, in the prehearing 
the plot was ruled to be purely hearsay and inadmissible.
No, your honour.  "Inadmissible", not "invisible".  Yes ma'am, I 
suppose one interpretation is that a special effects film should be 
special.
Move to strike.  According to "The People versus Starship Troopers", a 
director cannot be held wholly responsible for the performances within 
his or her film.  In any event, I have Mssrs Broderick and Reno 
outside, waiting to be called.  Ms ... uh ... the lead actress 
wasn't available for this hearing.
Actually your honour, we weren't able to locate Ms ... uh ... the 
actress playing the reporter.  We've interviewed moviegoers widely and 
none of them can identify her or what she was doing in the movie.  The 
local police department have deployed stakeouts in several theatres in 
an effort to catch her on film.  We've also enlisted CSICOP, who have 
set up infra-red cameras in several venues.  They apparently believe 
she's just a misidentification of the planet Venus, or maybe swamp gas.
I object!  There is no way the witness could know that the producers 
were "creatively bankrupt bimbos who think that throwing money at a 
piece of broccoli would make it a hit".  The prosecution is asking the 
witness to speculate on the internal state of my clients.  Also, it is 
clearly demonstrated in the scene where the army realises they've lost 
Godzilla that ...
Lost, your honour. In Manhattan, yes.
We throw ourselves on the court's mercy.
While I wrote off "Independence Day" as a B-grade movie that had been 
given a blockbuster gloss, "Godzilla" is not even graced by being 
gloriously bad or cheesy.  It is just dull, an empty trotting out of 
the essentials of the Godzilla myth, poorly masked by much sound and 
fury, signifying little but a gnawing black hole at the heart of the 
film.  The filmmakers were apparently unaware that any effort had to 
be expended on wooing the audience - to them, the sight of Godzilla 
crushing pedestrians should be thrilling in of itself, without any 
effort at suspense, empathy or surprise.  With luck, this may convince 
Devlin and Emmerich (and Hollywood at large) that no amount of 
advertising fervour will make a hit out of poorly acted, lazily plotted 
garbage.  [*/misfire] and meatloaf surrounded by fireworks on the Sid 
and Nancy scale.
"Godzilla"
Released 1998.
Directed by Roland Emmerich.
Produced by Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich  et al.
Starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria,
        Kevin Dunn, Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer.
--
Paul-Michael Agapow (agapow@latcs1.oz.au)
Postviews SF/F reviews site: 

Author
Jeff Williamson
That being said, I enjoyed the hell out of myself watching this film.
Since hearing rumblings about it in 1991, I've eagerly anticipated
the translation of everyone's favorite rubber monster to American
digital theater.  There's a certain ludicrous charm in watching an
actor in a big green suit stomping on a Matchbox playset version of
Tokyo--a charm which I've appreciated in its various stages
throughout the years--but the wholesale devastation wreaked by the
latest incarnation of the Mean Green Stomping Machine is well worth
the wait.
Now, as in Devlin and Emmerich's last blockbuster, INDEPENDENCE DAY,
there's something which can be laughingly referred to as a plot
which exists as a means of padding $100 million of CGI out to a
feature-length movie.  Matthew Broderick, in a disingenuous turn
here as Nick Tatopolous, a researcher with the Nuclear Regulatory
Commission whose last assignment involved cataloguing the growth of
Chernobyl earthworms, pretends at a naivete which seems forced.  His
estranged (and isn't THAT a tired plot point for these "event"
films?) college girlfriend, Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo) manages
only briefly to pull herself from whine mode, and one never quite
manages to like her.  The supporting cast is better, with Hank
Azaria (Moe the Bartender and many others from TV's THE SIMPSONS) as
"Animal", the luckiest cameraman alive, Harry Shearer (another
SIMPSONS veteran, as Mr. Burns and Ned Flanders) playing Charles
Caiman (look, kids, a lizard pun!), Audrey's egotistical news anchor
boss, and Jean Reno as Phillippe Roche, a French "insurance salesman"
who keeps you guessing at his motives through most of the film,
offering a surprise by the end.
None of the human principals here has the charm of Will Smith; however,
certain "clevernesses" in the script echo Jeff Goldblum's swipe of
Bill Cosby material in the 1996 film.  As an example, the overweight,
candy-chomping Mayor Ebert (Michael Lerner) of New York City has a
balding beanpole aide named Gene.  When reporter Caiman swipes Audrey's
exclusive, naming the lizard "Godzilla" after the fevered whispers of a
Japanese fisherman who survived the beast's early attacks, Audrey
shouts "That's Gojira, you moron!" at the TV--the non-Americanized
title of the original 1954 Japanese film, drawing laughs from
aficionados of the kaiju (giant monster) genre.
Undeniably, though, the star of this film is Godzilla himself.  In a
stylized opening sequence (scored with a heavy hand by David Arnold),
we see the origins of the beast, as nuclear tests in French Polynesia
irradiate scores of marine iguanas--and their unhatched eggs.  After
some underwater attacks on fishing boats, and an off-screen
walkthrough in Panama, the big lizard surfaces in the Big Apple,
dropping debris in his wake, such as small trawlers.
Appropriately, the earliest scenes of Godzilla are from the ground,
showing the human reactions to a twenty-story lizard run amok.  One
of the best perspective shots has a man in a truck, which suddenly
tilts and rises into the air as it is treated as a chew toy by the
beast.  It's soon clear that this will not be the slow, lumbering
Godzilla with which we're already familiar: this creature runs and
jumps, climbs and burrows, and corners better than most automobiles.
And the casual damage inflicted by his swinging tail is a nice touch.
The military soon reacts to this monster attack, sending an impressive
show of force, and evacuating the island of Manhattan (as best as
possible on short notice).  Several confrontations between 'zilla and
military hardware are evocative of similar scenes in the Japanese
series of films, except with better effects.  In both cases, the
military is about as effective against the monster.
This film comes across as derivative of other "creature" films, most
notably JURASSIC PARK and ALIENS.  That's not to its detriment;
bigger, if not better, manages to be sufficiently different and
entertaining.  The new Godzilla (as envisioned by Patrick Tatopoulos
Design) is less a mythic figure and more of an animal, with purely
animal instincts.  Gone is the stream of nuclear fire the old version
would breathe onto cardboard sets; instead, this creature's roar blows
cars through the air, occasionally igniting a fireball which recalls
its predecessor.  Most impressive is the maneuverability of Godzilla:
as soon as you become satisfied with thinking that he's just a larger
T-Rex, 'zilla uses functional forelimbs to climb through a concrete
hole, or leaps over the heads of awestruck humans to dive into the
Atlantic.  There are a few surprises I won't mention here; other
reviewers probably will not be as discreet.  Suffice it to say that
Madison Square Garden is one hell of a set piece. ^_^
This movie runs long at 2:20, but is such a roller coaster that it
manages to keep you on your seat through two false endings, one fully
telegraphed, and the other not.  And of course, there's the inevitable
sequel shot:  don't leave until you hear the Red Hot Chili Peppers
blasting their Led Zeppelin cover over the end credits.  Of course,
by that point, you may already have been deafened by the SDDS
explosions and roars--this is one *loud* movie.  Genre fans will be
disappointed--perhaps even outraged--by the end of the climactic chase,
but you can put it from your mind in the face of the inevitable sequels.
If you enjoy the massive destruction of expensive real estate, this is
the perfect film.  Not quite as insistent about its "Nature vs. Man"
message as the monster films born in the wake of the Atomic Age, it
nonetheless manages to entertain.  Just discard your preconceived
notions at the door; they'll only be a hindrance.
Worthwhile at full price if you're an effects buff; if you're not,
it's probably not your film.  Definitely worth tracking it down in
first run for the aural and visual amazement.
Too loud and perhaps too frightening for smaller children.  Use your
discretion.
-- 
/-\ ** Jeff Williamson  ###  Lightfall Interactive  ###  Evanston, IL ** /-\
|A| O_o docangst@mcs.com ^_^ AnimeCentral HomePage: http://www.acen.org/ |9|
|C| *==>   "In every revolution, there is one man with a vision."   


Author
David N. Butterworth
        When you find yourself with a monster hit on your hands, as did the
producer/director team of Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich a couple of years
back with their summer smash "Independence Day," the biggest problem you
have to face is what to do for an encore.
        How do you top something as huge as "ID4"?  Do you call Will Smith
back for a sequel?  (Last summer the Fresh Prince was riding another
mid-year high with "Men in Black," so *someone* had the right idea.)  Or do
you shift gears completely, going for something smaller, more intimate
perhaps, a character study with the emphasis on acting, rather than on
action?
        Or do you do what this dynamic duo did: take a legendary screen
monster, tart him up for the nineties, and let him take a sizable bite out
of the Big Apple?
        "Godzilla" is the latest product of Devlin and Emmerich's
blockbuster machine.  Not the most inspirational of ideas one might say
(the gigantic, fire-breathing lizard from the fifties has already been the
subject of countless sequels in its homeland Japan).  But, at twenty
stories high, this "Godzilla" was big enough a concept to secure a
mega-million dollar budget and the go-ahead from TriStar Pictures.
        Borrowing conveniently, if not necessarily intelligently, from
"Jurassic Park" and countless other creature features--"Alien," "Jaws,"
"King Kong," etc.--"Godzilla" is like Steven Spielberg's movie in a number
of ways.  First and foremost, "Jurassic Park"'s dinosaurs outclassed the
human elements in terms of acting ability, and that's pretty much the case
with "Godzilla."  Nothing much has been learned or even attempted in terms
of making the pint-size humans running around underfoot the remotest bit
interesting.
        But c'mon.  Nobody goes to see "Godzilla" for the performances.
This is "Raging Lizard," not "Raging Bull."
        "Godzilla"'s unambitious writing is assisted by the
budget-conscious casting of Matthew Broderick (who plays a "worm guy" from
the Nuclear Regulatory Commission) and bit-player Maria Pitillo--who's
terrible--in the leads, with Jean Reno ("The Professional") and Hank Azaria
(Nat the dog-walker on TV's "Mad About You") along for the ride.
        All four are upstaged, perhaps deliberately so, by the rampaging
reptile.
        Like "Jurassic Park," "Godzilla" is bone-crushingly loud,
destructive, and headache inducing.  It's also dumb as nails; no surprises
where the money got spent.  Spielberg's 1993 film set a new standard in
computer-generated animation and creature effects, and "Godzilla" has
surely taken advantage of some of those advances.  However, what's
disappointing about the film is that most of the mayhem takes place under
cover of darkness, and in a torrential rain storm, which feels like, well,
a cheap shot.  New York still gets trashed--the radioactively-mutated,
French Polynesian lizard finds Manhattan a good place to build a nest--but
it would have been nice to have seen a little more of it.
        Early criticisms of the film have pointed out the mindnumbing
aberrations of logic in the film's central plotting.  This is true enough
but no matter how brainless, "Godzilla" is still an enjoyable Crunch 'n'
Munch spectacular.  It does remain prudent to point out to Mr. Devlin and
Mr. Emmerich, however, that as far as box office word of mouth is
concerned, sighs *do* matter.

Author
Richard Scheib
USA. 1998. Director - Roland Emmerich, Screenplay - Emmerich & Dean 
Devlin, Story - Devlin, Emmerich, Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio, Based on 
the Character Created and Owned by Toho Inc, Producer - Devlin, 
Photography - Ueli Steiger, Music - David Arnold, Visual Effects 
Supervisor - Volker Engel, Godzilla Design & Supervisor - Patrick 
Tatopolous, Associate Visual Effects Supervisor - Karen Goulekas, 
Creature Supervisors - Kurt Carly & Bruce Marr, Creature & Digital 
Effects - Centropolis Effects, Digital Effects - Digiscope (Supervisor - 
Dion Hatch), Sony Pictures Imageworks (Supervisor - Jerome Chen) & 
Visionart (Supervisor - Joshua D. Rose), Miniature Effects - Cinnabar 
(Supervisor - Andrea Whittier), Sight Line Productions (Supervisor - Don 
Baker) & Striber Visual Network Inc (Supervisor - John Striber), 
Mechanical Effects Supervisor - Clay Pinney, Production Design - Oliver 
Scholl, Supervising Art Director - Wm. Ladd Skinner. Production Company 
- Centropolis Entertainment/Fried Films/Independant Pictures.
Matthew Broderick (Dr Niko Tatopolous), Maria Pitillo (Audrey Timmonds), 
Jean Reno (Philippe Roache), Hank Azaria (Victor `Animal' Palotti), 
Kevin Dunn (Colonel Hicks), Michael Lerner (Mayor Ebert), Arabella Field 
(Lucy Palotti), Harry Shearer (Charles Caiman), Vicki Lewis (Dr Elsie 
Chapman), Doug Savant (Sergeant O'Neal)
Plot: Dr Niko Tatopolous, a biologist with the US Atomic Energy 
Commission specializing in radiation-mutated lifeforms, is flown to the 
South Pacific to investigate reports of a giant lizard, mutated as a 
result of French nuclear testing, which is attacking shipping. But the 
creature, nicknamed `Gojira' by a Japanese survivor and mispronounced as 
`Godzilla' by the American media, heads to Manhattan Island where it 
rampages through the city streets, causing mass destruction. As the 
military rally all efforts to stop it, Niko tries to alert them to the 
fact that it has laid a nest of eggs somewhere in the city.
Sometimes one just ends up scratching their head and wondering what it 
is that drives public tastes and/or the opinion of critics. Two years 
before when `Independence Day' became less of a film than it did an 
event, this critic ended up scratching his head and wondering what made 
everybody go so crazy about something so one-dimensionally cliched and 
simplistically flag-waving. Now I find myself in almost the opposite 
position. Despite a mega-hype build-up that announced it was from the 
same people as and would be even bigger than `Independence Day', 
`Godzilla' has opened in the US and confounded all expectation to become 
a middling flop with the public and with critics everywhere rushing to 
junk it. In fact it is not a bad film at all. If the truth be told it is 
really quite the most enjoyable, unpretentious out-and-out monster movie 
that has come this in some time. Why all the negative hoopla is frankly 
beyond one - perhaps it is the absensce of flag-waving that disappointed 
people.
One didn't really expect much from the film at all. Director Roland 
Emmerich and his co-writer Dean Devlin do not make particularly good sf. 
Devlin writes by cliche and Emmerich directs in simplistic emotional 
cues and their combined body of work - `Universal Soldier' (1992), 
`Stargate' (1994), `Independence Day' (1996) and the tv series `The 
Visitor' (1997) - lacks anything appreciable in the way of original 
ideas or challenging treatments of any of the themes. `Independence Day' 
is the best example of all their faults - mindless mega-scale special 
effects for their own sake and the substitution for election 
campaign-type populist sentiments in the place of drama. `Stargate' is 
their best film up to this point, which at least counterbalances their 
cliched writing with what is Emmerich's forte - the ability to conjure 
an effectively dramatic sense of wonder across an epic widescreen scale.
`Godzilla' is of course an updating of the long-running Japanese monster 
series - begun with `Gojira' in 1954, and passing through some 
twenty-one sequels until the character was officially killed off in 
1995. Emmerich and Devlin do some occasionally clever updatings - in an 
amusingly contemporary move the creature has been mutated to giant-size 
by French nuclear testing in the Pacific. But mostly their writing is 
really terrible. Their characters are conceived as no more than 
caricatures - the French are snobbish about American junk food; the 
pompous mayor (who in an amusing move is named after one of the top US 
film critics) is a caricature that has been stolen straight from `Jaws'. 
And the romance between Matthew Broderick and vacuous bubble-gum blonde 
Maria Pitillo is appallingly written. The good thing about the film is 
that it rarely ever slows down enough to allow these one-dimensional 
figures time on screen.
The film is at its best when it is, without any pretensions, doing 
exactly what it has been designed to do - being a BIG scale, big-budget, 
no frills, thrill-a-minute rollercoaster ride of a monster movie. 
Something at which it succeeds more than admirably. Whenever Godzilla 
turns up on screen Emmerich unleashes some top drawer special effects - 
enthralling scenes of mass destruction with it smashing its way through 
downtown Manhattan and ripping swathes through entire skyscrapers with 
its tail alone; an oddly `Star Wars' Death Star trench-styled battle 
between it and army helicopters amid canyons of high-rise towers; an 
immensely exciting climax with it rampaging across and being trapped in 
a suspension bridge. Emmerich only unveils the creature gradually and 
keeps the camera down at ground level so as to heighten the sense of 
scale even more so. About three-quarters of the way through the film 
seems to abruptly kill Godzilla off and then gives the appearance of 
jumping tracks into another sort of film altogether with the principal 
characters fighting off a lethal bunch of baby Godzillas. The sequence 
is undeniably modelled after the raptor sequences in `Jurassic Park' but 
Emmerich whips it up into something intensely exciting. And as films go 
- compare it to the hollow soap opera of the same year's `Deep Impact' 
or the letdown that `The Lost World: Jurassic Park' was - you would be 
hard pressed to find any better adrenalin-charged, all-out effects 
excitement on the screen in the next while than `Godzilla'.


Author
Wendy Lin
It's an amusing movie, filled with uncreative clichés and dry dialogues.
Fortunately for the movie maker, lost of us do not go see Godzilla for
the interesting plot or engaging character and conversation.  We go for
the monster, and what a fine monster it is.  Not a monster with
personality as King Kong did, mind you, but its (or his) character was
more fully developed than other human characters in the movie.
The movie started with nuclear testing that has changed a lizard's life
forever. Then Godzilla starts his journey to New York, New York,
destroying a few fish boats along the way.  Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew
Broderick), a biologist, who at the time was studying nuclear test's
effect on earth worm's physical size (makes them 17% bigger), was picked
up to study the anomaly. Meanwhile, his ex-girlfriend Audrey (Maria
Pitillo), who is desperately trying to move her journalism career
forward, sees Nick as her big break. Audrey is a knock-out, but it
wasn't hard to see why her career was not going anywhere -- she neither
dresses professionally like Lois Lane, nor converses intelligently which
is probably the fault of the script. Accompanying Audrey is the TV
photographer Animal (Hank Azaria), who gives a fine performance despite
the role limitation. Then there is the self-claimed insurance guy (Jean
Reno) from France (where Godzilla was first sighted), who was the only
character that is more interesting than Godzilla. 
The rest of the movie is predictable but entertaining. The main theme is
to kill the monster. So there is a helicopter scene that wasn't original
(reminded me of Star War), but fun; there is mass destruction of New
York City both by Godzilla and its hunters; there is the submarine
fight; and there is the Madison Square Garden full of Godzilla eggs and
baby Godzillas. There is nothing original about any of these, but the
whole movie was paced well and it keeps you interested. Anytime when the
characters are not chasing or looking for Godzilla, meaning when they
are trying to have meaningful human interactions, you can go for a
restroom break.
I went to see it thinking it will just be like Jurassic Park, the Lost
World, and it was better than that. It was funny throughout and
occasionally silly. Overall, it's an amusing movie that will surely
entertain you if you don't go in with high expectations.

Author
Berge Garabedian
>From the makers of INDEPENDENCE DAY (6.5/10) comes the umpteenth remake
of the original monster movie classic Godzilla. I believe that there
have been over sixty variations of this picture filmed through its
various mutations, but this one claims to be the one that cost the most
clams: $140 million worth.
PLOT:
Nuclear radiation turns an ordinary lizard into a gigantic 500-foot+
beast. The giant monster roams into New York City, and consequently
terrifies and squashes many of its "innocent" inhabitants. The US
military, along with a nuclear radiation specialist (Broderick) are out
to stop this freakish abnormality from taking over. Mayhem and crazy
special effects ensue.
CRITIQUE:
"Been there, seen that" was my main reaction after the conclusion of
this film. This kind of picture may have been incredibly inventive and
original a few years back (think JURASSIC PARK (7.5/10)), but now it's
nothing more than a rehashed carnival of special effects. Okay,
admittedly the special effects are still quite spectacular, taped
alongside their partnered action sequences, but the crust of any film
still lies in its overall story line, and this pie just doesn't have
much cream to it, boys and girls. Standard characters conveying
contrived movie feelings through icky standard dialogue. The story is
basically this: Monster bad. Kill monster. And that's about it.
Other than that, the writers attempt to squeeze in another cheezy
romance between two bad actors (Broderick's career peaked and ended at
FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF (8/10), give up the day job, dude, you're
done!), and a bunch of characters who have to disagree with the
theories of the "always-right" scientist. Smack that all together, and
you've got yourself another special effects airball of a movie! By the
way, is there any reason why the President of the United States of
America didn't get involved in this giant beast's destructive path
through New York City, while the French secret service made this
mission their top priority in life?? (Okay, so they kind of explain the
French involvement, but where the heck was the Prez through this
unthinkable disaster??).
For movie fanatics, watch for the fun-poking of Siskel & Ebert
throughout the entire picture by the way of Mayor Ebert and his
assistant Gene. In the end, the film does lengthen itself out by means
of another standard monster flic scenario ("Someone" re-emerges. Guess
who? Yawn.), and does end with the perpetual open door to an obvious
sequel, but that's about it. If you're in the mood to see a crazy
monster running loose in New York City and nothing more, then check
into this movie. If you're looking for something more interesting and
original to watch, I suggest you skip this over-hyped puppy, and warm
your nachos for several other interesting salsas to come on this
summer's fiesta line-up of films.
Little Known Facts: 
Jean Reno's real name is Juan Moreno. He was born in Casablanca,
Morocco.
Harry Shearer does the TV Simpsons' voices of Charles Montgomery Burns,
Waylon Smithers, Ned Flanders, Seymour Skinner, Otto Mann and many
others. Hank Azaria does the Simpsons' voices of Apu
Nahasapeemapetilon, Moe Szyslak, Police Chief Clancy Wiggum, Comic Book
Guy, Dr. Nick Riviera, and many others.  
Matthew Broderick is married to fellow thespian Sarah Jessica Parker,
and is known for being the original choice to play Alex P. Keaton
(later played delectably by Michael J. Fox) in the long-running NBC
sitcom Family Ties. Broderick declined the proffered role, however,
because his father was dying of cancer in New York City at the time and
the job would have necessitated a move to Los Angeles.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        It happens every year -- the days get longer, the weather gets 
warmer and the studios start releasing their big-budget blockbusters. 
This year's crop already seems inferior to that of past summers, even 
1997's lackluster trio of BATMAN & ROBIN, THE FIFTH ELEMENT and 
THE LOST WORLD. The marketing blitz in 1998 has been centered 
on GODZILLA ("Heeere, lee-zerd, lee-zerd..."), which doesn't make me 
optimistic about future summers. GODZILLA is, of course, based on a 
series of cult movies (translation: really bad movies only a few people 
can tolerate) from Japan that turn up really late at night on Ted 
Turner-owned cable stations. That this big-budget remake won't rise 
above its roots is fairly obvious.
        The credits show us the origin of Godzilla. In five words: 
Nuclear explosion creates giant lizard. Sounds like an Enquirer 
headline, doesn't it? The mushroom cloud is followed by the inevitable 
"discovery" sequence. This time, a Japanese guy is eating noodles with 
chopsticks while watching Sumo wrestling (if that ain't a stereotype...) 
when he discovers the telltale radar blip. People die.
        Cut to our protagonist, played by Matthew Broderick. He 
makes his first appearance wearing headphones, warbling along to 
"Singin' in the Rain." It's a none-too-subtle sign that he wishes he 
were in a classier movie. No dice, Bueller. From the beginning, poor 
Matthew has to do embarassing things like fondle giant earthworms 
and stand in Godzilla's enormous footprint. Every disaster movie has 
to have a know-it-all scientist, and this time Broderick is it.
        As the world's leading expert on radiated earthworms (And 
wouldn't you love to have that printed on your business card?), 
Broderick is invaluable to the government. He immediately dispels 
Vicki Lewis' theory that Godzilla is a dinosaur because, hey, you can't 
take seriously the intellectual arguments of "Newsradio" cast members. 
Broderick instead hits the nail on the head, announcing Godzilla is a 
radiated lizard. "The radiation isn't an anamoly," he announces, and 
lightning strikes. "I believe this is a mutated abberation," he continues, 
and lightning strikes again. It's vocabulary lightning, you see, 
activated by words of four syllables or more.
        Meanwhile, we're introduced to our New York cast, headed 
by an ambitious broadcast journalist (Maria Patillo), Broderick's 
former love. Gee, what are the odds their paths will cross again at a 
dramatically important time? Poor Patillo has been trying to get ahead 
in the news business for years but has been held down by heartless 
anchorman Harry Shearer. Italian cameraman Hank Azaria tells her 
she's not ruthless enough: "Nice doesn't get you anywhere in this town. 
It's dog eat dog."
        Actually, it's lizard eat city, as Godzilla emerges from the 
Atlantic to begin a rampage on the Big Apple's core. The filmmakers 
provide us with a one-note drunk fisherman who hooks Godzilla. "I 
think I've got a bite," he announces as a gigantic tidal wave begins 
rushing toward him. You can guess what happens next. Similar 
reactions spring forth as the monster prowls the city. Hearing the 
rumble of approaching footsteps, one New Yorker remarks, "Please 
don't tell me that's another parade." Please don't tell me that's the best 
line you could come up with.
        Mayor Ebert is not pleased. Played by the principal from 
"Head of the Class," he continually makes the wrong decision when 
given an option, and bickers with his assistant Gene. I guess the 
filmmakers knew they'd be getting two thumbs down from the critics 
and didn't even bother to kiss ass. The problem is, if you're going to 
attack Siskel and Ebert, you should at least make it funny. Dialogue 
like, "Didn't we agree that we weren't going to have any sweets until 
after the election?" followed by, "Back off, Gene," just doesn't work for 
me. Other lame running jokes include everyone mispronouncing the 
Broderick character's last name and Frenchman Jean Reno's inability 
to find a good cup of coffee in New York.
        There's even more fun to be had as GODZILLA progresses. As 
the beast heads back into hiding, Broderick suggests the military lure 
it out with food. Cue twelve dump trucks, all dropping fish into a New 
York intersection. (BRODERICK: That's a lot of fish.) That ambush fails, 
but Broderick soon figures out why Godzilla came to New York by 
buying $50 worth of home pregnancy tests and running lizard blood 
through them. Yep, Godzilla's with children, which makes you wonder 
just what kind of creature would be horny enough to have sex with 
Godzilla. That's until Broderick explains that Godzilla reproduces 
asexually, like Linda Tripp.
        GODZILLA comes to us from the makers of INDEPENDENCE DAY, 
so it has a lot of dumb action scenes, destructive special effects and 
shallow subplots. Look no further than Patillo's betrayal of Broderick 
(PATILLO: What have I done, Animal? What have I become?) and 
the climactic "Godzilla's nest" sequence in Madison Square Garden. 
The main difference is, INDEPENDENCE DAY was about the experience. It 
had a real global, patriotic element to it, and some genuinely fun 
characters. GODZILLA has lots of rain and lightning, reptilian action 
ripped off from JURASSIC PARK and endless product placement from the 
likes of Kodak, Blockbuster, Juicy Fruit, Swatch, Sprint and Bumble 
Bee Tuna. Yes, Bumble Bee actually paid to be known as the official 
tuna of GODZILLA . That fact alone is twice as interesting as anything 
in the movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Author
Phil Brady
        We were warned. The trailer for Godzilla had a little man cast his
fishing line off a pier in N.Y. harbor. He gets a bite, and then the
water starts to swell -- hundreds of  yards away. The swell heads right
for his spot, explosively destroying the pier as the man runs for his
life. What did we just see? Godzilla was clearly beyond the range of the
fisherman, and why would the creature choose to bulldoze the pier,
shoving his face into the wooden pilings? The whole scene was staged so
we could see the baggy-pants comic figure run from a special effect. It
makes no sense. Now imagine two hours like that.
        The movie starts with a trawler being attacked in the South Pacific.
Later, the lone survivor lies in shock in a hospital. With a match waved
in his face, the the old Japanese man weakly says: "Gojira, Gojira."
This is a poor version of the "Keyser Soze" scene from The Usual
Suspects, but the film editors like it enough to reprise the video tape
a couple of  times. Later, in Panama, huge footprints are found,
crossing a plain in an unnatural, cookie-cutter manner. Next thing we
know, it's closing in on New York. Showdown time, right? Wrong. A better
paced film would stage skirmishes in several places, leading to a big
climax in Gotham, but our boy gets there in the first half hour. The
last ninety minutes cannot be non-stop action, so what do we do?
        The lizard gets to stomp around a bit, in a classically Godzilla
fashion, but then the military loses him. Yes, a twenty-story dinosaur
just steps in off the street, "hiding" in some buildings. Think that's
bad? He also gets to move around in underground tunnels. Hellooooo!?
Suspension of disbelief  is necessary in many Sci-Fi films, but this is
a bit much. The design of the creature is pretty impossible, too, but I
do not think the producers care about alienating the bio-engineers the
audience. Okay, okay, who cares? We all just want to see the special
effects. Good news, bad news.
        There is a reasonable amount of screen time devoted to creature
effects, but a lot of them are repetitive. Seeing Godzilla lope down
Manhattan streets is entertaining, but we just get to see more similar
scenes of Godzilla zipping around town like he was marching through
K-Mart. Other scenes have a staged awkwardness about them. Some variety
is provided by the little godzillas that hatch later in the film. They
behave much like Spielberg's raptors, but their stalking gets overused,
too. Enough action, but not much interaction.
        There are some decent actors who may not welcome this entry on their
resume, so let me just mention Hank Azaria, who has been doing a fine
job for years, most notably in The Birdcage. His character here is a
little more alive than the rest, so maybe people will learn his name. In
closing, I leave you with one thought: We have been told that we get the
government we deserve, and that may be true. But we certainly get the
movies we deserve -- if enough people buy tickets, Hollywood does it
again. The end of Godzilla has a setup for a sequel. Godzilla may be
worth checking out, just to see what it looks like, but repeat viewing
will send the producers the message that you are ready for that sequel.
Think about it.

Author
Matt Williams
Call him Godzilla, The Reluctant Lizard.  The makers of Independence Day
have applied their unique sensibilities to reinventing everyone's
favorite big, green, city-stomping reptile.  You don't really expect
much in the way of plot and/or character development, do you? Good.  But
in this new incarnation, the scaly fella may be bigger, but he's not
very impressive.
Born many years earlier, during French nuclear testing in the South
Pacific, Godzilla has chosen this moment to make his public appearance
(And why not?  This is the Summer Movie Season!) From his South Pacific
home, he makes a beeline toward The Big Apple...presumably because of
the smell of fish.
Naturally, the military is concerned.  They bring in an expert in
radiation-induced growth-mutations, Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew
Broderick).  He is the stock personality-free scientist who has
frequented other Emmerich productions such as Stargate (James Spader),
and Independence Day (Jeff Goldblum).
But Dr. Tatopoulos isn't the only character strewn into the path of a
giant lizard. No, we are tormented with the presence of his
ex-girlfriend, and television reporter hopeful, Audrey Timmonds (Maria
Pitillo)...a completely annoying and unsympathetic character.  At least
she's accompanied by cameraman Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria),
who gives the film its best Godzilla-induced fear reaction.
On a more entertaining note, the French Secret Service have dispatched
crack agent Philippe Roache (Jean Reno) to quietly dispose of the
monster. Reno's cool mannerisms and suave style easily make him the most
enjoyable character in the film, even if the French jokes are layed on a
bit thick.
And then there's the big guy...Godzilla himself.  In the original
Japanese monster flicks, Godzilla always had sort of a surly attitude
(probably the result of an unhappy actor spending too much time in an
uncomfortable rubber suit).  The new Godzilla, on the other hand, has no
attitude whatsoever.  He's a personality free lizard, and though you may
not spot any zippers in his new incarnation, he's hardly the same ol'
creature.
The special effects have obviously improved over the years, and you
might think that Godzilla would benefit from the enhanced technology.
The answer is yes and no.  In redesigning the creature, the filmmakers
apparently decided to stay with the "guy in a lizard suit" theme.
Although the new creature has been given a good, realistic head, he is
also in possession of very human arms and legs.  So, even though he's
entirely computer generated, you can never quite shake the image of a
guy in a suit creeping around a model city.
Every special effects driven movie needs to have some sort of
centerpiece scene, a scene which is so impressive that you instantly
forget about secondary problems such as plot or characterization.  Such
a scene is missing from Godzilla.  There's only one action sequence,
stuck at the end of the film, which comes close (it's derivative and
unbelievable, but fun).
You can never expect much from the script for a special effects
extravaganza (after all, if the film is done right, no one will ever
notice little details like a screenplay), but the script for Godzilla
scrapes the bottom of the barrel.  Not much makes sense here (for
example, why is anyone surprised when the radioactive-mutation expert
suggests Godzilla is the result of radioactive-mutation?) and a lot of
little details haven't been thought out (why don't the attack
helicopters fly above the lizard, rather than at mouth range?)  And the
characters?  Independence Day had a stronger batch, and that's not
saying much.  Even the so-called humor in the film (the labored
Siskel-and-Ebert jokes simply seem bitter) fall flat.  No, there's not
much here.
If you're looking for a popcorn film, Godzilla may seem to fill the
bill.  And at the dollar theater, you might be right.  But even as
low-grade mindless entertainment, Godzilla isn't quite satisfying.
You'd get much better entertainment value for your buck by rewatching
some of Godzilla's inspirations: Jurassic Park, or even the original
Gojira. This Godzilla may be big, but he's an empty shell.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Jeremiah Rickert
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitilla, and Hank Azaria
Directed by: Roland Emmerich
     Oh boy, it's the edge of summer, and those two guys who ruled the
summer box office two years ago are back with their uber-flick, Godzilla.
With a gigantic budget and big-name stars...well, a gigantic budget
anyway, Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich, the team behind Stargate,
Independence Day, and now Godzilla, are going for the summer-flick
hat-trick, and if hype alone can sell a picture, they will have it.
     The plot was definitely there, just enough to move the movie along,
although at times it seemed really slow.  With a running time of about 2
and a half hours, yet still barely enough plot, you have to wonder if the
next Devlin/Emmerich release will be all special affects and no story at
all...why bother with that pesky story element anyway?  There were a
number of jump-cuts, whenever the characters reached a decision about
something, the film suddenly jumped forward to just before it was about to
be implemented, making the transitions between grand action scenes as
short as possible, which means that the largest chunk of the movie is
action action action.  Some of the editing didn't quite seem up to snuff.
The cuts were jerky at times and you'd cut away from an action shot before
it was totally finished.  The editing team was a pretty good one too,
Peter Amudson (Daylight, Dragonheart, Dragon: The Bruce Lee Story, and SFX
work on Return of the Jedi and Empire Strikes Back) and David Siegel (who
I believe was nominated for an emmy for work on Law and Order).  Despite
the pedigree of the team, I still thought the final product was not as
good as it could have been.
     The plot, by the way, is about the foul and large creature that is
produced due to French nuclear testing in the French Polynesian Islands.
(That's right, we've run out of enemies, so now it's time for the French.)
The French are the first to learn about the creature's existance, when
they investigate a large fishing vessel that was attacked and sunk.  They
are worried that their testing has caused whatever this thing is, and they
need to try to hush up the attack in order to protect their reputation.
     After -something- with huge footprints tromps across Jamaica, our
hero, Nick Tatopoulis (Matthew Broderick) is pulled away from his exciting
job of measureing radioactive worms at Chernobyl by the U.S. Dept. of
State, who takes him to the island to examine the large prints.  He is
added to a team of scientists, drafted by the govt. to try to get a bead
on what they are dealing with and how to deal with it.  Hollywood must
think that all scientists are beatniks, hippies, slobs, and wierdos,
because that is what we have in our group in this film. (as played by
Vicki Lewis, Malcom Danare, and Broderick.) The creature leaves a trail
that seems to be leading to New York City, where the creature is sure to
wreak a lot of havoc.
     Of course, he does hit new york, bigtime, causing a big ruckus,
panic, and a special effects extravaganza!  In the city, we are introduced
to the supporting players (well, they all kinda support old 'Zilla, but
who's counting) news anchor Charles Caiman, who gets the award for the
most horrible pun, played by Harry Shearer (Simpsons, Spinal Tap) his
assistant and former college flame of Tatopoulos, Audrey Timmonds, played
by Maria Pitillo (Dear God, TV's House Rules), and her friend's husband
and network camera man Victor "animal" Palotti, played by Hank Azaria
(Gross Pointe Blanke, Birdcage, Heat).  Also running around spying on the
Americans is French agent Phillipe Roche, portrayed by french actor Jean
Reno (The Professional, Mission Impossible)
     The French government still wants it covered up, the army wants it
dead, and Godzilla just wants to build a nest, even if it means (and it
does) destroying most of Manhattan in the process.  
     The special effects are of course excellent.  They are consistently
good throughout the film, and for the high price-tag they well should be.
The creature itself manages to be CGI without looking too much like CGI, a
welcome change from the recent Lost In Space, which featured a CGI
creature that looked like a cartoonist had sketched it on the film with a
colored pencil.  The sound was pretty darned good as well, with lots of
good breathing, tail swooshes, and crunching buildings to entertain the
ears and the eyes.  Emmerich's direction was satisfactory, and there was
actually one nice bit of foreshadowing, however obvious it may have been,
when the camera follows a dirt road that the footprints are leading down,
and then fades into a shot of a city street.  
     The acting is satisfactory as well, but even the "names" in the cast
don't do anything spectacular.  Broderick is wooden and distant, even when
he's trying to show feelings for his lost love, Audrey.  Apparently even
the oft-heard Love Theme From Godzilla cannot stir his emotional fires.
The army is, as usual, portrayed as bunch of buffoons, who can't and don't
think.  They seem to choose the hard way to do things, even though every
10yr old in the audience is saying over and over "why can't they just send
a laser guided bomb after him from a high altitude."  The rainy helicopter
chases were actually kinda fun, though, even if a bit far fetched.  Of
course, the idea of a giant lizard is far-fetched as well.  The French
mercinaries are played for laughs as well, frowning at stinky coffee and
being saddened that they couldn't find a croissant.  The laughs I got out
of the film were from things not meant to be funny.  When Nick is staring
into the face of Godzilla, and the love theme was playing, I accidentally
said "phone home" in an ET voice and sent the surrounding three rows into
laughter.  The casting of Audrey again pokes one of my biggest movie
nerves, and that is the female leads looking 15 or 16, but actually being
28.  Her acting was fine, it's just it's hard for me to visualise maturity
when the character looks 16.  
     Some of the other items played for laughs are the chubby Mayor Ebert
and his sidekick and assistant Gene, who try to play out the political
ramifications of Godzilla, with all the appropriate thumbs up and down.
It got old really really really quickly.
     Overall, expect a typical summer flick, action, explosions, lack of
plot, cheesy characters, cheap humor, this one fits the formula to a tee.
And of course, following the lead of Lost Word, they pumped it into as
many theaters opening weekend as possible (a record amount) so by the time
the word of mouth got out, a great number of people had already plunked
down their $6-$10 to see it.  Nice plan, and I expect a lot of films are
going to follow the same formula.  So for what it was, it delivers, as a
piece of art...a film, it's kinda bleah.  I will give them one point for
class, though, they managed to avoid a lot of bodies being ripped...blood,
guts, and I didn't hear one wet squish.  
Of the $3.50 I paid for it, it was worth about $1.75
--

Author
John W. Collins
              It seems that the trend in Hollywood nowadays is to remake (or
as they call it "update") old films and television shows. Just last
month we had the movie version of LOST IN SPACE. Later this summer we
will see ZORRO, don his mask once again, and the British secret
agents, John Steed and Emma Peel, try to save the world in the big
screen treatment of the AVENGERS. Then for some ridiculous reason,
there are plans to "update" PSYCHO. Last reports were that Hitch was
still spinning in his grave.
        Now after months of hype that only a 50 million-dollar
advertising budget can buy, and a "let's not dare show the monster
until the movie opens" campaign, the men behind STARGATE and
INDEPENDENCE DAY, bring us the latest in this trend.
        GODZILLA, stomps its way into more than 7000 theaters starting
this week with a new look and a new attitude. The giant, radioactive,
reptile with atomic bad breath, was first brought to the screen in
1954, in Toho Studios' GOJIRA. Then scenes with Raymond Burr playing a
reporter  were inserted, the film was re-cut and released in the U.S.
as, GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS, in 1956. A legend was born. What
followed was a series of fun, campy, and sometimes out right silly, B
movies featuring the creature battling everything from Smog Monsters
to Godzilla robots controlled by aliens. 
        Director Roland Emmerich, producer Dean Devlin, and the man
responsible for Zilla's new look, Patrick Tatopoulos, have brought
Godzilla into the 90s with a complete make-over. He is now
streamlined, buff, and looks entirely different. The 1990's version of
Godzilla has him, as suggested in the movie, a mutated, lizard-like
creature, not a resurrected dinosaur. Gone is the stiff, plodding
monster with the "I'll take on anybody or anything" attitude. Now we
have a Zilla that is fast, agile, smart, and knows when to fight and
when to haul tail. Upon viewing, it is clear that the film's budget,
of 100 million dollars plus, was spent on its special effects, and
they are nothing less than spectacular. No man in a rubber suit,
cardboard buildings or toy tanks, here. This Godzilla doesn't just
march along stepping on buildings. He RUNS through the streets,
crashing into them, or just goes straight through them! Then his
longer, slimmed down tail does the rest of the damage.
        One of the problems with this kind of expensive, special
effects generated, title character, is that cost prevents you from
having him on the screen for the whole movie (in this case, 140
minutes).You need interesting characters, and a halfway good script to
fill up the rest of the time and hopefully add something to the story.
Unfortunately, this is where GODZILLA loses some of its firepower. The
story is not very plausible in places, the majority of the characters
are less than compelling, the film lacks any real emotion, and it even
stoops so low as to present two characters that are caricatures of
movie critics Roger Ebert and Gene Siskel (who panned INDEPENDENCE
DAY). Come on Roland and Dean (who wrote the screenplay), isn't that
just a little bit petty?
        Matthew Broerick does a competent job as Nick Tatopoulos (the
last name of Godzilla's designer, see above), a mild-mannered, nuclear
biologist that is called upon  to help figure out what has destroyed
and left claw-marks in several ships in the waters near Polynesia, and
has left a trail of HUGE footprints across Panama. After analyzing
blood samples, Broerick immediately suspects that a new species of
giant lizard may have been created as a result of  atomic testing. But
it is never really made clear why it is on its way to the Big Apple.
Broderick is proven right when the new and improved Godzilla comes
ashore in New York City at the Fulton Fish Market, in one of the most
dramatic "giant monster rises from the depths" sequences since the
giant squid attack on San Francisco in Ray Harryhausen's IT CAME FROM
BENEATH THE SEA. Fittingly, a clip from this film is playing on a
television in one of the latter scenes.
        The movie then goes back to its "giant monster running amok"
roots, with the military trying to figure out how to destroy it, the
political powers in charge worrying how a monster tearing up the city
is going to affect their chances for re-election, and the scientist
(Broderick) telling them they are all missing the big picture. Then
Broderick's long, lost, college sweetheart, who left him to try and
make it big as a reporter, is introduced as an "undiscovered" talent
working at a local television station as a lowly researcher. Played by
Maria Pitillo, Audrey Timmonds, is one of the most unappealing female
leads to come along in a while. Throughout the film, you find yourself
wishing Godzilla would stomp her or use her as an appetizer. But in
Pitillo's defense, she wasn't given very much to work with. She
unwittingly uses her connection with Broderick's character to gain
access to inside information for the story that will hopefully make
her a star. Hank Azaria (mainly used for comic relief and a plot
device) plays the husband of one of Pitillo's friends. A television
cameraman, nicknamed "Animal", Azaria also hopes that the lizard's
arrival will make his career. The film's only good character is
Philippe Roache. Posing as an insurance adjuster, Roache is a member
of the French Secret Service. It is suggested that France's atomic
testing created Godzilla, and he is there to "clean up the mess".
Played brilliantly by Jean Reno, he is searching New York for
Godzilla, and a good cup of coffee. Reno is one of the film's saving
graces; the other being the special effects.
        It is discovered that Godzilla can reproduce asexually and has
plans to use New York City as a nursery. Broderick then loses his
credibility and his spot on the team when the information that Patillo
has stolen from him is broadcast. His "nesting" theory is thrown out
the window and all efforts are concentrated on killing Godzilla.
Meanwhile, Reno "kidnaps" Broderick, and tells him that he believes
there is a nest and convinces Broderick to help him and his men hunt
it down. Foolishly, Patillo and Azaria follow them in an attempt to
make amends.
        After the nest is found, the film mutates into an almost
blatant rip-off of JURASSIC PARK's raptor sequences, with a little bit
of GREMLINS 2 thrown in for good measure. Then it is as if saner heads
prevailed and the movie gets back on track. Zilla appears and is
PISSED OFF at the way our heroes have treated his offspring. They
steal a cab and Godzilla gives chase in a final sequence that is
exciting, yet somewhat unbelievable at times. The ending is clever in
places, and cliched in others.
        After all the dust from all the destroyed buildings has
settled, GODZILLA is a disappointment. You have no empathy for the
characters, and there is nothing story- wise to chew on when the BIG
GUY is not on the screen. Nearly all the jokes misfire and some
characters are there for no apparent reason. Sadly, all the attention
was paid to the FX. It is almost like the old B-grade, gore movies of
the eighties, where poorly drawn characters were placed within a very
weak story, all created just to highlight a new special effect. It is
a shame that the Godzilla story was not "updated".
        But despite these flaws, the movie is fun and that is what a
summer movie is suppose to be. The younger generation will revel in
its roller coaster, high tech presentation of the monster and its
rampages, while older fans, who look for just a little bit more, will
shake their heads in slight disappointment. But they will enjoy seeing
that even after 44 years, one of its icons is still alive and kicking.
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria, Kevin
Dunn, Doug Savant, and Godzilla.
Rated PG13: some intense scenes, but could have been rated PG.
I give it *** , but the final star is given just on the strength of
the special effects.

Author
Shane Burridge
It's getting harder to stay ignorant.  In the mid-80s it was possible
to see films like ET or GREMLINS without knowing what the
effects-generated critters looked like beforehand.  It was a luxury
that imbued these films with a sense of mystery and event.  Godzilla
(the monster, not the movie) has been a different matter.  Toy
catalogues, film reviews, television advertisements, and every other
medium have been spewing out images of the Scaly One with such
prevalence that sneak previews of the lizard itself are almost
unavoidable.  And if it's not pics of Godzilla then it's the gossipy
giveaways of the storyline, or the reviews that get released even
before the movie makes it to the local multiplex.
I generally shut myself off from such spoilers, but this time around
the tone of the local reviews has made itself quite clear: The lizard
is a turkey; GODZILLA bites; the movie is a bomb.  So it was hardly
surprising by the time I got to the cinema that the non-expectations I
usually try to maintain had given way to very low expectations indeed.
 It was after seeing GODZILLA for myself, however, and thinking "This
isn't that badactually it's fun", that I suddenly realized I had been
missing the point all along: GODZILLA had been made specifically for
an audience of middle-aged film critics!  Not the teenagers and
families and SF/Fantasy/FX fans that filled the screening I had
attended.  They're not the target audience.  Obviously: they're not
the ones writing the reviews.  How could I have been so blind?
I'm aware that this is an old argument, and that sarcasm is a shoddy
platform on which to build it, but I don't see that it is any less
true.  Reviewing the reviewers, I discovered that every last grumpy
reptile-hating one of them had been over the age of 45.  I would
propose from this sample that this age henceforth be the point at
which all critics in the public domain are reassessed, in much the
same fashion that drivers licenses are renewed at certain age limits. 
It's clear to me that there are quite a few current reviewers licenses
that need serious re-examination, if not revoking.
It's clear also that the writing-directing-producing team of Roland
Emmerich and Dean Devlin knew the kind of critical reception their
popcorn movie would get, which explains why the film's most
ineffectual character is a non-too-subtle lampoon of critic Roger
Ebert, who had panned Emmerich and Devlin's earlier collaborations
INDEPENDENCE DAY and STARGATE.  I wouldn't think they are singling
Ebert out personally; it's just that he represents a critical
homogeneity they resent.  The collective hostility of this faction
will, I guess, be mainly directed to the contrast of two films,
JURASSIC PARK and the 1956 GODZILLA.  It's true that GODZILLA poaches
a lot of imagery from JURASSIC PARK and then simply amplifies it under
its self-promoted precept 'Size Does Matter', but if you view it in
terms of how Spielberg's film would look under the influence of a
couple of bennies then I don't see how you can miss the trippy,
demented fun of it all. If it's not a rush, it's still a ride.
It's the original GODZILLA, a cult movie with a huge following, that
provides the more challenging comparison.  It was a landmark film of
its type which established a new export market for Japanese films, but
at the risk of offending all Gojira fanatics, I have never understood
the appeal of the Toho-produced Godzilla films.  It was only when the
momentum of the series reached DESTROY ALL MONSTERS, in which every
available rubber suit was brought out of mothballs for one last
free-for-all scrap, that I could appreciate the divine absurdity of it
all.  Also going for the original was the large-scale destruction of
Tokyo (Godzilla's a lot meaner in his first appearance) which, again,
must have been impressive in 1956 - but isn't the destruction just as
impressive in 1998, even taking into account the current
sophistication of CGI?  And even the appeal of seeing cities flattened
was lost in the original series when the studios realized it was a lot
cheaper for Gojira and his cronies to slug it out in open countryside.
 From this point on it simply became men in costumes wrestling each
other, a trend which has still, mystifyingly, remained popular today
with such shows as POWER RANGERS.
But finally, I suppose, it is the allegorical connection that critics
will play as their trump card.  The original GODZILLA meant something:
it was a national psyche which watched itself being destroyed over and
over again, still smarting from the humiliation and disenfranchisement
of losing the war and the traumatisation of genbaku-sho and other
effects of the Holocaust.  How can the 1998 version compete with that?
 It can't, and it doesn't try.  Instead, it's a calculated,
hypermarketed cash cow.  If Godzilla allegorizes anything , then it is
the seemingly unstoppable power of the Hollywood money machine,
trampling merry hell over all those who have grown out of its
demographic.  GODZILLA becomes a battle of beasts; not just Ebert
versus a lizard, but the Godzilla of film critics against the Godzilla
of summer blockbusters.
At the end it appears I have not said one thing, good nor bad, about
GODZILLA itself.  But that's okay.  It may leave you free to see it
for yourself without any expectations.  And if you still have no idea
what the monster looks like, I take my hat off to you.  By this stage
that would be no mean feat.  But I should point out, however, that I
still do not know what happens in the final episode of SEINFELD.  Beat
that if you can.

Author
Mark R. Leeper
     In 1954 there was an anti-American uproar in Japan.  A Japanese
fishing boat had unknowingly caught fish contaminated by an American
nuclear test.  The fishermen had been sickened but not in time to stop
the fish from going to market. Japanese newspapers called the incident
another American atomic attack on Japan.  The Toho film company took
outrage from this incident as inspiration.  That combined with the
recent successes of the film THE BEAST FROM 20,000 FATHOMS and the re-
release of KING KONG inspired them to make their own monster movie.
This was the bleak and very angry film GOJIRA.  In the story Gojira was
a mythical beast identified with a 200-foot radioactive dinosaur who
comes out of the Pacific.  Made on a very small post-war budget, it
very ingeniously stretched some inexpensive special effects to massive
effect.  Some of the sets initially used wax miniatures of large
structures to save money.  Under harsh studio lights these props wilted
and melted.  As an inspiration an aerosol spray was added to the hand
puppet that was Gojira's head together with the wilt effect combined so
Gojira had breath that would fry chicken.
     American film entrepreneur Joseph E. Levine saw GOJIRA and seemed
oblivious to the anti-American tenor of the film.  He crudely added
additional footage with American actor Raymond Burr.  The name "GOJIRA"
probably sounded too Japanese for a country that had so recently been
fought a vicious war with Japan, so the name of the monster was
slightly modified to be less Japanese sounding but to still fit the
same lip movements.  The resulting film was redubbed GODZILLA, KING OF
THE MONSTERS. The Americans turned this little anti-American film into
a big international success, the first such success that there had ever
been in the Japanese film industry.  Godzilla has remained an enduring
character in Japanese film, even as the character has been repeatedly
modified.  Two series of monster films have been built around him.
Finally it was decided little more could be milked from the character,
and Toho killed him off and licensed the copyright to be used by other
studios.  Roland Emmerich who made the films STARGATE and INDEPENDENCE
DAY apparently wanted to do his own giant monster film.  No name they
could give their creature would have the marquee value of calling their
beast Godzilla.
     While the new Godzilla may indeed have been inspired by Toho's
monster, the thing that they have ended up with has more differences
than similarities.  The new Godzilla is a mutant marine iguana owing
its unusual genetics to French nuclear testing in French Polynesia.
(Incidentally, there are no marine lizards in French Polynesia.  The
only marine lizard in the world is the marine iguana, and it is found
only in the Galapagos Islands.)  The creature, who would appear to be
about a hundred feet high, with powerful enough hind legs that it walks
bipedally, though bent over.  The massive creature destroys a number of
boats on its way from Polynesia to New York City, fulfilling a mission
of his own.
     Called in to investigate is Dr. Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew
Broderick), an expert in atomic mutation called from a three-year study
of earthworm mutation at Chernobyl.  Nick follows in the wake of
destruction left by the never-seen titanic beast destroying ships.
Also following in the wake seems to be a sort of French secret agent,
Philippe Roche played Jean Reno of LEON (in the US: THE PROFESSIONAL)
and of MISSION IMPOSSIBLE.
     A full scale Godzilla movie with the sort of quality special
effects that the Japanese could not afford to lavish on the film was,
at least for me, an exciting idea.  Unfortunately, this was not the
film I was hoping for.  The approach of GODZILLA is intended to be in
large part comic, but only Jean Reno manages to make the humor really
funny.  Michael Lerner plays New York City Mayor Ebert and is made up
to look like Roger Ebert.  His assistant is Gene and looks just enough
like Gene Siskel for us to realize that that is the point of the joke.
But the joke just falls flat as often as it is used.  As with
INDEPENDENCE DAY there are several scenes that are homage to previous
films, also just not very amusing.  The film painfully lacks logic.
People do some totally unmotivated actions to keep the plot going,
though it often slows to a snail's pace.  Or the plot will move forward
by contrivance.  Nico suddenly get the urge to do a very specialized
chemical test on Godzilla's blood.  It turns out he is looking for a
result he apparently had no reason to suspect and which on the face of
it seems impossible.  But of course it turns out to be just the key
chemical test to move the plot forward.  Many of the effects and the
thrill scenes are borrowed directly from JURASSIC PARK.  The love story
awkwardly thrown into the mix is totally superfluous.  The empty
plotting and failed humor attempts are certainly not new to Godzilla
films, but it was hoped that they would be left behind with the low-
budget special effects flaws.
     The Japanese I have talked to have been anxious to see what
GODZILLA was to be like with good effects and a serious plot.  I am
sorry to say that I expect that they will be disappointed.  I rate this
one a disappointing 4 on the 0 to 10 scale and a low 0 on the -4 to +4
scale.

Author
Zach Fine
Godzilla - The Plot is as Long as This Sentence 
The burgeoning art of reptilian animation has made steady gains in
realism since the charming 1914 silent animation short Gertie the
Dinosaur. Certainly, the first photorealistic dinosaur animations were
as fascinating to filmgoers watching Jurassic Park as were the early
Edison studios' films of elephants walking and bathing to viewers at the
turn of the century. Yet audiences eventually tired of watching
pachyderms walking single-file, and so too might Godzilla mark a turning
point in the history of film - the film which showed that big animated
lizards could be boring.
The archetypal big lizard first appeared in the 1954 Japanese film
Gojira, which was dubbed, re-edited, and in some scenes re-shot with
American actors for its 1956 U.S. release. The film, which was made less
than a decade after the atomic bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki,
features a gigantic radioactive monster which rises from the Pacific,
breathes atomic fire, and leaves entire Japanese cities in ruin.
Sure, Gojira may be a schlocky monster movie that features a guy in a
rubber suit who stomps on model buildings, but it is surprisingly
resonant. Scenes of doctors shaking their heads as they wave Geiger
counters over screaming children whose lifeless parents are carted off
on stretchers carry surprising emotional weight. The monster itself,
while bipedal, was hardly anthropomorphic. Gojira was a force of nature,
a gigantic, glistening, mindless monster which appeared for no apparent
reason, spreading terror, destruction and radiation in its wake. Gojira
was more than a 'B' movie.
The new Godzilla is much less. Writer-director Roland Emmerich and
writer Dean Devlin, with the help of $160 million dollars and a
top-of-the-line computer- animated marine iguana, have managed to create
a brain-dead pile of hype.
In the film, the powers that be become alarmed at the growing evidence
that points to the possible existence of a large and destructive
radioactive dinosaur. They assemble a pool of scientists and in so doing
interrupt the work of nerdy scientist Nick Tatopoulos (a helium-voiced
and irritating Matthew Broderick), whose ha-ha funny name and chosen
career of studying large radioactive earthworms in Chernobyl comprise
fully 50% of the film's humor. Meanwhile, Audrey Timmonds (a
helium-voiced, whiny, and pitiful Maria Pitillo), who aspires to be a
broadcast news correspondent, instead finds herself relegated to the job
of 'random office worker and sexual harassment recipient' at a
television network. But when she realizes that she might be able to
steal top-secret documents from Nick, her former lover, she figures
she's got it made.
So much for background. The big iguana arrives at the 25-minute mark
and starts tearing up the Big Apple. Nick chases Godzilla, Audrey chases
Nick, and the military descends with an order of magnitude more
helicopters than were used in Apocalypse Now. Godzilla turns out to be a
difficult lizard to take down, what with those missile-proof scales,
that atomic-fire breath, and knowledge of The Hunt for Red October. The
incompetent and tyrannical Mayor Ebert (Michael Lerner) isn't all that
happy watching his city become rubble, but the filmmakers enjoy making
him look stupid as payback for his namesake's tepid review of
Independence Day. Nick then discovers that Godzilla's laid a bunch of
eggs, but nobody believes him except a French secret agent who can't
find a decent cup of coffee (Jean Reno of La Femme Nikita) and his
fearless crew (all named Jean), who provide the remaining 50% of the
film's humor because, well, they're French.
Eventually, the eggs start hatching and the velociraptors - er, baby
Godzillas - hatch and Nick starts theorizing that, ulp, this could be
the end of humanity as we know it ...
Will humanity survive? Will Nick and Audrey get back together? Will she
apologize to him for having had the gall to believe in herself enough to
leave him for her career? Will she get the big story? Will room for a
sequel be implied at the end?
Frankly, the only real surprise in the film is the realization of
Godzilla herself. Sure, the filmmakers had plenty of bad decisions to
make. They ignored the 20-plus sequels and took nothing from the
original Gojira besides the transliterated name and basic premise,
choosing instead to set an extended Jurassic Park; The Lost World in New
York. They chose to make the film two hours and 20 minutes long. They
chose to cast the tiresome Matthew Broderick in a major role and
relegate the über-talented Hank Azaria to a supporting role. They made
the female protagonist as feeble and flawed as possible. But to actually
expect audiences to be scared by a large marine iguana?
It is a bit of a rabbit punch to go after this film for scientific
inaccuracy, but it seems an odd choice to fashion the big scary monster
after one of the only vegetarian reptiles. In reality, if a marine
iguana were to swim all the way across the Pacific Ocean (from the
Galapagos Islands to French Polynesia), then was exposed to radiation
from nuclear testing which caused it to either grow really big or
produce really big offspring, one might expect an iguana-derived
Godzilla to eat tons of algae, sneeze salt all over the protagonists,
and find a nice warm power plant to bask on.
Although the iguana in the film is lovingly rendered, dewlap and all,
it is not terribly scary. Neither is the film Godzilla exciting,
interesting, entertaining or even mildly amusing.
Article first appeared in the Thursday, May 28, 1998 Arts section of The
Daily of the University of Washington. 
http://www.thedaily.washington.edu/archives/1998_Spring/May.28.98/godzilla.5.27.html

Author
C.J HILL
Based on the infamous Japenese legend, Godzilla is a tale of a huge lizard,
it's mutated size caused by French nuclear testing.  It's taller than the
Empire State Building and has a huge appetite! What's worse, is that
Godzilla has suddenly turned up in New York and is causing loadsa chaos as
it tramples around, it's purpose unclear.
Naturally, the authorities are somewhat distressed at a huge lizard
wrecking buildings and doing untold damage, so the chase is on to destroy
this monster before it flattens the city. Add to the affray Matthew
Broderick, a nuclear scientist and Jean Reno, a French secret service agent
and you have a mix for two hours of fun.
Performances are quite good all round. Jean Reno (Leon) although underused,
is excellent.  There are some unexepected digs at the expense of the
Americans, courtesy of chewing gum and coffee (you'll see) and Broderick
gives some occasional, fine, comic deliveries.
Naturally, the real stars of Godzilla are the special effects.  Seen before
in Independence Day, they are provided again here to provide some quite
spectacular scences of chaos and destruction.
On the downside, the story isn't really strong enough to sustain the two
hours and I felt my attention occasionally wandering.  Some scences in
Godzilla will strongly remind you of Jurassic park and this film could have
been easily wrapped up in 90 minutes.
Putting these flaws aside, Godzilla is a fun romp.  The effects are quite
something, there are some great chase scences and even some quite tense
moments.  Worth seeing, especially for kids, they'll love it.

Author
James Berardinelli
United States, 1998
U.S. Release Date: 5/20/98 (wide)
Running Length: 2:12
MPAA Classification: PG-13 (Typical monster movie disaster scenario)
Theatrical Aspect Ratio: 2.35:1
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, 
      Kevin Dunn, Michael Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field
Director: Roland Emmerich
Producers: Dean Devlin
Screenplay: Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich
Cinematography: Ueli Steiger
Music: David Arnold
U.S. Distributor: TriStar Pictures
     GODZILLA is the ultimate culmination of the "who cares about plot" 
summer movie.  A loose remake of the 1954 "classic" Japanese monster 
movie, GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS (which is itself pretty thin in 
the story department), Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin's big-budget 
lizard-stomps-Manhattan disaster flick has been written with the brain 
dead in mind.  The script isn't just "dumbed down," it's lobotomized.  
GODZILLA lives and dies on special effects alone.  
     Presumably, the primary target group for this film is teenage boys, 
the demographic most likely to shell out $7 repeatedly to see the same 
images of monster-instigated carnage. That's not to say that females and 
other age groups are immune to the special effects seduction; they're 
just not as readily susceptible.  This is the third straight movie in a 
row where Emmerich and Devlin have demonstrated that a mastery of 
computer-generated visuals is far more important for making money than 
the ability to write and direct for actors.  STARGATE was a financial 
success.  INDEPENDENCE DAY was a runaway hit.  And, with GODZILLA 
already drowning in hype and merchandising tie-ins before it even opens, 
it's virtually guaranteed at least $100 million.  Nice numbers for a 
film that could have been penned by a not-too-precocious grade school 
kid.  
     GODZILLA isn't completely without merit, although it is close.  
There's a certain visceral thrill inherent in watching the giant lizard 
rip his way through Manhattan, but it wears off quickly.  Frankly, while 
the special effects are competent, they're not all that stunning.  
There's nothing new here; it's JURASSIC PARK meets ALIENS, with a little 
INDEPENDENCE DAY thrown in for bad measure.  Maybe it will require 
George Lucas and his new STAR WARS movie to take computer-generated 
visuals to the next level.  GODZILLA never really pushes the envelope, 
preferring to remain within a comfort zone.  The imagination of monster 
movies like KING KONG has been replaced by a crass, formulaic approach 
which disallows creativity.  (How disturbing is it to know that GODZILLA 
has been chosen to close the 51st Cannes Film Festival?)
     Worst of all, GODZILLA isn't even exciting.  With the possible 
exception of a mildly enjoyable car chase near the end, there isn't a 
sequence in this film that raises the pulse.  Even the scenes with 
dozens of aircraft attacking the monster are so devoid of tension and 
suspense that they are yawn-provoking.  INDEPENDENCE DAY may have been 
dumb, but it was full of "adrenaline moments" capable of getting the 
audience involved in the action.  In this aspect of its production, as 
in so many others, GODZILLA is lacking.  Actually, part of the problem 
is that we're never sure who we're supposed to be rooting for:  the 
green monster with an attitude or the paper-thin humans trying to stop 
him.
     The plot, such as it is, can be summed up rather simply.  After 
sinking a few ships and leaving some footprints on tropical islands, 
Godzilla shows up in the Big Apple.  He does some of the usual tourist 
things:  stops by Madison Square Garden, visits the Chrysler Building, 
goes on a walk through Central Park, and takes the subway.  In the 
process, he knocks over a few buildings and steps on countless cabs, but 
he never has trouble with traffic jams.  On hand to stop him is an elite 
U.S. army unit, led by a slightly less-arrogant-than-usual military man 
(Kevin Dunn) and a biologist named Nick Tatopoulos, who has a theory 
about Godzilla.  In his opinion, the big guy is actually a lizard grown 
to enormous proportions as a result of the radiation given off by French 
atomic bomb tests in the South Pacific.  In Nick's words, Godzilla is "a 
mutated aberration An incipient creature The first of its kind."  As 
luck would have it, Nick's old girlfriend, Audrey (Maria Pitillo), is a 
reporter based at a New York TV station.  Along with her cameraman 
friend, Animal (Hank Azaria), she decides to follow Nick around as he 
trails Godzilla.  Then, just when the military has rejected Nick's 
theory about why Godzilla is in New York, a member of the French Secret 
Service (Jean Reno) recruits him for a special assignment.
     Instead of stomping around Tokyo this time, Godzilla has chosen New 
York City.  Unfortunately, Manhattan has been destroyed so many times in 
recent disaster movies (INDEPENDENCE DAY, DEEP IMPACT, ARMAGEDDON) that 
it's becoming boring.  The whole tradition of monsters roaming around 
the city started with KING KONG, but the big ape was only about 30 feet 
tall.  He could climb the Empire State Building.  At ten times that 
height, Godzilla would be more likely to knock it over.
     GODZILLA contains a few lame attempts at humor.  There's an ongoing 
feud between Animal and his wife that plays like sit-com material, an 
unfunny and repetitive gag about how no one can pronounce Nick's last 
name properly, and a rather tame attack on film critics Roger Ebert and 
Gene Siskel.  Both of the popular personalities have alter egos in the 
film:  "Ebert," the mayor of New York, is played by Michael Lerner, and 
"Gene" (Lorry Goldman) is his campaign manager.  Ebert's re-election 
slogan is, not surprisingly, "Thumbs Up for New York."  The Siskel/Ebert 
stuff is amusing the first time it's used, but, after a while, it grows 
tiresome.  And, although the "characters" don't serve any real purpose, 
they keep popping up. 
     GODZILLA is saddled with an unimpressive cast.  This is largely 
because Emmerich doesn't want to risk a human performance upstaging his 
lizard.  That's not to say that Matthew Broderick and Jean Reno aren't 
capable of good performances (both have done their share of solid acting 
in the past), but they aren't A-list names.  Then again, considering the 
quality of the writing, even Pacino and DeNiro would have been hard-
pressed to shine.  Maria Pitillo (DEAR GOD) plays the love interest and 
Hank Azaria (GREAT EXPECTATIONS) is on hand to present what is supposed 
to be comic relief.
     Ultimately, it doesn't really matter what I (or any other critic, 
for that matter) have to say about the movie.  TriStar has assumed that 
GODZILLA, like all self-proclaimed summer event motion pictures, is 
pretty much critic-proof.  It may also be word-of-mouth-proof.  Those 
who want to see the movie will see it no matter what I write or their 
friends say.  So, when I go on record to assert that GODZILLA is one of 
the most idiotic blockbuster movies of all time, it's like spitting into 
the wind.  Emmerich and Devlin are master illusionists, waving their 
wands and mesmerizing audiences with their smoke and mirrors.  It's 
probably too much to hope that some day, movie-goers will wake up and 
realize that they've been had.
Now with more than 1400 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"My belief is that no movie, nothing in life, leaves people neutral. You
either leave them up or you leave them down."

Author
Shane Burridge
It's getting harder to stay ignorant.  In the mid-80s it was possible to 
see films like ET or GREMLINS without knowing what the effects-generated 
critters looked like beforehand.  It was a luxury that imbued these 
films with a sense of mystery and event.  Godzilla (the monster, not the 
movie) has been a different matter.  Toy catalogues, film reviews, 
television advertisements, and every other medium have been spewing out 
images of the Scaly One with such prevalence that sneak previews of the 
lizard itself are almost unavoidable.  And if it's not pics of Godzilla 
then it's the gossipy giveaways of the storyline, or the reviews that 
get released even before the movie makes it to the local multiplex.
I generally shut myself off from such spoilers, but this time around the 
tone of the local reviews has made itself quite clear: The lizard is a 
turkey; GODZILLA bites; the movie is a bomb.  So it was hardly 
surprising by the time I got to the cinema that the non-expectations I 
usually try to maintain had given way to very low expectations indeed.  
It was after seeing GODZILLA for myself, however, and thinking "This 
isn't that badactually it's fun", that I suddenly realized I had been 
missing the point all along: GODZILLA had been made specifically for an 
audience of middle-aged film critics!  Not the teenagers and families 
and SF/Fantasy/FX fans that filled the screening I had attended.  
They're not the target audience.  Obviously: they're not the ones 
writing the reviews.  How could I have been so blind?
I'm aware that this is an old argument, and that sarcasm is a shoddy 
platform on which to build it, but I don't see that it is any less true.  
Reviewing the reviewers, I discovered that every last grumpy 
reptile-hating one of them had been over the age of 45.  I would propose 
from this sample that this age henceforth be the point at which all 
critics in the public domain are reassessed, in much the same fashion 
that drivers licenses are renewed at certain age limits.  It's clear to 
me that there are quite a few current reviewers licenses that need 
serious re-examination, if not revoking.
It's clear also that the writing-directing-producing team of Roland 
Emmerich and Dean Devlin knew the kind of critical reception their 
popcorn movie would get, which explains why the film's most ineffectual 
character is a non-too-subtle lampoon of critic Roger Ebert, who had 
panned Emmerich and Devlin's earlier collaborations INDEPENDENCE DAY and 
STARGATE.  I wouldn't think they are singling Ebert out personally; it's 
just that he represents a critical homogeneity they resent.  The 
collective hostility of this faction will, I guess, be mainly directed 
to the contrast of two films, JURASSIC PARK and the 1956 GODZILLA.  It's 
true that GODZILLA poaches a lot of imagery from JURASSIC PARK and then 
simply amplifies it under its self-promoted precept 'Size Does Matter', 
but if you view it in terms of how Spielberg's film would look under the 
influence of a couple of bennies then I don't see how you can miss the 
trippy, demented fun of it all. If it's not a rush, it's still a ride.
It's the original GODZILLA, a cult movie with a huge following, that 
provides the more challenging comparison.  It was a landmark film of its 
type which established a new export market for Japanese films, but at 
the risk of offending all Gojira fanatics, I have never understood the 
appeal of the Toho-produced Godzilla films.  It was only when the 
momentum of the series reached DESTROY ALL MONSTERS, in which every 
available rubber suit was brought out of mothballs for one last 
free-for-all scrap, that I could appreciate the divine absurdity of it 
all.  Also going for the original was the large-scale destruction of 
Tokyo (Godzilla's a lot meaner in his first appearance) which, again, 
must have been impressive in 1956 - but isn't the destruction just as 
impressive in 1998, even taking into account the current sophistication 
of CGI?  And even the appeal of seeing cities flattened was lost in the 
original series when the studios realized it was a lot cheaper for 
Gojira and his cronies to slug it out in open countryside.  From this 
point on it simply became men in costumes wrestling each other, a trend 
which has still, mystifyingly, remained popular today with such shows as 
POWER RANGERS.
But finally, I suppose, it is the allegorical connection that critics 
will play as their trump card.  The original GODZILLA meant something: 
it was a national psyche which watched itself being destroyed over and 
over again, still smarting from the humiliation and disenfranchisement 
of losing the war and the traumatisation of genbaku-sho and other 
effects of the Holocaust.  How can the 1998 version compete with that?  
It can't, and it doesn't try.  Instead, it's a calculated, hypermarketed 
cash cow.  If Godzilla allegorizes anything , then it is the seemingly 
unstoppable power of the Hollywood money machine, trampling merry hell 
over all those who have grown out of its demographic.  GODZILLA becomes 
a battle of beasts; not just Ebert versus a lizard, but the Godzilla of 
film critics against the Godzilla of summer blockbusters.
At the end it appears I have not said one thing, good nor bad, about 
GODZILLA itself.  But that's okay.  It may leave you free to see it for 
yourself without any expectations.  And if you still have no idea what 
the monster looks like, I take my hat off to you.  By this stage that 
would be no mean feat.  But I should point out, however, that I still do 
not know what happens in the final episode of SEINFELD.  Beat that if 
you can.


Author
Doug Skiles
Starring: Matthew Broderick (Dr. Niko "Nick" Tatopoulos), Maria Pitillo
(Audrey Timmonds), Jean Reno (Philippe Roache), Hank Azaria (Victor
"Animal" Palotti), Harry Shearer (Charles Caiman), Kevin Dunn (Colonel
Hicks), Arabella Field (Lucy Palotti), Doug Savant (Sergeant O'Neal),
Vicki Lewis (Dr. Elsie Chapman), Michael Lerner (Mayor Ebert), Lorry
Goldman (Gene), and Godzilla as himself
Directed by: Roland Emmerich, Written by: Dean Devlin & Roland Emmerich
Rated PG-13 for violence, mild profanity, and mild sexual innuendo
Plus he's mad, he's bad, and he's either green or grey/black depending
on your point of view.  He's Godzilla, and he's been a long time in
coming to Hollywood.  Back in the summer of 1992 I got a small poster
advertising the coming of this Tri-Star film, to be released in the
summer of 1993.  He didn't come.  JURASSIC PARK (1993) dinosaurs came,
but no Godzilla.  Well, now it's the summer of 1998.  Five years is
pretty damn off target.  
Still, now that he's arrived, he certainly did it in style.  $120
million dollars were spent on the big guy.  Not bad for someone who's
essentially a reptile with a nasty growth spurt.
Godzilla's story, in this new film, is that he was a simple lizard who
got nuked.  Yes, while merely a young egg at a nuclear testing site, a
bomb was dropped in the area and the resulting radiation has caused our
little green friend... well, he looks green to me... to grow to enormous
proportions.
This incident isn't without precedent - turns out that Dr. Niko
Tatopoulos - you can call him Nick - has been studying the effects of
radiation on the earthworms in Chernobyl in the Ukraine.  It turns out
that they've grown 17% in size since the incident there on April 26,
1986.  With his experience in the effects of radiation on biological
specimens, the U.S. military is soon calling on the good doctor to help
investigate a new creature who's managed to take out a sub and go
traveling across Panama.  The only survivor of the sub attack is a
Japanese man who seems only able to say one word - "Gojira." 
Turns out that this "Gojira" is heading to New York.  He gets there,
causes trouble, and pretty soon a local reporter has gotten ahold of a
video of the previous sightings of this beast, leading to the network's
anchor, Charles Caiman, misinterpreting the Japanese man on the tape and
calling this gargantuan beast "Godzilla."
GODZILLA is yet another example of a movie that's dumb... but fun. 
Often very fun.  Of course, it's from Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich,
the creators of INDEPENDENCE DAY (1996), which was a prime example of
"dumb fun," although it glorified we Americans a bit too much.  I
imagine it didn't play too well outside of this country.  Well, I'd say
that GODZILA is a better film, if only because I prefer the green guy to
anonymous aliens.  
Fans of the classic Godzilla will be pleased to note a few things. 
Godzilla's roar still sounds pretty much the same, a scientist is still
the hero, and Godzilla is once again bugged momentarily by electricity
in one scene, as he was in KING KONG VS. GODZILLA (1962), even though
electricity didn't bug the big G at all back in the original GODZILLA,
KING OF THE MONSTERS (1954).  There's a few other touches from the past,
too, that I won't reveal here.
The characters are paper-thin, but at least everyone does their job
well.  There's really not a person in the bunch that doesn't perform
satisfactorily - it's just a shame that their parts weren't written
better.  Of course, compare these characters to those in all of the old
Godzilla films, and they're look like they've got a full psychological
profile by contrast.  Hank Azaria is a particular standout, and Jean
Reno is the epitome of cool, as he always is.  Matthew Broderick is
surprisingly strong as well.  Maria Pitillo plays her role quite nicely,
but the fact is, she has the most underwritten role of the group.  She
seems to be there primarily to take up screen time and act as a love
interest for Broderick.  Still, I doubt anyone else could've played the
role much better, and I'm sure she's happy to be in such a major release
film.
Oh, I should mention the Siskel and Ebert mayor and sidekick.   Yes, the
mayor is named Ebert, and his assistant is named Gene.  They also use
"thumbs up" and "thumbs down" symbols for campaigning, yelling at each
other, etc, throughout the movie.  I'm not sure if it was a homage or an
insult, but either way, it's just a weird little joke that doesn't
detract from the movie at all - it's just there.
The direction by Emmerich is nicely handled, and the score by David
Arnold, who also worked on INDEPENDENCE DAY as well as the recent
eighteenth James Bond film, TOMORROW NEVER DIES (1997), is his usual
expert work.
But, of course, the real star of the show is Godzilla himself.  And boy,
does he look fantastic.  The new design of the beast isn't the way you
remember Godzilla, but it still FEELS like Godzilla, and that's what
counts.  Plus it's huge, threatening, and quite cool.  The effects on
the monster?  Flawless.  All of the movie's effects are perfect, with
nice little touches throughout, such as the damage Godzilla does by
scraping his tail along the side of a building.  It's the little things
like that that really take your breath away.  After all, we've seen
large scaly beasts before.  Of course, not THIS large... 
And when the action sequences get going, they're the best part of the
movie.  Thrilling, and sometimes adding genuine tension to the mix,
especially in the last 40 minutes of film, these alone are worth the
price of admission.  Some people have complained that they resemble
elements of JURASSIC PARK too heavily.  Well, I promise you, only ONE
scene resembles anything from JURASSIC PARK, and that is a face-off in
the latter half of the movie that's somewhat similar to the "raptors in
the kitchen" scene from the first Spielberg dinosaur film.  However, I'm
happy to report that it more than holds its own with that great
sequence, and in fact, in a number of ways it surpasses it.  Absolutely
nothing else in GODZILLA resembles anything from JURASSIC PARK or its
sequel in any way, shape, or form.
It's interesting to note that most of the movie's action takes place at
night, and pretty much all of the entire show occurs in the rain.  It's
a very nice atmospheric touch, almost making this a monster noir film. 
Interesting.
GODZILLA is another typical American summer film.  It's dumb, but it's a
lot of fun.  Will something better come along this summer?  I guess
we'll have to wait and see.  Some people will find that GODZILLA doesn't
live up to the hype, but then again, what COULD live up to this much
advance promotion?  It's still a good time.  Dumb writing and thin
characters hurt it, but this movie isn't supposed to be art, it's only
supposed to be fun.  And on that level, it delivers just fine.
"Wrong floor." - Dr. "Nick" Tatopoulos

Author
Walter Frith
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Cheer up.  This time you won't see the actors lips moving before or
after their out of synch dialogue.  This production of 'Godzilla' is a
high tech marvel from the team of Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich who
brought 'Independence Day' to movie screens in 1996.
Inspired by the revolutionary special effects of 1993's 'Jurassic Park',
'Godzilla', plain and simple, is a popcorn movie that is beyond the high
brow realm of major criticism and is one of those movie's that despite
the rigid criticism it will receive for its uneven concoction of action
and character fluff, still offers the pleasant and familiar cliches of
an electrifying monster movie.
A geographical map is displayed during the film's opening credits as we
see the South Pacific location of French Polynesia and the nuclear tests
being conducted by the French government in and around that region that
have been going for some 30 odd years or so and the genetic mutant of
the experiments gone awry is, or course, 'Godzilla'.  The first sign of
his existence comes at the expense of a Japanese boat crew who get
demolished one night in the Pacific Ocean and a member of the French
Secret Service (Jean Reno), confronts one of the survivors who describes
the eerie tale on videotape which later comes out.  The initial story is
also set up through a scene in Chernobyl, Ukraine where a nuclear
containment specialist named Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick) is
measuring the effects of the 1986 Chernobyl disaster on earth worms and
discovers that a number of them are 17% larger than they were were
before the nuclear fallout and later applies this theory of nuclear
contamination to explain the Godzilla phenomenon.  Nick is re-assigned
from his current exploration of Chernobyl to other locations where signs
of the giant lizard appear and eventually come to fulfillment in the Big
Apple.  New York City is the perfect playground for the monster as
Manhattan is an island where the creature can roam at will on either
land or in the water.
The New York characters are stereotypical of the city that never
sleeps.  An aspiring and bubbly attractive young t.v. reporter named
Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo) and a camera man name Animal (Hank
Azaria) from the station she works at, work together despite the
objections of Animal's wife Lucy (Arabella Field) to get involved in the
Godzilla frenzy when all hell breaks loose.  Audrey is perceived as a
sex toy by a sleazy local anchor man (Harry Shearer) who refuses to give
her the big break in television reporting she so desperately wants.  She
and Matthew Broderick's character were old college flames who meet each
other during the breaking story and they rekindle their feelings for
each other in a somewhat awkward manner.
The NYC Mayor (Michael Lerner) and the leader of a crack military
operation (Kevin Dunn) exchange sparring words of conflict over the
handling of Godzilla's destruction and the movie glides along, somewhat
unevenly, during the attempts at dialogue the all around characters
exchange.
There are many scenes delivered in much of the same way they were
showcased in 'Independence Day'.  There are several scenes where the
military men go after the beast by air power and bombard it with
gunfire, missiles and other tactics as we witnessed in the attack of the
mother ship in ID.
Roland Emmerich directs 'Godzilla' in a typical way we've seen from time
to time where the creator doesn't want you to see the beast in its full
form as Steven Spielberg demonstrated in 'Jaws' where the shark wasn't
completely visible until well into its running time.  We see Godzilla's
tail, his foot, his eye, his head, all edited in quick and scattered
shots of temptation before the big show.  His rampage through New York
City is furious and heavy as several landmark buildings are destroyed
and Godzilla marks his territory with the next generation of lizards in
the form of unhatched eggs which work their way into the plot rather
well to give the film some meaning in its second half.
The screenplay by Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin isn't really clever
enough to offer any real surprises.  The film is an all out display of
big studio dollars spent during the first of many summer months to draw
a large crowd of movie goers who hopefully will enjoy a film that based
on its well established name, will self by itself.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
R. L. Strong
"GODZILLA"
Review by R. L. Strong
TriStar Pictures presents a Fried Films/ Centropolis Film Production
in association with Independent Pictures
Matthew Broderick    Jean Reno    Maria Pitillo    Hank Azaria    Kevin Dunn
Cinematography by Ueli Steiger.    Original Score by David Arnold.
Production Design by Oliver Scholl.
Edited by  Peter Amundson and David Siegel.
Special Visual Effects by Volker Engel.
Godzilla Design and Supervision by Patrick Tatopoulos.
Co-Executive Producers  Robert N. Fried  & Cary Woods.  
Co-Produced by Peter Winther, & Kelly Van Horn.
Executive Producers: William Fay, Ute Emmerich, and Roland Emmerich.
Produced by Dean Devlin.
Story by  Ted Elliott & Terry Rossio, Roland Emmerich & Dean Devlin.
Screenplay by Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich.
Directed by Roland Emmerich.
Running time: 138 minutes.   Rated PG-13
Let's get this one over with as quickly as possible. If there was a
possibility to receive a refund, this review would not be
forthcoming. But as it is, "Godzilla" is without a doubt the loudest,
longest, and ultimately most amateurishly written film ever released
through a major studio. Producer Dean Devlin and Director Roland
Emmerich should be ashamed of themselves, and as penance be forced to
return to film school to watch "Last Year at Merienbad" until they can
grasp the idea of content and plot. No amount of hype, no amount of
money can hide the fact that these filmmakers are the 90s equivalent
to William Beaudine (Billy the Kid VS. Dracula).
"Godzilla" opens with stock footage of the Bikini Atoll nuclear tests
interspersed with footage of iguanas playfully swimming and nuzzling
their eggs. We are then introduced to the crew of a Japanese fish
canning ship (a questionable enterprise considering that tuna
processing is supposed to be supervised to eliminate the netting of
dolphins).  Well, the ship is attacked and sunk by an unseen
creature. Later, a group of Frenchmen led by Philippe Roache (Jean
Reno) interview the sole survivor. In a state of shock, the only thing
the man can utter is the word "Gojira" (the Japanese name of the famed
beast).
We are then introduced to Dr. Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick, with
a moniker obviously taken from the effects designer of the film). He
is currently studying the effects that the Chernobyl disaster has had
on the local earthworm population. He is immediately drafted by the
U.S. military and taken to Panama where he is shown the huge
footprints of a creature.
In a short amount of time, another fishing boat (loaded with canned
tuna from the U.S. and Korea for some reason) is found grounded in
Jamaica. Well, it seems that whatever is eating these ships is headed
for New York. When the beast finally appears, he tears up one
building, stomps a couple of trucks and makes life hell for the
Incumbent Mayor Ebert (thumbs up for New York). The military, with
Dr. Tatopoulos's help, have two tons of fresh fish dumped in the
middle of New York to lure the beast out of its hiding place in the
New York subway system. It finally comes crashing through the city
streets and has a cute face to face with Dr. Tatopoulos who snaps the
beast's picture. The monster eats the fish, the military starts
shooting, and the chase is on, with the Army causing 90% of the
ensuing damage.
Working from a hunch as to why Godzilla has decided to come to the Big
Apple, Dr.Totopoulos buys a few home pregnancy kits from a local
drugstore that has chosen to remain open (even though New York has
been evacuated). Well the test proves that the monster is a
hermaphrodite and is pregnant. Needless to say, no one believes the
good doctor about his discovery, so he must join up with the renegade
French Secret Service agents and find the monster's nesting site and
destroy the eggs before the Mayor starts letting the populous back
into the city (even though the monster isn't dead yet).
I sincerely hope that I've completely spoiled any interest anyone
might have of seeing this film. I gave away the relevant plot so that
I could spare those of you courageous (or foolish) enough to drop down
an hour's wage on this tripe. Everything about "Godzilla" reeks almost
as bad as the piles of rotting fish used to trap the beast. The script
(and let's be clear here) by Devlin and Emmerich is so full of plot
holes and non characters as to be sure to be the recipient of next
years "Razzie" award. The dialogue between Maria Pitillo (as Audrey
Timmonds, Dr. Tatopoulos' estranged girlfriend) and Mr. Broderick is
so adolescent, it makes teenagers giggle in disbelief (as happened
during the screening I witnessed). The film could be enjoyably campy
if it didn't take itself so damn seriously. But to what end, as there
is no commentary on humanities foibles against nature, nor is there
any reference about Godzilla being some sort of retaliation against
mankind. No. Godzilla is just a big dummy that got knocked up by some
French immigrants and decided to let the state of New York pay for it.
The film is bleak and ugly looking. Taking place at night during a
rain storm, the movie has little or no depth. Everything is ugly and
dark. New York has never looked so inhospitable since "Death Wish". In
an attempt to give the film some color, Audrey Timmonds carries a
bright red umbrella which is unique in that everyone else in the film
carries the standard gray issue. The only moment of composition and
color is during the brief scenes on Jamaica, where Dr. Tatopoulos
finds himself standing in a giant footprint. The scene is nicely
photographed but poorly set up. You know from the outset that Nick is
standing in a footprint. For a scientist, this is very poor
observation. Let's look at some of the more interesting plot holes in
the film (this activity, is becoming almost as popular as the Kevin
Bacon Game):
1.) Why does the French nuclear tests only affect one clutch of Iguana
eggs, and how do those eggs fuse into one beast?
2.) Why would a cold blooded creature choose a cold climate (such as
New York) to nest? I don't think iguana's have a habit of migrating.
3.) How can Godzilla crawl through the New York Subway system, slice a
submarine in half, yet be unable to extricate himself from some thin
(in comparison) steel cable on the Brooklyn Bridge?
4.) The Brooklyn Bridge is the only suspension bridge in existence
that does not need it's suspension cables.
5.) Did Godzilla carry all two hundred eggs in her belly? If so, then
radioactive mutations surely are wondrous creatures. (NOTE: each egg
is 10 feet tall and almost as wide.  Godzilla would have to be over
1,000 feet tall to carry them all).
6.) Godzilla can crush ships and eat helicopters, but New York cabs
are made of stronger steel.
7.) Godzilla can out maneuver Helicopters, bullets, torpedoes and
missiles, but can't catch you on foot.
9.) Godzilla can burrow through the subway system but can't tear
through the Park Avenue Tunnel.
10.) Why was nothing else mutated by the nuclear test as quickly as
Godzilla? Maybe a giant hermit crab in the sequel.
11.) Galapagos Iguana's actually live in the French Polynesian Islands?
12.) Why was Dr. Tatopoulos brought in by the military if they were
not going to listen to him anyway?
13.) How did they evacuate New York Island in less than a day, and how
did they convince those New Yorkers to go to New Jersey?
14.) New York Television stations use VHS tape for both filming and
broadcasting. New Yorkers hate Beta cam.
I could go on and on, but that would only serve to make the film seem
more enjoyable than it is. Don't be fooled, this film has less gray
matter than any episode of "America's Funniest Home Videos".
The performances in the film are singularly bland. Not one performance
belays any awe or fear in the face of this two hundred foot tall
terror. The characters, in the midst of the onslaught, have time to
stop and discuss the lack of good coffee, failed relationships, career
choices. The only common occurrence that doesn't take place here is
having one of the characters have a bowel movement, but then that
would have made them believable.
Godzilla for the most part is okay. The design of the beast is funky,
if not Very memorable. One thing that comes to mind-- the major
redirection of Godzilla in this film is to remove his most familiar
trademark, namely his atomic breath. Now, I for one can't quite fathom
how you can call this monster Godzilla without that little trait. A
good comparison would be to make a Superman film and eliminate his
ability to fly. There is so much wrong with this film that I can't
really recall anything recently that has left me this cold hearted
(except for my divorce). Any film that can have a two ton lizard
slipping on gum balls has got to be envisioned under the influence of
Prozac. The addition of the baby raptors (ah, I meant Godzillas), are
nothing but a direct rip off of 'Jurassic Park", but with none of that
film's suspense or tension. Suffice to say that, "Godzilla" is without
a doubt the most brain dead motion picture of the decade. This is a
film that needed the hype. With the current level of writing and
directing, nothing else about the film succeeds. If you've seen the
trailers, you've seen the best parts.
My only suggestion for Mr. D and Mr. E. is that they could always go
back to selling shoes.
1/2 out of *****. This film could be the next "Rocky Horror". Only it's not funny!
Copyright 1998 R. L. Strong.
Nothing in this article may be reprinted or copied without the expressed written permission of the author.

Author
Alex Fung
GODZILLA (TriStar - 1998)
Starring Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria
Screenplay by Dean Devlin & Roland Emmerich
Produced by Dean Devlin
Directed by Roland Emmerich
Running time: 138 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   After months of speculation, the secret is finally out.  The team
   behind GODZILLA have gone to extreme lengths to keep the revamped
   look of the new monster under wraps for the past ten months, even
   obligating cast and crew to sign strict confidential agreements.  The
   teasers and trailers have deliberately revealed precious little, as
   well -- a scaly foot here, an enormous eye there.  Well, to much
   media frenzy, the eagerly-awaited film has finally been unveiled, and
   the truth can be revealed.  It's big.  It's green.  It's reptilian.
   I mean, come on, this is Godzilla -- what *else* is it supposed to
   look like?
   The appearance of the mighty behemoth is the least of the concerns
   for the filmmaking team of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin, who
   previously brought forth the 1996 smash hit INDEPENDENCE DAY.
   Working from a story they conceived along with Ted Elliott and Terry
   Rossio, GODZILLA has an utterly hackneyed, inane screenplay -- but
   with a film like this, perhaps that's as it should be; anything with
   a shred of legitimacy would probably only serve to underline just how
   ridiculous the premise of a giant lizard stampeding through a
   metropolitan center truly is.
   The original 1954 Japanese film, GOJIRA (released domestically as
   GODZILLA, KING OF THE MONSTERS) was at its heart a cautionary tale
   about the dangers of nuclear escalation.  This new production doesn't
   carry such lofty messages -- and perhaps wisely so; poorly handled,
   and it'd be SUPERMAN IV: THE QUEST FOR PEACE all over again -- but it
   remains faithful to its predecessor in respect to the beast's origin
   as an unforeseen side effect of nuclear testing.  Incorporating
   actual footage of the Abel, Baker, and Castle Bravo test blasts of
   the early 1950s in an inspired, moody opening, Godzilla's inception
   here is from an reptile egg irradiated by fallout from French nuclear
   testing in the South Pacific.
   It doesn't take long for the big guy to get into action.  Sinking a
   Japanese fishing ship with the greatest of ease, only glimpses of the
   amphibious monster are revealed during the attack, and it's not until
   it reaches its final destination that the reinvented beast is
   completely revealed.
   In the meantime, we're introduced to Howdy Doody hero Dr. Niko
   Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), a biologist from the U.S. Nuclear
   Regulatory Commission who studies effects of radiation leakage.
   Whisked away from his Chernobyl earthworm studies (I am not joking)
   by the military in order to examine the irradiated wreckage of the
   Japanese vessel, he repeatedly encounters mysterious Frenchman
   Philippe Roache, who, accompanied by a small entourage of fellow
   countrymen (all of which are amusingly named Jean-something), may or
   may not be a mere insurance company representative.  (My bet would
   be: not.)  Mr. Broderick imbues his character with such flagrant
   ingenuousness that a scene where a pull-back reveals him obliviously
   standing in the depths of a gargantuan footprint, intended to strike
   awe into the hearts of the audience, only serves to make his
   character appear like a floundering idiot.
   Our other two protagonists are found in New York City, "the city that
   never sleeps" according to Sinatra and the text crawl which
   introduces the bustling metropolis -- given the ominous aesthetic Mr.
   Emmerich aims for, it might have been better described as the city
   where it never stops raining.  In an insipid thread, Audrey Timmonds
   (Maria Pitillo) is spinning her wheels as assistant to egotistical
   hotshot TV news anchor Charles Caimain (Harry Shearer).  Stifled in
   her attempts at career advancement to full-fledged on-air
   correspondent, she spends much of her time bemoaning her woes to a
   sympathetic Victor "Animal" Palotti (Hank Azaria), a rough-'n-tumble,
   ready-for-anything TV cameraman.  Luckily for the frustrated Audrey,
   she just so happens to be the former flame of Nik, which
   automatically means by the end of this film, she'll have fulfilled
   her career aspirations in triumphant fashion, and outwrangled her
   oppressive, villainous superior to boot.
   Although the film's four protagonists are human, the real star of the
   show is Godzilla, and when it finally makes its bow in the
   waterlogged Big Apple, it's quite a sight to behold.  The shots of
   the monster are suitably impressive, if not quite awe-inspiring; it's
   not a CGI effect that hasn't been seen before in the JURASSIC PARK
   pictures -- it's only bigger.  In fact, the creature's sheer
   magnitude is somewhat problematic in that it's vaguely offputting --
   it's *too* big.  Size *does* matter, but when the beast towers over
   the city to the degree that it does here, it becomes increasingly
   distant and uninvolving, and Godzilla loses some of its indescribable
   charisma -- an important factor here, since the filmmakers are
   clearly aiming for the audience to sympathize with the giant reptile,
   at least to some degree.  Gone is the cheerfully malevolent Godzilla
   of old, toppling buildings left and right as it stomped its way
   through anything in its path -- our new-age Godzilla is much more
   tidy, accidentally leaving in its wake a path of destruction as it
   thoughtfully navigates up and down city streets and boulevards.  And
   this fearful Godzilla actually flees from its minuscule human
   attackers!  Where have you gone, Godzilla Senior?
   Predictably, I found myself rooting for the marauding Godzilla rather
   than our heroes -- not because the filmmakers were successful in
   winning audience empathy for the beast ("It's only an animal," whines
   sensitive, ecologically-minded Dr. Tatopoulos), but by default, since
   all of the human characters are so inept that it's impossible to
   cheer for them.  The military, in particular, is woefully pathetic;
   they're suffering from stormtrooper-itis, unable to hit a target 200
   feet high.  I felt like running up with a can of red paint and
   marking a giant bullseye on Godzilla's back in the hopes that it
   might help.
   Dr. Tatopoulos hypothesizes that Godzilla has traveled to New York in
   order to lay its eggs; the military dismisses this as preposterous
   and refuses to heed his warning, so by default you know that he's
   right.  Consequently, while the armed forces lick their wounds and
   prepare for a rematch with the big green guy, Tatopoulos and Roache's
   team, trailed by newshungry Audrey and Animal, inflitrate the
   evacuated city in search of Godzilla's nest, eventually finding
   hundreds slimy eggs within the devastated confines of Madison Square
   Garden.  (What, no Yankee Stadium?)  While fumbling Audrey and Animal
   finally reveal their presence, Roache's squadron set out to destroy
   the nest with explosive devices, while Ripley torches the eggs with
   her flamethrower.  Whoops, wrong movie.  And when an irate Godzilla
   itself stumbles onto the scene, we're set for an action-packed finale
   where our four protagonists confronts the giant lizard.  "Mommy's
   very angry," whispers one character as the reptile bellows in rage.
   Whoops, wrong movie.
   While the film is often inconsistent with respect to Godzilla's
   abilities (how can the beast outrace attack choppers in one chase
   scene, yet is unable to keep up with an old clunky automobile in
   another?  I guess its fish diet binging hampered its mobility), some
   of the action sequences are entertaining.  The cat-and-mouse game
   with the infant 'zillas in Madison Square Garden is old hat after
   similar sequences in the Spielberg JURASSIC PARK pictures, but
   they're sufficiently well-executed by Mr. Emmerich to be exciting.
   For Gothamites, there's much to cheer about as various familiar city
   landmarks are depicted in various states of disarray in the wake of
   Godzilla's destructive path; in a scene which ends with the
   exclamatory instruction to destroy MSG, I wouldn't be surprised to
   learn that New York prints of the film have applause cues here.
   The monster scenes are adequate, but any time people are onscreen
   instead of the creature, there's an overwhelming compulsion to give
   the film the MST3K treatment.  The character development is anemic,
   and the gags and one-liners are outright pathetic (even the Siskel &
   Ebert spoof is milked a bit too far; I wonder if Ebert minded,
   though, since the Gene character was his subordinate).  None of the
   human characters are remotely engaging, and the dialogue is utterly
   banal.  In fact, the human side of the story, with its various inane
   subplots, is so blissfully hackneyed that it begins to take on a life
   of its own.  It's so ridiculously weak that I could barely contain
   myself from chortling anytime anyone said anything.  GODZILLA is a
   film best approached if you're prepare to laugh; otherwise, you'll
   just end up groaning a lot.
   Of course, one might have hoped for a bit more than just a good bad
   movie from a project budgeted at $120 million.  With regards to the
   genre, Mr. Broderick commented, "You have to care about the people
   being chased by aliens or monsters for the movie to work.  Otherwise,
   it's just a bunch of explosions and special effects."  Exactly.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"Unlike you, I'm tolerant of weirdness."
     - Jennifer Jason Leigh, CROOKED HEARTS

Author
Michael Redman
* (out of ****)
In this re-make of the 1954 Japanese monster film, Godzilla is transformed
into a "Jurassic Park" copy who swims from the South Pacific to New York for
no real reason and trashes the town. Although some of the destruction is
entertaining for a while, it gets old fast. 
The film often makes no sense (a several-hundred foot tall beast hides in
subway tunnels), sports second-rate effects (the baby Godzillas seem to be one
computer effect multiplied on the screen), lame jokes (Mayor Ebert and his
assistant Gene are never funny), horrendous acting (even Matthew Broderick is
dull) and an unbelievable love story (why would anyone want to get back
together with Maria Pitillo's character?).
There are other elements of the film that fall flat, but going on would just
be a waste of good words.  Only for die-hard creature feature fans, this
might be fun if you could check your brain at the door. I couldn't.
(Michael Redman has written this column for 23 years and has seldom had a more
disorienting cinematic experience than seeing both "Fear And Loathing" and
"Godzilla" in the same evening.)
[This appeared in the 5/28/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Joe Lore
So yeah , I saw Godzilla today. What did I think of it? It's not a good
movie , neither is it a bad movie , nor does it enter the category of
average movies. Godzilla resides in that gray area between watchable
movies and flicks you'd wish the big G would squish , repeatedly. How
best to describe it to you? It's what I like to call at nitpick flick ,
any moron can figure out a thousand ways it could have been better. And
make no mistake , altough it is quite enjoyable , Godzilla could have
been sooooo much better. But don't take this the wrong way , you will
have a good time while watching Godzilla , but afterwards you will bitch
about it on the way home.
The big G himself. Now that the movie as finally been released we now
understand why they only show his legs and feet in the trailers. Why?
Because the special effects stop being flawless above the hips. Mind you
, 90% of the population of the earth will not notice the flaws in the
effects. In fact , these are some really special special effects , but
anybody with a sharp pair of eyes will see that sometimes Godzilla has
this aura around certain areas of his body , a surefire sign that the
effects guys had trouble blending in Godzilla with his surroundings.
This is mostly hardcore nitpicking and i'm sure most people did not 
mind , but for person's like me who know how effects are made it caused
just a teensy eensy little problem.
What really drags the movie down are the "actors" , please note the
quotation marks used in this case to signify sarcasm. I will immidiately
defend myself against the attacks I will most certainly receive from
fans of Jean Reno: he was the only good actor in the movie and I am
ashamed to mention his performance in the same paragraph as the
following:
Matthew Broderick plays Matthew Broderick , this guy ( note how I no
longer use the term actor ) has no range , I was never sure if he wanted
to hunt down the creature and kill it or save it in the name of science.
( Spoiler follows ) When they discover the Godzilla eggs near the end ,
I kept waiting for Broderick to stop the French guys from blowing up the
eggs , he had this look on his face like a wounded puppy dog who just
lost his favorite toy. I should have realized that's how he always looks
, never mind that Godzilla is centimeters in front of him or that a
dozen babyzillas are chasing him.
Speaking of the babyzillas , this is what really ruined the movie for
me. I have never seen such an obvious ripoff of a previous movie , I
have seen copies , homages , remakes , and several ripoffs before but
this takes the cake. I went to see Godzilla , not The Lost World ,
because there is no mistaking the fact that these are Velociraptors.
They look nearly the same , run , jump , bash and scream in the same
manner. Two major differences: the Raptors were done way better and were
ten times more dangerous.
When the babyzillas are chasing Broderick and co' ( get em' guys! ) the
effects break down in an hurry , you feel as if you could walk right
through one of these creatures , they look that fake. In fact , if you
look closely when they are breaking down doors you can see that the
impacts don't quite happen at the same moment a baby rams the door.
Another small detail ( even I have to admit that this is way beyond
nitpicking but...) these things weight , oh , let's say half a ton. At
that weight , even if those were jawbreakers on the floor they would
have shattered and not tripped the creatures.   
I was wrong , now I know what really ruins the movie: the little blond
chihouaha hanging around Broderick for most of the movie. Good god ,
that woman was annoying. Wait till you see her "big emotional scene"
were she as to cry her eyes out because she betrayed her ex-boyfriend
which she nearly married eight years ago. ( Also known as a useless
sub-plot meant only to keep people from falling asleep between Godzilla
attacks...so much for that idea.) 
I don't understand Emmerich and Devlin , they had some inspired casting
for Independence Day and now this! In this kind of movie you need heroes
that are bigger than life , Wil Smith anybody? And don't tell me actors
aren't important in effects filled movies because that's just not true ,
in fact good actors could have saved that infinitely long half hour
after the initial Godzilla rampage. Did I mention Hank Azeria? Well , he
was okay but not good , altough he deserves an oscar by comparison.
And like in most giant monster movies , the army was quite pathetic in
destroying Godzilla. Especially the helicopter pilots , I understand why
the missiles missed but come on! With ten helicopters on it's tail you'd
think that one of them could aim that gatling cannon with better
acuracy! Speaking of the pilots , are these people trying to crash into
each on purpose or what? They keep bunching together like a swarm of
hornets , I think I remember one pilot yelling to another because he
almost got shot down by friendly fire. 
And don't these submarine Captains know of a little thing called
countermeasures? You know , those little thingies subs fire to confuse
incoming torpedoes? I know they were busy dodging Godzilla but it takes
half a second to yell out "Launch countermeasures!" Speaking of stupid:
"Send out the divers to recover the body!" Excuse me? Never mind the
fact that should have kept shooting , but exactly how are frogmen
supposed to recover the body? Steroids?
Speaking of weight , I may be wrong about this but I really doubt that
bridge could support Godzilla's weight , never mind the fact that he was
jumping and stomping all over the place. And while we're on the subject
of chances of survival: three dozen babyzillas , four actors , only way
to go is straight through them...and nobody loses an arm or something?
Oy!
I know , I know , I am really bitching right now but I oh so wished
Godzilla could have been a better movie. I liked Godzilla , I enjoyed
Godzilla , but it is also a movie brought down by a lack of fresh ideas
, horrible actors and dozens of little things that any person could have
fixed. Don't let this stop you from seing Godzilla ( as if it will ) ,
but be prepared for a bit of a disapointment and a feeling of déja vu.
Rating: 2 and a half out of 5 for: Blowing up Madison Square Garden ,
one excellent jump by Godzilla , stupid actors playing stupid characters
, "sharpshooters" ( snicker ) , Velocirap...uh , and wishing Godizlla
would put the blond ditz out of her misery.

Author
Choo Eng Aun, Jack
Back from the immensely successful INDEPENDENCE DAY, director ROLAND =
EMMERICH and producer DEAN DEVLIN (both collaborated in earlier moderate =
hits, UNIVERSAL SOLDIER and STARGATE) are back with yet another =
eye-popping, effect-laced excuse of a movie. GODZILLA has nothing going =
for it other than its CGI effects, which forms nearly 90% of the film! =
And what effects! As yet again, EMMERICH and DEVLIN has opted to go for =
lesser hit-movie actors as in their films pre-dating GODZILLA. The =
teasers for GODZILLA started hitting screens and TV more than a year ago =
and rumours has it that the budget is close to a whopping US$200 =
million.=20
The story brings us to the pacific where the French have been conducting =
nuclear tests, inevitably harming the wild life and setting them off =
from their predestined path of evolution. GODZILLA was thus born, =
standing as tall as the Empire State Building, GODZILLA is no more than =
a gargantuan mix between a Komodo Dragon and a T-Rex. It sets off from =
the pacific, walked across Mexico (without being detected!) and swam its =
way to Manhattan, New York to make it into a nesting place. Sounds more =
like an excuse than a story right? Well, I don't blame you. After all, =
this is Hollywood!
Broderick is the ever-zealous Nick, who leads his field of study in the =
effects of radiation on the evolution of animals. Trailing the creature =
to New York, he bumps into ex-girlfriend, Audrey (Maria Pitillo), an =
aspiring reporter who find herself lacking in the nasty skills required =
in achieving her dream. When the military falsely dismisses Nick from =
their research team with the accusation that he has been leaking =
information to the public, he is picked-up by French secret agent =
Phillippe Roche (Jean Reno). Incidentally, the French has sent a team of =
secret operatives to destroy the creature, an effort to undo what they =
have indirectly done through the nuclear tests. Jean Reno once again =
reprises his role as `The Cleaner' (as in his roles in Luc Besson's LA =
FEMME NIKITA and THE PROFESSIONAL aka LEON), apparent to his words in =
the film, `we are here to clean the mess we have made'. Hank Azaria =
plays Animal, the crazy cameraman who would do anything for a good =
camera shot.
In GODZILLA, the creature takes centrestage. True to the original =
Japanese GODZILLA movies, we get to see gratuitous lack of respect for =
public property as it tramples through landmarks of New York. The CGI =
effects are impressive, imagine JURASSIC PARK with a few thousand =
percent more worth of CG creatures. One cannot help but notice the =
resemblance of this creature to the previous two dinosaur movies and =
though it may not deliver the landmark quality to outshine the realism =
of JURASSIC PARK and THE LOST WORLD, it sure has the magnitude and =
destruction to significantly numb audiences, forcing them to immerse =
into the fast paced action and loud sound effects.=20
EMMERICH's direction flows with unoriginal ideas, regurgitated from =
landmark action sci-fi movies of our time. Each scene an excuse to flex =
yet another muscle of his CGI team. Definitely the special effects movie =
of the year. Not quite memorable stuff, but it was highly entertaining =
while it lasted.=20

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 21 May 1998 with Andrea for $18 at the Sony Lincoln Square and on
22 May with Tony for $8.75 at the Cineplex Odeon Chelsea.
There is a good news and bad news about *Godzilla*. The good news is that
*Godzilla* does not destroy anything above 60th Street, so my
rent-stabilized apartment was never in danger. The bad news is that the
only good thing about Godzilla is the lizard itself; the acting, story,
and script is flawed. So why did I see it twice? Well, that's a
Seinfelding saga not worth repeating. 
Actually, seeing it twice made me notice some subtle humorous touches I
didn't notice the first time, but was it worth spending in excess of $25
for it? Well, no, but I have done enough sneak-ins and seen enough
Godzilla (and Mothra!) free on cable to see the karmic justice in this. 
Directed by Roland Emmerich (of *Independence Day* fame) and from the
makers of Tylenol, *Godzilla* has been promoted since I saw the preview at
*Men In Black*, and the audience went wild. A lot of secrecy surrounded
the new look of the monster, and with good reason. It's not as "human" as
the original Toho version, and it's face is amorphous.  As Andrea put it,
"They do the feet the best."
An interview with the director reveals that until *ID4*, a lot of filming
was done in New York, and the monster was added later with computer
graphics. So the result is some fairly realistic scenes of authentic
destruction of New York. In fact, the monster destroys the area a block
away from my office, which was spared. Damn. Also, seeing Godzilla
diving over the West Side Highway and into the Hudson River was pretty
neat. 
There are also some neat homages to other movies here. The opening scene
of the sinking of the Japanese fishing boat is right out of the Japanese
monster movies that inspired this movie. The Mayor's first scene is
reminiscent of the umbrella scene in Hitchcock's Foreign Correspondent and
the finale at Madison Square Garden reminds me of the final scene of the
Birds..
That's about it for praise. As Dave points out, a big flaw in these
special effects blockbusters is that there is too much talk. Also, the
acting budget is scuttled, so we get a shrill, vapid Maria Patillo (as
Audrey) instead of a Helen Hunt or a Minnie Driver. It's like two
different movies there for a while. Effects-laden monster suspense one
minute, B-grade comedy straight-to-video the next. Matthew Broderick as the
atomic scientist hero is not an asset either. However, he does fulfill the
traditional role of the little boy Godzilla loves.
Everyone seems rather two dimensional and bumbling. There's the stuttering
military man O'Neill (Doug Savant), the New Yawk cameraman "Animal" (Hank
Azaria) who embodies every stereotype (including an annoying wife who
lovingly calls him a "dumb wop."), Harry Shearer as the sexist pig
newscaster, Michael Lerner plays Mayor Ebert--complete with Gene, the
campaign manager he abuses (that seemed bizarre--I guess the director
hates Siskel *and* Ebert).. The only character that is truly humorous and
not annoying is Jean Reno as the French secret service man who feels his
country's responsibility in creating Godzilla inadvertently by doing
nuclear tests in Polynesia. It's a shame that the joke of his assistant
spies being named Jean-Claude, Jean-Paul, and Jean-Philippe is hidden
until the final credits. Oh, and who keeps a top-secret videotape in a
tent TOP SECRET written with big red letters on it?
There are some inconsistencies as well. It's pouring rain half the time,
but that effect is turned on and off like a faucet. It's supposed to be
raining, yet there's a pushcart vendor flipping burgers on the grill? The
It's pouring rain when people first see Godzilla but when there's a chase
scene minutes later, the rain stops. It starts again when the chase is
over. A movie that costs this much should be able to afford some
continuity. The city is really ravaged, but there is electricity flowing
freely. No gas main explosions or watermain leaks either, which we have in
New York *without* a visit from Godzilla. It's PG-13, and while some
people are killed off camera, there are no injuries and no hospital or
medical scenes.  Godzilla puts a hole in the Pan Am Building in the middle
of a workday, and there is no mention of casualties? It's PG-13 all the
way. 
The love story and the "news story" angles are silly and two-dimensional.
The original Toho productions usually kept the human stories fairly
message oriented about the environment. The film's opening sequence does
this; it's too bad that the rest of the film didn't do that. 
The original music by David Arnold is good in the opening sequence, but
not as good throughout, and the hokey Japanese trumpets of the Japanese
version is sorely missed.   
Add a star if you loved *Godzilla* movies as a kid, or if you are a kid.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Scott Renshaw
GODZILLA (1998)
(Tri-Star)
Starring:  Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria.
Screenplay:  Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich.
Producer:  Dean Devlin.
Director:  Roland Emmerich.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (intense situations, profanity, some violence)
Running Time:  135 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin have thrown down the gauntlet to film
critics...or, at the very least, to two film critics in particular.  In
GODZILLA, the latest summer spectacle-cum-marketing assault from the
creators of INDEPENDENCE DAY, a mutant reptile from the South Pacific
comes to New York City on a rampage, much to the consternation of the
city's blustering mayor (Michael Lerner).  A corpulent fellow with
familiar graying hair and glasses, the mayor noshes on Hershey's kisses
between campaign stops where he gives citizens his "Thumbs Up for New
York" signal.  Oh, and his name is Mayor Ebert.  Oh, and he has an
ineffectual, balding assistant named Gene.
     I don't know why Emmerich and Devlin found this snarky fit of
retaliatory pique necessary.  Certainly the negative reviews of Gene
Siskel and Roger Ebert didn't hurt the box office take of "ID4," which
somehow overcame two thumbs down to gross $300 million in North America.
GODZILLA is certain to be similarly critic-proof, pitting a massive CGI
beast against intrepid biologist Nick Tatopoulos (Matthew Broderick), his
former girlfriend and aspiring reporter Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo) a
mysterious Frenchman (Jean Reno), the entire U.S. Army and the fortunes of
every other summer film standing in its path.  Is critical acceptance so
important to the film-makers that doing well isn't good enough as the best
revenge?
     If such is the case, here's a simple bit of advice for Emmerich and
Devlin:  make better movies.  GODZILLA is a baby step in the right
direction, if for no other reason than that it's more honest in its
big-budget intentions than the dopey and grandiose INDEPENDENCE DAY.
Using ALIENS and JURASSIC PARK as its models rather than the adventures of
its rubber-suited predecessor, GODZILLA takes only half an hour before the
scaly behemoth hits the Big Apple and turns midtown Manhattan into a
Jurassic parking lot.  This sequence is followed by a dizzying helicopter
chase through the man-made canyons, which is followed by an underwater
encounter with submarines, which is followed by a search for what may be
the creature's nest, and so on.  The sheer variety of situations insures a
consistent level of interest, while simultaneously insuring several unique
levels for the inevitable Sony PlayStation version of the game.
     Whenever the film rests on human shoulders, however, you could sprain
your eyeballs from rolling them.  Continuing their uncanny knack for inane
back-story, Emmerich and Devlin create a mayo-on-white-bread relationship
dynamic between Broderick and Pitillo, and a mission for Reno which makes
less and less sense every moment I think about it.  The dialogue is
hopelessly feeble, the attempts at humor strained even by action movie
standards, and the characters so caricatured that Al Hirschfeld should
have drawn them.  Most unforgivably, GODZILLA wastes the immense comic
talents of Hank Azaria and Harry Shearer, restricting Azaria to loyal
sidekick duty as Pitillo's cameraman and leaving Shearer to do a
half-hearted (and less animated) version of his "The Simpsons" anchorman
Kent Brockman.  Even the always-appealing Broderick looks baffled by how
to be charming in such a suffocating role.
     At least Emmerich sends the audience home on a high note, closing
GODZILLA with a superb sequence in which Godzilla chases a cab through the
city, eventually onto the Brooklyn Bridge.  It's a sharp piece of action
film-making, and not the only one.  Yet GODZILLA can't get by on its
big-ness alone; in fact, the visuals sometimes seem decidedly less than
state-of-the-art, particularly when our heroes are threatened inside
Madison Square Garden.  When a blockbuster exists solely to impress you
with "you gotta see this" tricks, it's tough not to be disappointed when
you've seen the tricks before, and seen them done better.  There are ways
around that disappointment, though, which Emmerich and Devlin should
ponder:  Write better scripts.  Create real characters.  Make better
movies.  Either that, or continue blaming the messengers for the way they
hold their thumbs.

Author
Nicholas Amado
Starring: Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Maria Pitillo, Hank Azaria, Michael Lerner, Kevin Dunn, Harry Shearer
Godzilla is a nuclear freak. He is a lizard that has been mutated over
the years and has become a new species, one that has a foot as long as
this bus, and a claw as long as this sign. This aquatic creature made
its first attack in the Pacific Islands. He tore up a ship that
carried dozens of Japanese men. One survived. Only he was left to
recount the terror that he had seen. He was merely able to repeat the
words "Godzilla...Godzilla...Godzilla".
The film then introduces us to Matthew Broderick, a biologist who has
been studying the fascinating growth of Chernobyl earthworms. "They're
17% larger than they used to be!" he proclaims. The U.S. military
pulls him off this three year project and assigns him to figure out
what Godzilla is. And, boy, does he find out.
And, boy, does Godzilla suck. I hate to use such a word in a review,
something that is supposed to inform my audience, but I really need to
drive this one home and I refuse to use explitives. It is
unbelieveable to me how the producers of this movie saw the final cut
and said, "Ok! It's great! Let's show this puppy."
Roland Emmerich needs a good horse whipping. His latest piece of trash
makes ID4 look like a masterpiece of modern American cinema. And if
Steven Spielberg had never made the Jurassic Park films, Emmerich and
his team of talent-challenged imbeciles would never have had a clue as
to how the creature should look.
Let me give you a few examples of this terrible attempt at
filmmaking. I plan on giving some things away here. Belive me,
Godzilla holds no surprises for anyone with an IQ higher than their
shoe size, so...no worries. However, if you are looking for that
"first time thrill" and you refuse to let me do you this favor, by all
means, stop reading now.
A.) Godzilla makes his first ever attack in the Pacific Islands. He
next strikes in New York City. Um...anyone have a map handy?
B.) The Mayor of New York City is a heavy set individual with parted
gray hair and thick glasses. His name is Mayor Ebert. His assistant is
named Gene. Gene gives Ebert a thumbs down at the end of the film. I
couldn't make this up if I tried, folks.
C.) Stay with me on this one... Ok. Godzilla can out run
torpedoes. Hank Azaria can out run Godzilla babies. (Which look more
like Jurassic Park raptors than the Jurassic Park raptors.)
D.) The U.S. Military, upon realization that Godzilla has disappeared
after running rampant through the city, decides that he "might be
hiding in a building."
E.) (oh yeah, I can go all the way to E.) Godzilla strikes at
Manhattan. Manhattan, an island approximately the size of San
Francisco holds three million people. They evactuate to New Jersey in
about one day. No problem.
F.) Early on, they bait Godzilla with fish. (He likes fish, you know.)
The thing is on an Island. The Atlantic Ocean is three steps east, but
pile a whole bunch of grouper on Fifth and 57th...oh he's gonna come
running.
G.) You know what? I'll stop with the list now...the alphabet isn't
big enough anyway.
The dialogue makes me wonder if Producer Dean Devlin had his five year
old do a re-write. "The kid is GOOD!" he must have said. Maria Pitillo
is looking to become a name in Hollywood by starring in this potential
blockbuster. Bad move, Maria. Acting doesn't get much worse than her
turn as Broderick's ex-flame. Matthew Broderick is a good actor, but
you'd never give him a chance if Godzilla were the only film of his
you'd seen. Jean Reno needs to pick his American films a bit more
carefully.
At times, Godzilla seems to be headed toward a Zucker, Abrahams,
Zucker film. (Airplane!, Naked Gun.) The jokes are indeed that
bad. But just when you think the filmmakers are having fun with you,
they take themselves seriously. How dare they! Godzilla would have
been better if it had only thrown in visual sight gags and fart
jokes. At least then we would know we were supposed to laugh. Each and
every character in Godzilla is beyond stupid and I was really pulling
for the beast to kill more of them.
Emmerich did do one thing, though. (And I've no idea if it was
intentional.) He made me sympathize with Godzilla. His attackers were
so damn dumb that I felt sorry for him being pelted with bullets and
missles. But what made me feel even sorrier for him was that his
famous name will always be attatched to one of the worst films
Hollywood has ever produced.
Comments, complaints, questions, debates? Email me at namado@concentric.net

Author
Josh Schirmer
Ugh. That about sums this movie up. Just, ugh.
The original Godzilla movies are somewhat of a cult classic, and when
reviewing the previous films, each film had a certain degree of
intelligence. And that was the reason they found such an enviable cult
following; in spite of bad special effects, horrible dubbing, and a man
in a lizard suit, they maintained a certain degree of... how to put
this?... dignity? Not quite the word I'm looking for. You understand,
right? And in 50 years, Godzilla has maintained that degree of
'whatever'.
Leave it to America to screw the whole thing up.
>From the 'geniuses' that brought us "Independece Day", arguably the
WORST sci-fi movie of all time, to ruin whatever reputation Godzilla
had. While they do bring us eye-popping special effects that will amaze
you, they lost what was at the center of all the original Godzilla
movies -- a storyline. Summing up the movie is simple. Heck, I can do it
in one sentence: Giant lizard attacks a giant city and a bunch of
nobodies stop it. Simple as that.
Matthew Broderick stumbles over his lines, and it's hard to picture Hank
Azaria in any role besides his classic dog-walking character on the
television show "Mad About You". The dialogue seems to be improvized,
almost as if there was no rehearsel done at all. I can see the scene on
the set right now. "All right! We spent all of this money making big
special effects, and we've gotta get this movie out by summer or it's
going to bomb in our faces. So, you actors just say what ever comes to
the top of your head, all right? Make up something, m'kay? Good. ROLL
FILM!!"
The special effects are enough to keep you interested through one
viewing, and some of the cinemtography is well-done (the scene with the
black umbrellas comes to mind). Still, an hour into it, you will become
antsy, wondering how long they can drag it out. And drag it out they
do!!
I have to laugh. The slogan for the film is, "Size does matter". I think
they cut this too short. It SHOULD read, "Size does matter. Acting does
not."

Author
Pierce Dalton
 The new motion picture experience about Godzilla is as flat as the city of
Tokyo after Godzilla rampaged through it in 1958.
 A big budget, under written, overly hyped piece of boredom, Godzilla was
written and directed by the same team as 1996's Independence Day.
 Now ID4 was not great movie.  It wasn't even a good one.  But, it did have a
sense of awe and wonder, not found in Godzilla.
 The story, if I can remember the crucial parts, is about the creation of a
giant lizard mutated after years of radiation near a nuclear power plant.  The
lizard grows, leaves its footprints in the ground at various villages (which is
the best scene of the film), and swims its way to New York City.
 I really don't have to say what happens next.  All I can do is ask questions. 
(a) Why did Godzilla pick NYC out of all the Atlantc? (b) Can the beast really
swim thousands of miles within a couple of days? (c) Will this film sink the
careers of Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin?
 That last question isn't that important to the film's view point.  But it is
important for the film's grounds.  ID4 was crap, but made a lot of money. 
Godzilla, only slightly worse, is crap, but dropped like a rock at the box
office last spring after a mediocre opening of $55 million.
 Oh, I forgot the actors.  Matthew Broderick, Jean Reneo, Hank Azaria.  They
are all wasted.
 The reason I give Godzilla two stars is because of its style.  The film is
much more visually spectacular than ID4 in the cinematography department, yet
ID4's special FX were better.  That may not make much sense, but, it does to
me.
 This Godzilla needs to be put to sleep.
1999 (c) Quick Flick Pix    Pierce80@aol.com

Author
Michael Dequina
Reviewing a much-ballyhooed "event" movie like _Godzilla_ is a pointless
task.  No matter what I or any critic might say about it, everyone and
their mother will still rush out to the theatre to see the movie just to
say that they did.  But in the event that anyone out there is listening, be
forewarned that this lavish take on the classic Japanese monster movies is
a technically superb but flavorless piece of sci-fi hackwork.
_Godzilla_'s mediocrity should not come as a surprise to anyone familiar
with the work of the "brains" behind the project, the team of
co-writer/producer Dean Devlin and co-writer/director Roland Emmerich.  As
the film's many trailers so bombastically boast, they are the creators of
that overhyped sci-fi phenomenon of a couple year's back,
_Independence_Day_ (they were also behind another inexplicable success,
1994's ridiculous _StarGate_, as well as 1992's unspeakably horrid
Jean-Claude Van Damme-Dolph Lundgren battle royale _Universal_Soldier_).  I
was lukewarm on _ID4_ (it earned a fairly charitable ** 1/2 on my
scale--which elicited a rather snottily sarcastic e-mail from Devlin
himself), which had top-flight effects, a charismatic lead (the
incomparable Will Smith), but a sloppy script populated by poorly drawn
characters with vapid individual storylines.
_ID4_'s "human dimension" (which a lot of people actually bought into) is
as profound as _Schindler's List_'s in comparison to what is on display in
_Godzilla_--or, rather, what _isn't_ on display.  Our primary human guide
throughout the giant lizard mayhem is Dr. Niko Tatopoulos (Matthew
Broderick), a nuclear scientist who is enlisted by the military to
investigate the origins and analyze the behavior of the behemoth reptile
that is destroying New York City.  There, he is reunited with his college
sweetheart, aspiring reporter Audrey Timmonds (Maria Pitillo, sporting wild
Sarah Jessica Parker-ish locks--a coincidence?).  Their love story is
supposed to be the emotional hook, but Devlin and Emmerich scarcely bother
to give them any quiet scenes alone together, so what's the point?
Broderick and Pitillo appear to not see one either, woodenly playing their
already-plywood roles and failing to generate any romantic spark whatsoever.
But the flat lead characters are the least of _Godzilla_'s problems.  The
film's fundamental flaw can best be summed up in the scene where the
creature's appearance is fully revealed.  The work of creature designer and
supervisor Patrick Tatopoulos does not disappoint; sort of a mix between a
T-rex, stegosaurus, and velociraptor with a little iguana thrown in,
Godzilla's look is truly menacing, and the big visual revelation should be
a moment of genuine fright and tension, much like the grand T-rex entrance
in _Jurassic_Park_.  But Emmerich completely misdirects the moment.  The
audience's first, uninterrupted glimpse is scored with some uplifting,
awe-inspiring music not unlike _Jurassic_'s main theme, and Niko's aghast
look is one more of wonder than fear, which is what I'm sure any person,
scientist or not, would feel in the presence of a giant, hungry lizard.
  This is but the first instance in Emmerich's complete botching of what
should be a key element in _Godzilla_--terror.  For all the destruction
Godzilla causes, and the threat he poses to everyone's lives, the purported
"thrill ride" feels safe and is not scary in the slightest.  This is
especially the case in an extended sequence set in the destroyed Madison
Square Garden.  Without giving away a key plot "surprise," the sequence's
obvious model is the showcase raptor sequence in _Jurassic_ (in fact, so
much of _Godzilla_ is derivative of _Jurassic_ it might as well have been
called _Godzilla_Park_), but Emmerich and Devlin mistake quantity for
quality.  If you see the film, you'll know what I mean--the threat to the
"heroes" is considerably larger, but I never once felt that they were in
any danger.
The always-visually exciting (as opposed to just plain exciting)
_Godzilla_ would have gone down a bit easier if there was a greater dose of
humor.  Unlike _ID4_, which had a comic firecracker at its center in Smith,
Godzilla's stabs at humor are few and, frankly, not terribly funny.  Hank
Azaria, as news cameraman Victor "Animal" Palotti, tries to make the most
of the blah wisecracks he's assigned to deliver.  A running dig at Roger
Ebert--the stocky, silver-haired, bespackled mayor (Michael Lerner) is also
named Ebert, and an upturned thumb is his big campaign gesture--grows old
quickly.  An injokey dig at Warner Bros. and Disney, numerous lame verbal
gags involving Niko's Greek surname, Harry Shearer's pompous news anchor
(who is not too far from one of his _Simpsons_ roles, newsman Kent
Brockman), and some comic stoicism by Jean Reno (playing--what else?--a
shady Frenchman) round out the film's light touches.  As a whole, the film
takes itself much too seriously--much like Devlin and Emmerich themselves.
The terrible twosome have proclaimed themselves the Lucas and Spielberg of
this generation (a sad testimony), which could not be farther from the
truth.  While they are adept at handling the technical aspects of
effects-laden extravaganzas (_Godzilla_ is, if anything, a superlative
technical achievement, terrifically designed by Oliver Scholl and shot by
Ueli Steiger), they have yet to display any of the imagination, creativity,
or solid ideas of George and Steven.  What ideas they do have only work
within the confines of two-minute trailers, which are always far superior
to the full films themselves.   The fact that hype-brainwashed moviegoers
don't ever appear to care--and pre-sold _Godzilla_ certainly won't break
the mass hypnosis--shows that their true calling lies within the offices of
a studio's marketing department and _not_ on the creative end of the film
business.
mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mrbrown@ucla.edu
>My personal WWW siteshttp://welcome.to/mrbrown
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court: http://fly.to/michaeljordan
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak: http://fly.to/mj23
Personal Page: http://welcome.to/w3md
>Other WWW sites I work onhttp://www.HollywoodHotline.com
Albany Online: http://www.AlbanyOnline.com
Eyepiece Network: http://www.eyepiece.com
"I didn't know what to expect. It's like something you chase
 for so long, but then you don't know how to react when you
 get it.  I still don't know how to react."
--Michael Jordan, on winning his first NBA championship in 1991
...or, my thoughts after meeting him on November 21, 1997

Author
Brian Wolters
Just got back from watching Godzilla. I was a big fan of ID4, and even
though it wasn't logical, it was a lot of fun. I went in to Godzilla
expecting the same. What I got was 1 / 2 of what made ID4 good. Special
Effects. And I am not echoing what other people/critics have been saying,
just to be on a bandwagon, but the script was horrible! There was no
Character development. I didn't  care about a single soul! The acting by
Maria Pitillo was awful, almost to the point where I needed to quit looking
at the screen and cover up my ears! (I.E. The scene where she was crying.)
All of the other actors were wasted. They were not fun at all! The on going
jokes (Coffee, Tatopoulos last name, etc..) were not staged well at all, so
there was no humor in them. The one-liners were either mumbled, or said so
fast, that I couldn't understand them! And why wasn't Godzilla given more to
do?
As for Godzilla, he was an awesome site, but all of the action scenes
reminded me of Jurassic Park.
Also, why was it raining all of the time? What point in the plot did this
serve?
I left feeling let down and almost bored. I didn't care what happened by
midway through, I just wanted the movie to end! But I give it two stars
because of the special effects and the effort put forth by Broderick!

Author
Rick Ferguson
Starring Matthew Broderick, Maria Pitillo and Jean Reno
Written by Dean Devlin, Terry Elliott, Rolland Emmerich and Terry Rossio
I can probably come up with a dozen reasons why GODZILLA doesn't work. 
We could start with the script, which redefines the term "lightweight." 
Then we could move to the performances: Matthew Broderick's nutty 
professor routine never quite works, Hank Azaria thinks he's a 
recurring character on "Sesame Street," and Maria Pitillo's 
performance has the weight and texture of that powdery sugar they 
sprinkle on funnel cakes at the county fair. The special effects, while 
serviceable, in no way push the envelope. The filmmakers have even taken 
it upon themselves to not only alter Godzilla's appearance, but to 
change the whole concept of the beast from its original Japanese 
incarnation. The script even resorts to lame Siskel and Ebert jokes. I 
could go on. But despite its many flaws, I have to admit that I kind of 
dug it. The film walks a tightrope, to be sure, and very nearly plunges 
into awfulness at every turn. But you know what? If I was twelve years 
old, I would have walked away completely satisfied. When you're 
talking about a Godzilla movie, isn't that what counts?
Much has been written about how the original 1954 Japanese film GOJIRA, 
debuting not even ten years after Hiroshima and Nagasaki, represented 
the self-inflicted punishment the Japanese felt they deserved after 
losing WWII, as well as their dreadful fear of the Atom bomb. But little 
has been said about why the films caught on in the States. To the 
millions of American boys and girls who watched Godzilla rampage through 
Tokyo on low-powered UHF stations in the 70's, Godzilla represented 
the primitive, destructive Id which our parents and school teachers 
demanded we keep in check. What kid didn't stomp on his army men in 
the backyard sandbox, fantasizing that he was 300 feet tall and able to 
do pretty much whatever the hell he wanted? Godzilla was just a big ugly 
kid throwing a temper tantrum-- and he had atomic breath to boot.
So INDEPENDENCE DAY creators Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich, the latest 
inheritors of the Godzilla legend, had a pretty clear task before them. 
Give us a cool monster, updated for the Digital Age, have him destroy a 
major metropolitan area, give him some army men to stomp on, and come up 
with a couple of semi-interesting human characters to help us pass the 
time while we're waiting for the Big Guy to show up. Not too tough 
when you have Sony footing the bill, right?
The first calculated risk they take, as previously noted, is to 
completely alter the whole concept of the Lizard King. The Japanese 
version was nigh on invulnerable; he'd stand there and let the 
Japanese army take its best shot, then he'd wipe them all out with one 
blast of his atomic breath and continue on toward Tokyo. The new 
Godzilla, while equal in size, is more vulnerable and considerably more 
mobile than his predecessor. When the army starts shooting at this guy, 
he doesn't stick around' he hauls ass. Most of the destruction he 
wreaks on Manhattan is more or less a side effect of his need to outrun 
missiles and jet planes. Consequently, it takes a long time before we 
get a good look at him. We see a tail here, a foot there, but I kept 
waiting for a money shot, which never really happens. When we do get a 
good look at him, he turns out to be much more lizard-like than the old 
version. I can only compare the shock of his new look to the shock of 
comparing the new VW Beetle to the old model' not better, exactly, but 
different.
This Godzilla can also burrow, and ends up hiding from his human hunters 
deep in the New York City subway system. This turn of events leads us 
into a long dry stretch where we're forced to spend a lot of time with 
the sketchy human characters while they try to outwit a horde of baby 
Zillas which have hatched from eggs laid by their asexual parent in 
Madison Square Garden. The whole baby Zilla stretch is a dead rip-off of 
the Veloceraptor attack in JURASSIC PARK, only the special effects 
aren't as good. These scenes are saved, however, by the presence of 
Jean Reno, who plays a steely French secret agent who leads a team of 
commandos dispatched by the French government to kill Godzilla after 
they unwittingly created him with their nuclear tests in the Atlantic. 
As if the French would give a damn whether Manhattan gets flattened or 
not' they'd be laughing so hard that champagne would squirt out of 
their noses.
Broderick, as nerdy scientist Niko Testopoulos, is a game presence, but 
he really wouldn't be missed if someone else had taken the part. The 
rest of the cast is fairly anonymous, which reminds us of how much the 
success of INDEPENDENCE DAY depended on Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum. 
Devlin and Emmerich reasoned, not illogically, that they could forgo 
star power, since Godzilla was the only star they needed. But then they 
limit Godzilla's screen time to a couple of extended cameos. It 
doesn't make sense, and yet it worked. There's just enough humor, 
just enough Godzilla, just enough destruction and mayhem to pull it off.
Even so, I couldn't fault anybody for giving this picture a 
thumbs-down. I bought it; you may not. Devlin and Emmerich are competent 
filmmakers, but their true genius lies in their ability to take a high 
concept and market the shit out of it until you feel like an utter rube 
if you don't pony up your eight dollars at the box office to take the 
ride. It's almost more fun to watch them market a film than it is to 
sit through the finished product. GODZILLA delivers, though just barely. 
The twelve-year old in me had a good time, anyway.
Please visit the Film Geek web site at:

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Roland Emmerich
Cast:  Matthew Broderick, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria, Maria Pitillo, Michael
Lerner, Harry Shearer, Arabella Field, Philippe Bergeron
Screenplay:  Dean Devlin, Roland Emmerich
Producers:  Dean Devlin
Runtime:  139 min.
US Distribution:  TriStar
Rated PG-13:  disaster violence, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
A fellow critic, in his review of Godzilla, states his belief that his
opinion will not sway readers' decisions whether or not to see the
film.  I agree with that submission, although I think there will be a
lot of people out there reading reviews of Godzilla, wanting to see how
many critics agree or disagree with their opinions on what is perhaps
this summer's most-anticipated film.  Based on this assumption, I am
going to express my opinion in a manner which will hopefully convey that
I feel passionate about the words I have written here.
I hate Godzilla.  It's a film so bad that words like "incompetent" and
"wasteful" lose their meaning.  Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin are such
hacks, so devoid of talent and vision, that they simply throw away what
seem to be good ideas for films.  I was hesitant to admit this belief
until now:  Stargate is a mediocre wannabe sci-fi action flick with a
few interesting aspects and a nice cast.  Independence Day, their "best"
film, is exciting for the first half and at least in good humor (even if
it doesn't know it's awful) through the ludicrous and insipid second
half.  Godzilla, however, begins at the bottom of the "mediocre"
category and spirals quickly downward into a wretched pit of bad special
effects, shameless unoriginality, and possibly the worst script ever to
plague a film whose budget could retire the national debt.
In fact, there's almost nothing good to say about Godzilla.  There's
one scene that has Godzilla stomping full speed around the streets of
New York in pursuit of a taxi which contains our heroes; this segment is
a good action sequence.  Some of Matthew Broderick's lines are
fashionably executed, for he seems to be the only actor in the cast who
is fully aware of the fantastically bad dialogue that Emmerich and
Devlin have penned.  That, my friends, is the list of positives.  Seeing
as how the film is well over two hours, and that one scene and a few
lines of dialogue don't exactly fill the entire frame, I must now
explain to you that Godzilla is not just an intense disappointment, but
probably the worst film of 1998. 
Maybe I should begin with a summary (though I have considered not doing
this, for it is apparent that I will have given the film more thought
than the two men responsible for it).  The film begins with an
insightful look at a bunch of lizards getting irradiated.  Later, big
cargo ships and smaller fishing boats are ravaged and pulled
underwater.  So, we are introduced to Nick Tatopoulos (Broderick), a
worm specialist who is called in to investigate some really big
footprints on a tropical island.  Pretty soon, the huge radioactive
lizard is taking his first steps in Manhattan, having fun knocking down
buildings and screaming at things that are, perhaps, too small for it to
see clearly (such as human beings).  Later, it turns out that Nick's
skills as a worm specialist are very helpful, for Godzilla is burrowing
under the city and laying eggs in Madison Square Garden.
That's the story.  It doesn't sound too bad, and I think a pretty
decent summer blockbuster could have emerged from it, as opposed to this
film, which unsuccessfully aspires to be referred to as "incompetent"
and "wasteful."  I suppose it's time to be concrete about all this, so
I'll begin with the least of its problems.  First, the soundtrack is
bad.  The music by David Arnold is not the least bit exciting or
original, and is often very mushy and sentimental in parts that are
supposed to be touching.  
There are no characters, and most of the acting is extremely mediocre
(not that anyone cares about acting in a film like this).  Broderick, as
I said, has his moments, because he understands the awfulness of the
dialogue.  Kevin Dunn is the worst of the bunch, playing the Head
Military Guy who refuses to listen to reason and just wants to shoot
missiles at Godzilla, and ultimately cause more damage to the city than
the creature itself.  Maria Pitillo, in one of the pointless subplots,
plays Nick's ex-girlfriend, and she tries very hard to change her facial
expression on several occasions.  Hank Azaria plays a cameraman and is
far less interesting than he was in any other film he's ever been in. 
Most perplexing is the presence of Jean Reno, who is part of a pointless
and time-consuming subplot regarding the French government (although I
do like it when he says, "Running would be a good idea," with a straight
face).
The rest of the problems with this wad of cinematic refuse are
equivalent in intensity and importance, so I'll just lay into the script
first.  I can't think of a worse screenplay than this one, and that
includes all the low-budget straight-to-video numbers that get aired in
the middle of the night on HBO.  It is humorless (although there are
many failed attempts at humor).  It is not thought-out, and most of the
dialogue sounds like it was written by middle-schoolers still trying to
get a firm hold on the language.  Example:  "They might escape out into
the city!"  Any competent screenwriter would notice that "escape out" is
redundant, and that "They might escape into the city!" would be the
correct statement.  Am I quibbling?  No, because the script is
jam-packed with this kind of sloppy writing.  It makes me wonder if they
proofread the script before filming it.  Better yet, I wonder if they
wrote the script down at any point in time.  Keep in mind that *two*
adults are responsible for this writing.
How about this -- some helicopters have Godzilla targeted with
heat-seeking missiles.  When he dodges them, and the missiles blow up
the Chrysler building (I'm having flashbacks of Independence Day . . . I
can't believe they ripped off their own film), the reason is that he's
colder than the buildings around them.  That must be because he's cold
blooded, because he's a lizard, right?  Well, cold blooded doesn't mean
that he's really cold, for even the smallest snake in the world would
have a higher body temperature than a concrete building in the rain. 
This film, in every aspect, is the result of carelessness and idiocy.  
And here's the final blow:  the special effects just aren't that
great.  The sequence I mentioned above is exciting and fairly
well-crafted, but everything else here is terrible.  Godzilla frequently
looks like a cartoon, such as in the underwater scene that is a direct
rip-off from Alien Resurrection.  There's a lengthy sequence in which
our heroes find the egg room, and this is lifted straight out of
Aliens.  Everything else in the film is a poor remake of Jurassic Park;
Godzilla itself looks just like the Tyrannosaurus, and all the baby
lizards hold striking resemblance to the raptors from that film.  Every
single sequence (note that -- every single sequence) is unoriginal,
complemented by mediocre-to-lousy special effects and drab direction. 
The film is not exciting, and not interesting, and lacks even a hint of
style and energy that even the silliest summer flicks always have.
Godzilla is unacceptable.  It is the worst big budget film of all time,
and it wins this title by a landslide.  Roland Emmerich and Dean Devlin
are con artists, and coning is apparently the only kind of art they have
a handle on.  Understand this:  I love big-budget summer fare.  Recent
films like The Rock, The Fifth Element, and Contact are great
blockbusters that use big budgets to their advantages, and treat their
audience with respect.  Godzilla is a sloppy, boring film that delivers
none of what it promises.  I hate this film, and I hate that people are
going to flock to see it.  Certainly some will enjoy it, and I can't
stop that.  But I predict that most people will be disappointed in this
film.  I'm hoping that Emmerich and Devlin have spewed their last, for
this piece of crap retires all patience I once had for them.  

Author
Jon Popick
PLANET SICK-BOY: http://www.sick-boy.com
Let me make this point first  Godzilla isn't even as good as the
inferior South Park episode starring Barbra Streisand as the lizard
king.  It's a horrendously long, poorly acted, unoriginal piece of crap
that made me sad to be a Japanese-American.
Brought to you by the creative team responsible for the reprehensible
but slightly more entertaining Independence Day, Godzilla breaks
virtually no new ground in terms of mayhem, destruction or disaster.
You've seen it all before  giant reptile running through a major city
(The Lost World: Jurassic Park), doing the breaststroke (Alien
Resurrection) and multiplying like a bunny (Gremlins).  Mix it up with
some of the most obvious product placement scenes ever and you've got
yourself one hell of a condemnable snoozer.
Can I mention the glaring omission of people being chomped up by the
great beast?  Why bother giving him sharp pointy teeth if he ain't gonna
use humans for chew toys?  They've made Godzilla into such a PC/PG panty
waste, that if he ever did show up on Manhattan, the kids would want to
hug it instead of running away in terror.  Barney is actually a more
offensive creature, albeit on a completely different level.
Yeah, the beginning is all right and the ending is OK, but what the hell
happened to the 90 minutes in the middle?  I guess the filmmakers felt
that they needed an opportunity to showcase the fantastic story and
Oscar caliber acting.  It's certainly understandable, since most people
are paid to see Maria Pitillo and not the actual monster.
Maybe I was expecting too much originality.  I mean if I made this film,
I would have had Godzilla dry humping buildings, taking a huge dump into
Yankee Stadium, using Patrick Ewing as a toothpick and cramming subway
cars up its ass.  But that's just me.  I like things dark.
And as if that wasn't enough recycling, just wait until the closing
credits where Puff Daddy shuffles all over Led Zeppelin's `Kashmir'.  A
perfect ending to a perfectly boring film.

Author
Kevin Patterson
GODZILLA
Rating: ** (out of four)
PG-13, 1998
Directed by Roland Emmerich. Screenplay by Emmerich and Dean Devlin.
Starring Matthew Broderick, Maria Pitillo, Jean Reno, Hank Azaria.
GODZILLA, as I'm sure you already know, is a movie about destruction
wrought by a giant lizard created through genetic mutations due to nuclear
fallout in the South Pacific area. I'm no biologist, but I'm pretty sure
this is pure nonsense. But that kind of thing isn't what makes or breaks a
monster movie. I'm more than willing to turn my brain off and watch a giant
lizard destroy New York City and lay its soon-to-hatch eggs all over the
place as long as the script and logic manage not to actively annoy me.
Well, bad news: GODZILLA annoyed me often, and in many ways.
First off, there's the World's Most Incompetent Military Strike Force.
These guys plow into New York City with lots of high-tech weapons to fire
at the lizard...and they MISS!  Not once, not twice, they miss OVER AND
OVER AND OVER AGAIN. They fire missiles into the side of the Chrysler
Building, as well as several other skyscrapers, but they can't hit
Godzilla. As the city's Mayor Ebert (played by Michael Lerner in an obvious
parody of film critic Roger Ebert--he has an assistant named "Gene") points
out, the military causes even more destruction than Godzilla does. Why did
director Roland Emmerich and producer Dean Devlin, who co-wrote the
screenplay, make these guys into such idiots? Did they need a catalyst for
another ten minutes of destruction? (Hey guys, here's an idea: there's a
GIANT LIZARD on the loose.) Was it supposed to drum up sympathy for the
monster ? (Not a bad idea, but if that was their goal, the follow-up was
hardly adequate.) In any case, the result is puzzling at best.
The characters in this film are at best one-dimensional and at worst boring
and irritating. Matthew Broderick does okay as an expert biologist, as does
Jean Reno as a French secret service agent (who is involved in this
because--don't laugh--the French government supposedly feels guilty about
its nuclear tests in the South Pacific). Hank Azaria is, I guess, intended
as comic relief as a TV cameraman nicknamed "Animal," but his humorous
moments are ill-conceived. I realize that disaster movies have to tone down
the pure panic that would likely occur in a real giant lizard attack, but
honestly, do you know anyone who would wag his finger at a rampaging
400-foot-tall lizard and declare, "Now I'm really pissed!"? Maria Pitillo,
playing a reporter wannabe who was once engaged to Broderick's character,
is stuck with the role of a complete ditz. She's not ditzy in an endearing
way, nor would she even work as an object of mockery. She's just grating to
the point that you want her off the screen as soon as she opens her mouth.
This movie is full of misfired attempts at humor. There are times when the
script seems to be in some sort of contest with last year's BATMAN AND
ROBIN for bad one-liners ("This lizard reproduces asexually." "Where's the
fun in that?"). The Siskel and Ebert parodies were mildly amusing at first,
but obvious takes on real people are a risky form of comedy that belong to
the realm of spoof or of cameo appearances, and these two wear out their
welcome by a long shot. Then there's a scene of a taxicab inside Godzilla's
mouth, which miraculously results in no one biting the dust but does give
Azaria cause to scream "You're going the wrong way!" at the frantic driver.
Add this to some pure silliness like Broderick managing to trip up some of
Godzilla's babies by throwing ball candy on the floor in their path, and I
was occasionally left wondering if I was watching a Zucker brothers parody
of Godzilla movies.
GODZILLA isn't even a great example of a simple action movie. The conflicts
between these characters are for the most part shallow and uninteresting,
and this is one case in which the filmmakers would have done better to just
accept their one-dimensionality and get on with the explosions, monsters,
and general chaos. Instead, we're treated to long, boring scenes in which
they exchange cliched dialogue. Up until the second half of the movie, the
destruction and mayhem is surprisingly lifeless, running the gamut from
repetitive, mediocre imitations of INDEPENDENCE DAY, the Devlin/Emmerich
team's previous film, to downright laughable when the military manages to
hit everything in the city with the exception of the 400-foot-tall giant
lizard. Finally, as if to suck even more dramatic tension out of the action
scenes, Devlin and Emmerich telegraph most of them a mile away. "Did you
hear that?" one character whispers to another as they track Godzilla's
babies through underground tunnels. "What?" the other responds. Gee, you
think something's about to jump out at them?
After all this ranting, you may wonder why I gave GODZILLA any stars at
all. First of all, the action is fairly well executed towards the end of
the movie as the four principal characters are trapped inside Madison
Square Garden with hostile Godzilla babies. Yes, it's a JURASSIC
PARK ripoff, and yes, it's interrupted with dumb jokes like Broderick
opening an elevator door to find the monsters right outside and announcing,
"Sorry, wrong floor," but it still managed to keep me entertained even
though I knew Steven Spielberg had done it better. The final romp through
the city with the big guy himself is also quite good, ending with an
exciting chase on the Brooklyn Bridge. The movie also gains points for
portraying Godzilla not as an evil monster bent on destruction but as
nothing more than an animal trying to find a habitat. In this scenario, the
humans are not morally upstanding beings defending their rights, but simply
a competing species. This is slightly more thoughtful than simple
"Aaaaahhh, it's a big scary monster, kill it!" logic, but none of the
characters seem to think or talk about it very much, and the filmmakers do
little with this aspect of the story other than to portray the attempts to
down Godzilla with a certain amount of regret.
For about half of its excessive two-hour-plus runnning time,
GODZILLA provided some good edge-of-the-seat thrills, so I suppose it's a
partial success as a monster movie. Still, it's saying something about a
film that its best moments are when the filmmakers start unashamedly
ripping off other movies and reduce their characters to stick figures who
exist only to run around. If Godzilla comes back for a sequel, as the
ending indicates he probably will, I have a few suggestions: scrap these
characters, quit trying to be so cute, and find some more original ways to
create mayhem.

Author
Jamahl Epsicokhan
This review contains some minor spoilers of the feature film
"Godzilla," but I promise not to give away too many major revelations
about the plot (not as if there really are any, but still...).
Nutshell: Summer has begun; mindless destruction and virtually no
story, done with surprisingly less wit and inventiveness than usual.
Cast includes: Matthew Broderick (Dr. Niko Tatopoulos), Jean Reno
(Philippe Roche), Maria Pitillo (Audrey Timmonds), Hank Azaria (Victor
"Animal" Palotti), Kevin Dunn (Colonel Hicks), Michael Lerner (Mayor
Ebert)
Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich, the two industry-smart coordinators
behind "Stargate" (1994) and "Independence Day" (1996), have taken
their special-effects approach to filmmaking a step further with
"Godzilla," a film that has plenty of computer-generated
monster-induced destruction but next to zero in terms of a story.
Quite frankly, I wasn't really expecting much in terms of a story.
>From the word go, "Godzilla" was very obviously intended as the first
mindless summer blockbuster of 1998. It promised a simple, streamlined
story, lots of mayhem and destruction (a la "Independence Day" two
years ago), and all the elaborate special-effects sequences a
filmmaker can conjure with a $120 million budget.
But somewhere along the line, Devlin and Emmerich forgot that we still
need to feel *something* as the movie progresses. We need to care how
the events of the story will unfold. At the very least, we need to
feel viscerally involved as New York City becomes a stomping ground
for a 300-foot lizard.
Unfortunately, aside from a few isolated moments, "Godzilla" fails to
generate those feelings of awe. I didn't care about any of the
characters, I didn't care about the possible downfall of New York City
or "the entire world itself"--and I didn't really even care about the
lizard.
What we have here--a summer tradition invented once it became clear to
producers and directors that computer-generated effects could bring a
new sense of realism to the realm of natural (or unnatural) disaster
action--is yet another "special-effects movie." Without the special
effects (and a need to have well-known structures like the Chrysler
Building and Madison Square Garden leveled by film's end) there
wouldn't be a point to have the movie at all.
As always, there are good ways to do special-effects movies and bad
ways. "Jurassic Park" back in 1993, with its sense of wonder
concerning uncontrollable possibilities, was one of the groundbreaking
examples of the good way. And "Independence Day," while shallow and
silly, was also entertaining and had plenty of attitude to get by. But
as characterization and even the general sense of intensity get
stripped away, it becomes harder to feel that we're watching a giant
lizard stomping through a major city, and all too obvious that we're
watching millions of dollars and thousands of labor hours for special
effects being projected onto the screen.
The plot to "Godzilla" is a no-brainer. After a few token scenes used
to set up the premise and loosely establish the major characters, the
giant lizard (which, as most already know, is dubbed "Godzilla" and is
a mutated product of nuclear radiation) crawls out of the Atlantic and
begins stomping through the City That Never Sleeps. A biological
expert on mutated organisms (Matthew Broderick), known to most as "the
worm guy" (because he studies worms at Chernobyl, you see) is brought
in by the U.S. military to submit his opinions about the instincts of
the 300-foot lizard. He naturally offers helpful hints to the military
people, such as telling them to remove manhole covers so it can smell
the hundreds of tons of fish that have been placed on the street to
bait it. "What are they doing?" asks the unit's commander when his men
scatter to open manholes. Well, says I, they're *your* men. If you
can't keep up with what they're doing, then we're all probably in a
lot of trouble, aren't we?
There are scenes where helicopters chase Godzilla through the city,
firing thousands of rounds at him to no significant effect. One might
wonder why it takes the military characters so long to figure out that
bullets won't do the trick, except that a higher strategy is in work
here--a strategy set to ensure the movie will last close to 2 1/2
hours and produce a maximum amount of net destruction. At one point,
the mayor (Michael Lerner) complains to the colonel (Kevin Dunn),
saying, "You've destroyed more of the city than he has!" As someone
who is aware that this is a demolition derby rather than a plausible
reaction to a crisis, I suspect that's the whole point.
There are plenty of slow-witted characters at work here. It always
kills me the way officials in charge of situations like this one are
always the most likely to scoff at issues that any rational person
would address with swift action and undivided attention--like, oh, the
fact that Broderick suspects Godzilla is laying eggs that could
produce more Godzillas within only a few hours. Naturally, these
people don't look for this nest of eggs; instead, they kick Broderick
off the team because of a press leak. Talk about priorities.
As with all major disaster movies, there is of course a romantic
theme; in this case it's between Broderick's character and his old
college sweetheart (Maria Pitillo), who is an aspiring journalist
trying to break the "Godzilla story" (undoubtedly the biggest thing to
hit TV airwaves since O.J. Simpson). I was surprised at even how
ineffective and perfunctory this angle of the story was. I expected it
to be cliched, and it was, but I didn't expect it to be quite so
hollow. Pitillo's character comes off as a complete airhead, and the
performance doesn't bring a thing to it. At times the character seemed
worthy of self-parody, but Pitillo plays it hopelessly straight.
It's frustrating that this movie doesn't contain any interesting
characters or personalities. Everyone is a cardboard device used
solely to advance the plot. The most watchable character is probably
the one played by Jean Reno, an enigmatic persona who turns out to be
from an organization that's best summed into a sound bite as "the
French CIA."
I was also pretty amazed at how lacking the film was in original
action. The scenes that take place in Madison Square Garden prove
themselves to be so blatantly ripped off from the velociraptor attacks
in "Jurassic Park" and last year's "The Lost World" that I found
myself realizing how much more class and originality Steven Spielberg
brings to his set pieces.
And you'd think a movie from the makers of "Independence Day" would
have more room for good jokes about a 300-foot lizard. Alas, the humor
is surprisingly lacking here, and, when present, is surprisingly
stale.
The early-teenage level of the movie's pitch is perhaps a forewarning
that everything about the story is just a means to fill time between
lizard attacks: Every emotion is cued by David Arnold's relentlessly
obvious score, the dialog is as simple and succinct as it possibly can
be, and the supporting characters offer their comments only to prompt
the subsequent actions. It's plotting by comic book means.
On the other hand, even if the story completely fails to generate a
believable sense of doom, the effects manage to come off as very
realistic. Devlin and Emmerich and their crews are technical experts
when it comes to filming large-scaled destruction in a way that looks
utterly convincing, and the scenes of Godzilla stomping through the
streets, knocking down buildings and bridges and crushing cars are
extremely well done, and particularly effective in the taut final
fifteen minutes of the film. If you're going to see "Godzilla," see it
only because you want the visual experience of seeing New York City
decimated. There's no other reason to see it--though, deep down, you
probably knew that.
-----
Copyright (c) 1998 by Jamahl Epsicokhan, all rights reserved.
Unauthorized reproduction or distribution of this article is
prohibited.
Star Trek: Hypertext - http://www.epsico.com/st-hypertext/
Jamahl Epsicokhan - jammer@epsico.com
